Authors
Shay Casey
Number of Reviews
43

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, Linda Fiorentino, Chris Rock, Salma Hayek,
Alan Rickman, Jason Lee, Jason Mewes, Kevin Smith, George Carlin.
Written by Kevin Smith.
Directed by Kevin Smith.
Rated R.
Kevin Smith's "Dogma" shows that the young director of "Clerks" and "Chasing
Amy"  has learned to make a big-budget movie without turning it into the
overstuffed turkey "Mallrats" was. This film is, for the most part, a fun,
thoughtful romp through the Catholic religion. It's clever and funny while
asking some very worthwhile questions about what the church has become.
Rather than being a condemnation of religion, as some advocates have
claimed, it is really more of a devout meditation on this filmmaker's own
beliefs, ones that are probably shared by a great many Catholics. It's not
perfect, and Smith's indulgences get in the way of the narrative (such as it
is) too often, suggesting he hasn't completely mastered his use of a bigger
budget, but it's still a funny, entertaining experience. "Dogma" is humorous
and thoughtful at the same time, something that is rare in a film from a
filmmaker as young as Smith, but very welcome.
Ben Affleck and Matt Damon star as Bartleby and Loki, two renegade angels
trying to get back into heaven through a loophole opened up by the Catholic
Church. Because of a doctrine passed down by Cardinal Glick (George Carlin),
they find that they simply need to pass through the doors of a church in New
Jersey in order to be absolved of all wrongdoing. Unfortunately, since this
will prove God fallible, it will result in the universe being blinked out of
existence. To stop Bart and Larry, a messenger angel (Alan Rickman) who acts
as the voice of God enlists Bethany (Linda Fiorentino), a Catholic abortion
clinic worker having a crisis of faith. Along to help her are Jay and Silent
Bob (Jason Mewes and Kevin Smith) as unlikely prophets, Rufus the 13th
Apostle (Chris Rock), who was left out of the Bible because he was black,
and Serendipity (Salma Hayek), a muse who has taken human form, only to be
stricken with writer's block. Further complicating matters is Azrael (Jason
Lee), a demon with his own agenda who is actively trying to help the angels
and hinder the good guys.
Kevin Smith's best talent is as a writer, as the dialogue-driven "Clerks"
and "Chasing Amy" proved. In "Dogma," his fourth effort, Smith begins to
show some signs of growth as a director. He has begun making use of camera
movement and including action taking place behind the focus of the scene.
Smith has always been rather lackluster cameraman (by his own admission),
and his visual style is still mostly of the "talking-heads" variety, but he
shows a little more visual flair here than he has in previous films.
As always, when he concentrates on writing conversations, Smith tinges them
with just the right amount of wit to get his point across without becoming
preachy. His script is a little disjointed, with too much expository
dialogue, but it still contains enough worthwhile moments to overlook its
flaws. Smith does a good job of alternating between smart satire and the
"poop jokes" his audience has become used to. There are several priceless
bits, the standout being George Carlin's "Catholicism WOW!" program, in
which his Cardinal Glick announces that he will replace the "depressing"
crucifix symbol with the more jovial "Buddy Christ." Smith's idea of a Jesus
for the 90's is flat-out hilarious. Chris Rock has some good moments,
especially during his explanation of why his apostle was left out of the
Bible. Some other inspired bits have Matt Damon talking a nun out of
Catholicism and an unusual (to say the least) casting choice in the role of
God. Smith has a fine pop-culture sensibility, including references to
everything from "Sixteen Candles" to "Indiana Jones." Most of them work.
The performances in "Dogma" are varied. Matt Damon and Ben Affleck have the
same chummy chemistry they exhibited in "Good Will Hunting." Linda
Fiorentino is passable as Bethany, but she's hampered by a lack of emotional
range and Smith's obvious discomfort with dramatic scenes. Her one "big"
emotional moment comes off like an excuse to get her into a wet shirt, and I
'm still wondering if anybody in the real world has ever actually uttered
the sentence, "I'm physically and psychologically exhausted." Chris Rock and
Alan Rickman have plenty of good moments, the latter delivering all his
lines with delicious sarcasm. Jason Lee (who seems to Kevin Smith what
Samuel L. Jackson is to Tarantino) continues to impress as a solid
supporting actor, taking the role of the heavy with devilish glee (please
excuse the bad pun). Salma Hayek has yet to prove to me that she's more than
a pretty face, while George Carlin's scenes are all wonderfully inspired
("The Catholic Church does not make mistakes!"). Jay and Silent Bob, the
recurring characters of Smith's filmography, get a much larger slice of
screen time here, and their Mutt-and-Jeff antics keep the film continually
lively, even when it gets bogged down in exposition. Jay's stoner quips are
consistently funny (that is, if you aren't offended by constant use of the
F-word) and Silent Bob's facial expressions never cease to amuse me.
Where "Dogma" really runs into problems is in its story. Smith may be
proficient at writing witty dialogue and one-liners, but he still has yet to
understand good pacing. One of the reasons I think "Clerks" is still his
best movie is that he didn't bother with a story, just piecing together
scenes from a day in the life of a convenience store clerk. Here, he's got
an action movie plot as a vehicle for his discussions of Catholic dogma as a
vehicle for throwaway jokes and gags. Very often, the story gets lost in the
shenanigans. What "Dogma" needed after its fast start was a quick wrap-up.
Unfortunately, we get a long, drawn-out climax that takes far too long to
dispatch of the many characters it has introduced and is soiled by far too
much violence (a shame, since some of Smith's better jokes come in the final
sequence). This is a clear example of Smith getting too caught up in his
comic book indulgences, though the most egregious example happens when he
has a monster composed entirely of human feces threaten our heroes, only to
have him taken care of in a ridiculously conventional manner. I don't know
why he decided to leave this scene in, other than the obvious reason that it
cost quite a bit of money to produce. Smith needs to learn restraint before
he can be considered a "great" filmmaker. I do give him credit for trying,
though, because I see some signs of improvement here. He definitely didn't
indulge himself as much as he did in "Mallrats" (his other big-budget
production), which was a lifeless mess, save for Jason Lee's performance. If
he keeps on track, he should have a good grasp on what it takes to make a
complete motion picture.
"Dogma" is far from a perfect film, but it's nevertheless a worthwhile
experience, and sure to please fans of the director. (Note to Smith
devotees: Look for cameos by the two original stars of "Clerks," Brian O'
Halloran and Jeff Anderson.) Smith is a filmmaker with his own voice, and as
a practicing Catholic, he has clearly made a work that comes from the heart.
His discussion of Catholicism is intriguing, often exhausting, and always
honest, while his trademark wit remains firmly intact. Smith is a writer and
novice director who is clearly still learning his trade, but he is also
showing improvement. He has the pop-culture sensibility of Quentin Tarantino
and the scattershot politics of Spike Lee. If he keeps this up, he could
make some truly great movies in the future. "Dogma" is merely a good one.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring Nicolas Cage, Giovanni Ribisi, Angelina Jolie, 
Robert Duvall, Delroy Lindo, Timothy Olyphant, Christopher Eccleston, 
Vinnie Jones, Scott Caan, Will Patton. Screenplay by Scott Rosenberg. 
Directed by Dominic Sena. Rated PG-13.
"Gone in Sixty Seconds" is a perfect example of why reviewing films is 
not an exact science. Logically, intellectually, I know it was a bad 
film, one that will probably contribute to the general degradation of 
American cinema as a whole. But on a baser, more primal level, I enjoyed 
it. I could wax philosophical on all the script's problems with 
characterization, or on the utterly ridiculous plotting, or on the sheer 
stupidity of the whole thing, and being a long-winded critic, I probably 
will. But to give it a low rating would render me a hypocrite, because 
when all was said and done, when I had left the theater, I was 
satisfied; I had gotten my money's worth; I liked it. Despite all my 
brain's arrogant attempts to dismiss the film as dim-witted hogwash, my 
gut liked it.
The plot deals with retired car thief Memphis Raines (Nicolas Cage) and 
his attempt to save his brother Kip (Giovanni Ribisi) from the clutches 
of an evil crime boss (Christopher Eccleston). To do so, Raines must 
steal 50 rare cars in one night. Being an old pro (who had since left 
the "biz" for a legitimate career), Raines recruits a bunch of old 
friends to complete the task. Sound contrived? Of course it's contrived. 
This film was produced by Jerry Bruckheimer, master of contrived plots. 
He even throws in a brother-brother relationship and an old flame for 
Memphis, a blonde bombshell called Sway. She's played by Angelina Jolie, 
who gets second billing despite barely appearing in half the film. The 
truncated character relationships get their few scenes marked by 
grandiose orchestral swells, but they're unlikely to fool anyone. After 
all, characters don't matter in Bruckheimerland. They are merely props 
to be moved around during high-octane action scenes.
In the past, Bruckheimer has shown a tendency to get carried away with 
the spectacle of his films, attempting to juggle too many characters and 
plot threads. Since he's not much good at anything but action, his most 
overstuffed films ("Armageddon") have played as long, dull excursions 
into shallowness. The best thing, then, about "Gone in Sixty Seconds" is 
that it's refreshingly slimmed down. Yes, there are still too many 
characters, but they're placed very easily on either side of the 
conflict, and the goal is simple: Steal 50 cars. Simplicity is a 
necessity in Bruckheimerland, because you don't want to give anyone a 
chance to stop and observe how little substance there actually is. "Gone 
in Sixty Seconds" moves so fast, there's barely a chance to get bored. 
The car chases (and the second half of the movie is basically one big 
car chase) are filmed professionally and economically by director 
Dominic Sena. "Gone in Sixty Seconds" has everything you'd want from a 
car chase: squealing tires, revving engines, and implausible stunts 
straight out of a demolition derby. It's here the movie works best.
Now, I could complain about how everyone is a racial stereotype in 
Bruckheimerland: Black men are annoying loudmouths, Asian women are bad 
drivers, etc. (Who wrote this script-John Rocker?) Or I could complain 
about the shockingly banal dialogue. ("How bad is it?" "Bad.") And I 
could cite the jaw-droppingly clichE9d conclusion, featuring a fist =
fight in some random steam-filled factory setting, complete with 
slippery guns and supposedly dead characters resurrecting themselves 
with impeccable timing, and proclaim "Gone in Sixty Seconds" to be a 
Very Bad Movie.
But if I did that, I'd be a hypocrite, because I liked this movie more 
than I'd care to admit. No, it's not the least bit original, and yes, it 
is very, very dumb. What I like about "Gone in Sixty Seconds," however, 
is that it never appears to be taking itself terribly seriously. It's 
considerably less pompous than Bruckheimer's last few films, and I enjoy 
trash that knows it's trash a hell of a lot more than trash that 
continually strives to convince you of its seriousness (like, say, 
"Mission: Impossible 2"). I'll take fun, shameless entertainment over 
tedious pretension any day.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai (1999)
"Ghost Dog: The Way of the Samurai" is the kind of film that, despite
being written and directed by "arty" Jim Jarmusch, will be prematurely
dismissed by many as a superficial, testosterone-driven movie about
gangsta rappers with delusions of being samurai warriors -- a
glorified Wu-Tang album, so to speak. Containing music credited to
Wu-Tang producer RZA certainly doesn't help the film do away with that
sentiment. But such dismissals are unfair, because "Ghost Dog" has a
lot more substance to it than the trailers might have you
believe. It's a film that can be enjoyed on more than one level.  Upon
first glance, this is the adolescent fantasy of behaving like a
samurai in modern-day New York City. Upon deeper inspection, however,
there is a message here about adherence to tradition and adjustment to
change. Some viewers will see this, and some won't, just like the
characters in the film.
Forest Whitaker plays Ghost Dog, a large black man who lives in a
shack on a rooftop, raises pigeons, and studies the Way of the
Samurai. By night, he performs contract killings for an Italian
mobster named Louie (John Tormey).  We learn that Ghost Dog does this
because as a young man, he was saved by Louie from a pair of
ruffians. According to the samurai code, he must now take on the job
of Louie's "retainer," protecting him and obeying his commands. But a
problem occurs when Ghost Dog accidentally performs a killing in front
of the daughter of Louie's boss. The boss (Henry Silva) wants Ghost
Dog snuffed out. Louie explains that it won't be terribly easy,
because the assassin only communicates with him via carrier pigeon,
and he doesn't know exactly where he lives. The boss gives Louie a
choice: Ghost Dog's life, or his. For the sake of protecting his
master, Ghost Dog now must put his own life on the line.
There will probably be a large contingency of young males who consider
"Ghost Dog" a "cool" movie. And there is plenty of cool stuff going on
here: There are the ostensible and operatic fight scenes involving
lots of gunplay and slow-motion action. There is the hip-hop score
done by Wu-Tang's RZA, which is surprisingly not a *soundtrack*
(frequently a collection of songs thrown together to sell albums), but
is most definitely a film *score*, one written specifically to enhance
the movie it was written for. RZA does inspired, eclectic work here,
evoking various moods appropriate to particular scenes. The film is
also frequently funny, especially in a scene where Louie must explain
to his boss exactly who Ghost Dog is while the incredulous mobsters
look on. Despite its slow pacing and occasional inscrutability, "Ghost
Dog" has a good gangster movie plot and can most definitely be enjoyed
as a trivial popcorn flick.
There is, however, more going on in "Ghost Dog" than you'll see in
most popcorn flicks: It contains themes to be pondered. Director
Jarmusch firstly dives into the theme of displacement; he takes
ancient Japanese values and places them into a contemporary Western
setting. Whitaker, for his part, gives himself over to the material
thoroughly, every second presenting Ghost Dog as a man who staunchly
believes in his philosophy. He has nary a line of dialogue for the
first fifteen minutes of the film, and even afterwards his lines are
scarce, but Whitaker manages to deliver some inspired physical acting
to get his point across: His face will tell you everything, and he
moves uncannily well for a large man. The actor's conviction further
enforces the idea that Ghost Dog is a man who is out of place and
time, which helps bolster Jarmusch's vision. The director is
interested in how well such a man would handle modern-day values and
customs. The answer to Jarmusch's question is up for discussion.
Jarmusch starts his musing on the subject by contrasting Ghost Dog's
ways with that of his adversaries. The mobsters are portrayed as
bumbling fools who watch cartoons and stumble their way through
killings. There is a very good reason for this: All of them are at
least 50 years old. As presented by Jarmusch, the mobsters are past
their prime, a once-noble group that has lost its way and has failed
to attract any fresh blood. Ghost Dog, on the other hand, follows his
code very closely. He kills no one unnecessarily, and he lives in
constant obedience to his master. The mobsters don't remember their
code; they've begun killing people without verifying their identities,
and they've lost respect for the traditions they once held dear.
They've gotten sloppy. This is why, during a confrontation, Ghost Dog
is able to effortlessly move through their lair: He is moving with
graceful and controlled movement while the mobsters, caught entirely
off-guard, fall one by one. Ghost Dog remembers his tradition, and has
applied it to modern technology (he holds a large collection of modern
weaponry, much of it state-of-the-art).
There is also an interesting theme brought up about the supposed lack
of communication between seemingly disparate people. Ghost Dog's best
friend is a Jamaican ice cream seller who speaks only French. But
despite the language barrier (Ghost Dog only speaks English), the two
somehow manage to speak to each other, frequently not realizing each
of them has said exactly the same thing. The mobsters likewise fail to
see just how similar their ways are to those of the samurai,
inner-city blacks, and Native Americans. ( An amusing moment comes
when one of the head mobsters reveals himself to be a closet Public
Enemy fan.) All of the groups refer to each other by nicknames, and
all of them hold very strong familial bonds. The mobsters don't
perceive these similarities, going on about how different they are
from "niggers" and "Indians." Jarmusch seems to imply that the ways of
both Ghost Dog and the mobsters will only succeed if the followers
rediscover their roots, their tradition, and continually reapply it to
an ever-changing world. It is also suggested that a girl Ghost Dog has
befriended may carry on the tradition in just such a manner.
I suppose much of what I've talked about in this review makes "Ghost
Dog: The Way of the Samurai" sound like a boring, impenetrable art
house film. It 's not. Yes, it does have some "deep" messages to
deliver, but "Ghost Dog" is also very entertaining. Nor is it a
perfect film: The conclusion is drawn out far too long and some of the
excerpts from the book Ghost Dog reads don' t make much sense at
all. And sometimes they make perfect sense. "Ghost Dog" is maddening
in that way, but fortunately, it's usually a good kind of
maddening. Sometimes the films that are the most flawed also have the
most to offer.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Detroit Rock City (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring Edward Furlong, Giuseppe Andrews, James DeBello, Sam Huntington,
Lin Shaye, Natasha Lyonne, Melanie Lynskey, Shannon Tweed, KISS (Gene
Simmons, Paul Stanley, Ace Frehley, Peter Criss).
Written by Carl V. Dupré.
Directed by Adam Rifkin.
Rated R.
One of the responses those that enjoy "Detroit Rock City" (probably KISS
fans, mostly) might have upon first glance at the rating I've given the film
might be something like: "Oh, that Casey's gone and become a jaded critic on
us. Just what did he expect out of a dumb teenage rock n' roll movie like
this?" I'm wondering the same thing. I feel like I should have had a grand
time with "Detroit Rock City." It's the sort of movie I wish I could've had
a lot of fun with, but I didn't. I just didn't. Surely this film isn't
trying to win any major awards, so should I have expected an Oscar-caliber
film? No, but I expected something. A funny joke. A clever prank. A plot
development. Anything. The movie never delivers. You've got to marvel at how
the filmmakers managed to come up with a movie that is truly about nothing.
"Detroit Rock City" is one of those films that you walk out of after the
credits have rolled and realize that you just spent 90 minutes watching a
movie in which absolutely nothing happened to justify the film's existence,
and it's not a very satisfying realization.
The film is about four teenage boys, all huge KISS fans from Cleveland,
trying to get into a KISS concert in Detroit, Michigan. That's it. There is
no big plot description in this review, because the movie has very little
plot. The characters are Hawk (Edward Furlong), Lex (Giuseppe Andrews), Trip
(James DeBello), and Jam (Sam Huntington). They have a garage band. They're
pathetic, like all garage bands, but they like KISS and they like rock n'
roll, so I guess that means we root for them. They have tickets, they lose
them. They get more tickets, they lose those too. They come up with crazy
schemes to get tickets, most of which backfire. There's not much more to it.
Frankly, it becomes a little less than exciting to see them try to get KISS
tickets about halfway through the film, when a total of eight tickets have
already graced the boys' hands, only to be lost because of their sheer
stupidity. Oh, and Jam (real name Jeremiah) has a really, really annoying
ultra-religious mother who ought to be reported to the Child Welfare Agency.
She doesn't want them to see KISS, if you hadn't figured that out already.
It's really quite disheartening to see such a fine soundtrack go to waste in
a pointless movie like this. We've got plenty of KISS, along with some
AC/DC, Ramones, and Thin Lizzy. Then again, "Maximum Overdrive" had an
awesome soundtrack (me being the big AC/DC fan that I am), but is probably
one of the worst movies of all time. "Detroit Rock City" doesn't quite reach
that level of ineptitude, but it gets dangerously close. In fact, the music
is the only thing that keeps this movie from being a complete failure in my
mind. Basically, the soundtrack has earned the film a full half-star, which
means all the bands involved can pat themselves on the back (except for
Marilyn Manson, whose half-hearted cover of AC/DC's "Highway to Hell" sounds
like something my neighbor's cat coughed up).
It's also really sad to see the talents of the cast go to waste, because it'
s evident that they're all trying really hard to squeeze some life out of
this dead turkey of a movie. Edward Furlong has done far better work than
this, and so has Natasha Lyonne, and so has Lin Shaye, but hey, they've got
to make a living in Hollywood. People wanting to see KISS, and lots of it
will probably be disappointed, considering the band appears for about five
minutes and plays one song. Too bad, they might have provided some energy to
this mess. Director Adam Rifkin knows he hasn't got much material to work
with, so he takes a chapter from the Michael Bay book of directing and keeps
his camera spinning. We get an endless parade of quick-cuts, split-screens,
zoom-outs, zoom-ins, and rotating cameras, all in an effort to cover up the
sheer stupidity of the script. It's fun for a while, but eventually it
becomes disorienting. I would recommend that those who felt seasick at "The
Blair Witch Project" stay far away from "Detroit Rock City," because the
Witch has got nothing on this baby. I haven't felt such an urge to reach out
and hold the camera still since "Armageddon."
And what about that script? It's written by Carl J. Dupré, which sounds like
as made-up a name as I've ever heard. If it is, I can't say I blame the
writer for distancing himself as far from this script as possible. A
plotless, pointless rock n' roll movie can be fun, if the jokes and gags are
actually funny. The jokes in "Detroit Rock City" rarely are. In fact, the
only time I really laughed was when a priest gets stoned on a
marijuana-laced pizza, and that was just because it was so surreal. The rest
of the movie just seems like they just threw a bunch of vulgar stuff up on
screen and called it "comedy." There is no set-up, just a succession of
punchlines that don't provide for much in the way of chuckles, precisely
because there was no set-up. It's as if they just whacked someone on the
head, pointed at him and said, "See? Funny!" Look, that woman was so shocked
by hearing loud KISS music that she spilled her drink. See? Funny! Look,
that guy just got clocked by a telephone receiver. Twice. See? Funny! Look,
that kid has been vomiting for 20 minutes after drinking an inordinate
amount of alcohol and is now about to perform an exotic dance for money.
See? Funny! A word of advice to Mr. Dupré: No, these things aren't funny all
by themselves. They must be preceded by a clever set-up so the audience hasn
't predicted them five minutes in advance.
That's it, I've said enough about this movie. It's a waste of time and
money. I liked the music, but don't bother buying the soundtrack. I hear it'
s just modern bands doing inferior versions of the songs that are actually
in the movie. You want to see this concept executed well? Go rent Roger
Corman's 1979 classic "Rock N' Roll High School." It features another
late-seventies rock band (The Ramones) and a far more interesting story
about a girl trying to get tickets to their show. Yes, go rent that, and
skip "Detroit Rock City," which will probably bomb, and deservedly so.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring the voices of Julia Sawalha, Mel Gibson, Miranda
Richardson, Jane Horrocks, Imelda Staunton, Tony Haygarth, Benjamin
Whitrow. Written by Peter Lord & Nick Park (story) and Karey Kirkpatrick
(screenplay). Directed by Peter Lord and Nick Park. Rated G.
I know that "funnest" isn't a word. "Fun" is a noun, and therefore
cannot be conjugated like an adjective. But that's the word that
came to me right after viewing "Chicken Run." No wonder: This is the kind
of movie that reduces you to childish expressions, like "That was the
funnest movie I've ever seen!" So to hell with Webster's --
"Chicken Run" is one of the funnest movies I've seen in a while. I
can't remember the last time I've seen anything funner.
The chickens at Tweedy's Farm are up to something. Living in a
concentration camp-like atmosphere, they are led by one plucky hen called
Ginger (voice of Julia Sawalha) who continually comes up with plans for
escape -- and always gets caught, subsequently spending day after day in
the coal box. One night, a brash American rooster flies in over the
fence, calling himself Rocky (Mel Gibson), famous flying rooster and
circus performer. Rocky promises to teach the chickens how to fly, and
the situation grows more desperate as the nefarious Mrs. Tweedy (Miranda
Richardson) decides to abandon the farm's egg-selling plan for a
pie-selling plan. She orders a huge pie-making machine, cackling,
"Chickens go in; pies come out." What sort of pies? Chicken pies, of
course.
Co-director Nick Park and his studio, Aardman Animation, produced three
Oscar-winning short films: "Creature Comforts," "The Wrong Trousers," and
"A Close Shave." The latter two were the second and third installments of
a trilogy starring the delightful team Wallace & Gromit, a man and his
dog famous for getting themselves into increasingly peculiar adventures.
Part of what made the "Wallace" films brilliantly entertaining was
Park's uncanny ability to make an old story seem new. "The Wrong
Trousers," for example, pulled out a lot of old Hitchcockian suspense
tricks, and "A Close Shave" owed a great deal of inspiration to classic
detective stories. But in the hands of Park and his team, the stories
felt fresh and inspired, and not the least bit contrived.
Now teaming with co-director Peter Lord, Park has created a similar
creature in "Chicken Run." The plot is largely lifted from "The Great
Escape" (watch for a quick reference to the ball-bouncing scene), with
some Spielberg-inspired action sequences providing the excitement. Thing
is, the film doesn't feel like it's been lifted from
somewhere else; "Chicken Run" feels fresh, alive, like nothing else ever
done. Part of it is the original idea: Who in the world came up with the
idea to make a prisoners-of-war movie starring chickens? Park and Lord
milk the incongruity for all it's worth: The characters treat their
situation as if it were dead serious, and to them, it is. But
they're *chickens*, so it's funny to us.
Another thing that helps "Chicken Run" (and most of Park's films)
succeed is the animators' subtle way of giving nods to the very
films they're cribbing. There are references to "The Great Escape,"
obviously, and "Stalag 17." The chase sequence inside the chicken grinder
parodies both "Raiders of the Lost Ark" and "Indiana Jones and the Temple
of Doom." There's even a nod to "The Blues Brothers," if you can
believe it, and the filmmakers even get in a little light-hearted ribbing
at the expense of their star voice actor, taking a couple of very subtle
jabs at Mel Gibson's nationality and film history. The "Braveheart"
reference is a hoot if you catch it.
When you consider just how fine a line resides between a funny parody and
a redundant one, "Chicken Run" is downright brilliant in its execution.
Consider this: Since July of last year, I've seen dozens upon
dozens of "Blair Witch Project" parodies, on television, on the radio,
and online. Out of all those, maybe one or two were amusing, the rest
tiresome. Why? Because once you got past the thought that "they're
parodying that‘ Blair Witch' movie," most of the parodies had
nothing to offer -- no insight, no original idea, no greater purpose.
They were only funny if you had seen the movie; otherwise, you got
nothing. Conversely, "Chicken Run" doesn't lean on its parodies --
the film references are never the sole focus of any scene. If
you've never seen "Indiana Jones," the chase sequence is still fun.
Even if you have no idea who Mel Gibson is, Rocky remains an interesting
character. Park, Lord, and screenwriter Karey Kirkpatrick realize that an
audience does not need a parody shoved in their faces before it's
understood, and as a result, "Chicken Run" is filled with visual and
verbal jabs that are never too obvious, but not quite vague either.
Enjoyment of this movie doesn't require knowledge of film history,
but if you've got it, "Chicken Run" is that much richer.
The voice cast turns in uniformly lively performances, and the characters
they play are given so many subtle nuances that it's hard not to
fall in love with every one of them. Ginger is perfect, spunky and
opinionated, but with a soft heart that forbids her to leave her
companions behind, and Julia Sawalha (known as the cute mousy girl on
"Absolutely Fabulous") nails it. She has warm, human chemistry with
Gibson, whose Rocky hides his personal doubt under a brash gung-ho
veneer. The characters' inevitable romance doesn't feel
contrived, but sweet. Poor Mr. Tweedy (Tony Haygarth) suspects the
chickens are organizing in some way, but his limited intellect prevents
him from figuring things out, and his overbearing wife certainly
isn't any help. Jane Horrocks delivers a lovely voice
characterization as tragically optimistic Babs (a hen that runs away with
most of the best one-liners, all while perpetually crocheting a sweater),
and two supply-trading rats that seem to have walked straight out of a
Monty Python sketch nearly steal the show during the lively central
swing-dancing sequence. They even come up with an inspired riff on
something that's baffled scholars and theologians alike for
decades: the chicken vs. egg dilemma. One might have expected this
inevitable joke to come off as wearisome, but as with most of "Chicken
Run," it comes as a delightful surprise.
The film manages to cross all barriers; it should be accessible to both
children and adults, Brits and Yanks, rats and chickens. The animation is
first-rate. Remember that this was all done the old-fashioned way, with
actual humans moving clay figurines around on a tiny set bit by
painstaking bit, and you see just how truly remarkable "Chicken Run"
really is. This movie possesses that same quality that makes Pixar
Studios' animation great: precise and unwavering attention to
detail. As in such top-notch family fare as "A Bug's Life" or "Toy
Story 2," "Chicken Run" has something to offer in nearly every frame.
Certainly a passive viewer can enjoy it as a straightforward story with a
worthwhile moral and some surprisingly touching scenes, but a active,
attentive viewers will enjoy it even more because they'll catch all
the details.
Anyway, the movie's just a boatload of fun. Funnest damn movie
I've seen all year.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring the voices of D.B. Sweeney, Julianna Margulies, 
Joan Plowright, Ossie Davis, Max Casella, Alfre Woodard, Samuel E. 
Wright, Peter Siragusa, Della Reese. Story by Thom Enriquez, John 
Harrison, Robert Nelson Jacobs, Ralph Zondag. Screenplay by Walon Green 
(original), John Harrison, and Robert Nelson Jacobs. Directed by Eric 
Leighton and Ralph Zondag. Rated PG.
"Dinosaur" is a great technical accomplishment. It's one of the 
best-looking movies I've ever seen. Every prehistoric creature is 
rendered in astonishingly convincing fashion, the backgrounds are lush 
and detailed (sometimes real-life locations into which the animated 
characters are placed), and the whole thing filled with crisp, colorful 
visuals. The first 15 minutes feature a breathtaking sequence in which a 
mother Iguanadon nests her eggs, only to lose them when a giant predator 
attacks. The egg is picked up by a Pterodactyl and deposited on a nearby 
island. All of "Dinosaur's" brilliance as a sensory experience is on 
display during this opening sequence. Then all potential for an 
original, innovative work gets tossed out the window when a little 
lemur-like creature opens its mouth and starts talking, in English, to 
its little lemur children, who also speak in English. Oh well.
It would be more honest, however, to say that the primary failure of 
"Dinosaur" is not, as some critics have suggested, that the dinosaurs 
talk. Nor is it that the film's plot is formulaic, though such an 
observation would certainly be true: The plot deals with an orphaned 
dinosaur named Aladar (voice of D.B. Sweeney), who is raised in the care 
of small mammals on a solitary island. A firestorm destroys Aladar's 
home, and after he and his adoptive lemur family narrowly escape the 
ordeal, they are forced to hook up with a group of migrating dinosaurs 
searching for the fabled "mating grounds," presumably an oasis in the 
hostile terrain. The dinosaurs are lead by Kron (Samuel E. Wright), a 
gruff Darwinist bent on following the "survival of the fittest" mantra 
to the death: He leaves all old or injured animals to fare for 
themselves, pushing only the able-bodied ones endlessly onward. Aladar, 
already having rubbed Kron the wrong way by sticking up for some older 
dinosaurs, runs afoul of the troop's gruff leader even more by taking a 
liking to his younger sister Neera (Julianna Margulies).
Sounds like many a Disney plot, doesn't it? In fact, the setup of the 
outcast looking for acceptance from his peers sounds alarmingly similar 
to that of "Tarzan," Disney's last animated feature. But previous Disney 
films have been enjoyable despite their predictability, so complaints 
about a formulaic plot seem somewhat wrong-headed. Likewise complaints 
about talking animals don't really get to the heart of "Dinosaur's" 
problem. The enjoyability of a Disney film stems not from its daring, 
ground-breaking originality, but from the "little things." You enjoy 
them because they tell a recognizable story in pleasing fashion, with 
amusing elements to spice up the proceedings. They have catchy songs 
("Beauty and the Beast", "The Little Mermaid"), exuberant voice work 
(Robin Williams in "Aladdin", James Woods in "Hercules"), or 
breathtaking action sequences ("The Lion King", "Tarzan"). "Dinosaur," 
unfortunately, is severely lacking in the little things. There are no 
catchy songs (not necessarily a bad thing, as the quality of songwriting 
had gradually declined as the years passed -- the songs in "Mulan" 
weren't memorable at all). None of the celebrity voices provide much 
distinction: You don't say, "Omigod! Julianna Margulies did such 
wonderful voice work!" You say, "Oh! That was Julianna Margulies?" The 
characters just come off as old Disney archetypes thrown into reptilian 
forms, and none of the humor is fresh or witty, unless one finds the 
term "jerkasaurus" absolutely hilarious. Some of the action sequences 
are exciting: A battle sequence between Aladar and some Carnataurs (a 
species invented for the film for reasons I've yet to discover) in a 
cave provides some excitement, and the aforementioned opening egg 
journey is quite breathtaking. But none of the scenes come as a natural 
continuation of what's occurred before them, and as a result, the story 
simply doesn't flow.
And that's the other big problem with "Dinosaur": It's okay in bits, but 
it doesn't cohere, doesn't involve the viewer. Most discoveries come out 
of nowhere. There is no catharsis when Aladar inevitably takes his place 
at the head of the herd, or when the nesting grounds are found. There is 
no urgency to the story. The herd marches towards something that they 
want to find tomorrow, but it doesn't make much difference if they don't 
find it until next week. Character arc is zero: The principle characters 
-- Aladar, Neera, Kron, and the lemurs -- don't much change at all from 
beginning to end. But the film's worst sin, again, is its complete and 
utter lack of flow. "Dinosaur's" structure is a strict cut-and-paste 
job, with pieces borrowed from earlier Disney films that worked their 
formulas to more pleasing effect.
So the story has no punch, the characters are bland, and the film 
contains almost no lively musical numbers, witty comic relief, or 
standout vocal characterization. What then can the audience enjoy but 
the visuals? And, to be fair, "Dinosaur" almost gets by solely on those 
merits. It's easy to conceive someone liking the film as nothing more 
than a sheer sensory experience (as I almost did). As a technical 
achievement, "Dinosaur" is stunning. As a movie, it's dull. For all its 
impressive wizardry, Disney's latest effort mostly comes off as a 
visually spectacular lesson in how not to tell a story.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Magnolia (1999)
Year: 1999
Starring Tom Cruise, John C. Reilly, Jason Robards, Philip Baker Hall,
Melora Walters, Julianne Moore, William H. Macy, Philip Seymour Hoffman,
Jeremy Blackman, Melinda Dillon
Written by Paul Thomas Anderson
Directed by Paul Thomas Anderson
Rated R
"Magnolia" is the strangest kind of masterpiece, one that's both frustrating
and enthralling at the same time. Is it confusing? Almost certainly. But
there's a reason. "Magnolia" is the kind of film that wants to challenge
you, that assumes that you, the viewer, do indeed have a brain, and you do
know how to use it. Paul Thomas Anderson's film is not one to lay everything
out neatly for you. It's for this reason that "Magnolia" is consistently
maddening, but where that is usually a criticism, here it's oh so right.
Why? Because the film dares to surprise, to keep pulling the rug out from
under us. It is certainly not your typical film, and as such, it's not for
everyone. But to those who enjoy a challenging film open to more than one
interpretation, "Magnolia" is a dazzling experience. You don't see films as
ambitious and audacious as this one come along too often.
This film interlocks the stories of several apparently disparate characters
in the San Fernando Valley. First we have dying TV mogul Earl Partridge
(Jason Robards), who wastes away under the care of his gold-digging wife
Linda (Julianne Moore) and hired nurse Phil (Philip Seymour Hoffman). We are
introduced to a children's game show called "What Do Kids Know?" hosted by
veteran TV man Jimmy Gator (Philip Baker Hall), who like Earl, is dying of
cancer. The current "whiz kid" on the show is Stanley Spector (Jeremy
Blackman), a young man pushed to succeed by his overbearing father. The
former whiz kid was Donnie Smith (William H. Macy), now a grown man whose
life is in a shambles. He loses his job and considers resorting to a life of
crime. Gator's daughter is cocaine-addicted Claudia (Melora Walters), who
finds herself attracted to Jim Kurring (John C. Reilly), a seemingly stable
beat cop. Earl's long-lost son turns out to be misogynist speaker Frank T.J.
Mackey (Tom Cruise), who teaches men how to better disrespect women because,
in his view, they don't respect men. The stories twist in and out of one
another in more ways than I could possibly explain here, but let's just say
many of them are rather unpredictable.
The most noticeable strong point of "Magnolia" is the bravura acting engaged
in by the entire cast. Your personal opinion of which performance is the
best may depend mostly on what you thought of the characters they played,
but there really aren't any weak links here. Everyone pulls his or her
weight. My personal favorite was John C. Reilly, whose cop balances a
fatherly impulse with deeper insecurities masterfully. As such, his
unconventional romance with the drug-addicted Walters seems positively
touching. His impulse is not to act as a policeman and bust her for
narcotics possession, but to help her escape the problem. Tom Cruise is
extremely well-cast as the self-important motivational speaker. His
breakdown to a female reporter during an interview is astoundingly
deliberate, with the reporter methodically wearing down Frank's false
bravado by pulling out revelations from his past. The only point where
Cruise really stumbles is in his final big scene, when he's forced to cry on
Robards' deathbed, and he displays that he hasn't quite got the acting chops
to pull it off. After excelling at playing freaks and weirdos, Hoffman
finally gets to play a more well-adjusted human being and does it very
convincingly. Macy does his usual chameleon job into the former quiz kid who
wants braces because he thinks they'll make him more attractive to his
favorite bartender. Moore has what's probably the most underwritten part,
but beefs it up with sheer force of talent. Her character is one-note, but
her performance is quite accessible. The veterans-Robards and Hall-inhabit
decaying forms with ease, with Hall's on-air breakdown being on of the more
fascinating scenes in the film. There are several I haven't mentioned, but
rest assured, they did fine work. No weak links.
After his critically-lauded hit "Boogie Nights," Paul Thomas Anderson seems
to have been given the freedom to follow his own vision, and "Magnolia" is
it. Anderson's vision is sprawling and confused, excitingly and wonderfully
so. The major stylistic point of interest is Anderson's decision to throw
standard three-act film structure out the window in favor of a more
musically-oriented construction. An article in "Entertainment Weekly" quoted
the director as saying that he drew greatly from The Beatles' "A Day in the
Life" for his film's structure. Such influence is evident in the way
"Magnolia" climaxes twice, each being preceded by a long and deliberate
buildup. The first climax occurs around the middle of the film, when many of
the major characters experience a certain public or private deflowering.
Gator collapses on his game show. Stanley has an on-air "accident." Frank is
exposed in an interview. And so on. Any old film might have then rushed to a
conclusion, but "Magnolia" is not any old film. Instead of a resolution, we
get a drop-off, and the tension starts building again. (With regards to the
Beatles reference, this is where Paul McCartney starts singing "Woke up, got
out of bed, dragged the comb across my head.") Then it climaxes again in a
wondrously bizarre scene that will have audiences talking for weeks. To
reveal it would be a crime, but it does serve a purpose other than to shock.
It ties together the film's themes in one fell swoop.
It's necessary because the themes present in "Magnolia" are not up front for
all to see. They can be seen in the subtle Biblical references (Exodus 8:2
is everywhere, but you have to look closely), in the vague connections
between characters, and in the film's clever opening sequence. "Magnolia"
starts with a narrator (Ricky Jay) relating three supposedly true stories of
chance occurrences. Coincidence and happenstance are recurring themes
throughout the film, with the final climax being the mother of all chance
occurrences. The most important thing to remember about "Magnolia's"
surprise finish is that it is not randomly inserted to test the audience's
reflexes. Jay narrates that these chance occurrences do not happen randomly;
they happen for a reason. The final scene seems to help certain characters
meet their destiny, to get other characters to meet when they might not have
otherwise. It also relates to another major recurring theme: family dynamics
and father-son relationships in particular. It seems a warning to many of
the film's characters not to repeat the sins of the past. Will the message
connect? That is left for us to decide.
It would be pointless to list all of Anderson's technical brilliance,
because it is all there, just like we saw in "Boogie Nights." He ties images
and music together seamlessly (with a nice assist from Aimee Mann), he is
remarkably able to intercut scenes together without losing coherence, and
his film manages to remain consistently interesting, despite the three hour
running time. But the most impressive aspect of "Magnolia" is how complex
Anderson's vision is. Is it perfect? That's kind of hard to decide. As is
often the case with films that tell many interconnecting narratives all at
once, different audience members are sure to find some characters intriguing
and others annoying, but which characters those are stems mostly from
personal preference than anything else. What we have here is a film whose
conviction manages to overshadow its flaws (I was mildly annoyed by Robards'
deathbed soliloquy and Moore's one-note drug addict), and one whose themes
are varied and challenging. If someone were to ask me just what was the
point of "Magnolia," I would reply that there isn't one. There are many.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring Tobey Maguire, Charlize Theron, Michael Caine, Delroy Lindo, 
Paul Rudd, Jane Alexander, Kathy Baker, Erykah Badu, Kieran Culkin, Kate
Nelligan, Heavy D.
Screenplay by John Irving.
Directed by Lasse HallstrF6m.
Rated PG-13.
If any lessons can be derived from "The Cider House Rules," one is
that a film can be damaged by trying too hard for Oscar
nominations. The other is that the Academy of Motion Picture Arts &
Sciences are a bunch of suckers.  It's not hard to see how this
average film was able to fool the Academy into handing it no less than
seven nominations: "The Cider House Rules" is a slow, quiet,
historical film that contains abortion, a "controversial" topic, as a
major theme. It possesses all the aspects of an Important Film and
constantly pushes on you the idea that it is a supremely Important
movie. That, of course, is precisely the problem with "The Cider House
Rules." Not one moment goes by without the film informing us on how
much we should all marvel at just how Important what we are watching
really is.  Too bad "The Cider House Rules," despite being a
relentlessly Important film, has neither the narrative flow nor the
thematic substance to qualify as truly Important. It's mostly
well-made and good-looking, and it's also mostly empty.
Homer Wells (Tobey Maguire) is an orphan nobody was able to
permanently adopt. Brought up at the St. Cloud's Orphanage in a small
Maine town, Homer is told by his keeper, the kindly Dr. Wilbur Larch
(Michael Caine), that if he's going to stay there, he ought to "be of
use." So Dr. Larch teaches Homer the skills of a doctor: learning to
deliver babies and care for and comfort the mothers. Homer, however,
refuses to take on one of Dr.  Larch's duties -- performing
abortions. Dr. Larch has no qualms about it; he performs them because
he doesn't want back-alley abortionists killing pregnant women, but
Homer refuses on the grounds that abortions are illegal (or were, in
the late 1930's). When Homer grows older, he longs to see the world
beyond the orphanage, and his chance comes when an air force pilot
named Wally (Paul Rudd) and his girlfriend Candy (Charlize Theron)
come in for an abortion. Homer asks to leave with them over
Dr. Lester's objections, and Wally agrees to take him. Homer then
proceeds to get a job on Wally's family's apple farm, where he meets
the head of the apple pickers, a large black man called Mr. Rose
(Delroy Lindo) and his daughter Rose (Erykah Badu), and also strikes
up a romantic relationship with Candy after her boyfriend once again
departs for war. Thrown out into the real world, Homer learns that
issues of morality are perhaps not quite so clear-cut as he thought
they were.
There are things to like about "The Cider House Rules." The actors,
for example: Maguire has an almost uncanny leading-man presence about
him, in that he doesn't immediately grab a viewer or even do much of
anything to garner attention, but it's somehow difficult to ignore
him. His understated calm and thoughtful eyes are well-suited to the
character of Homer, who must work out difficult moral issues without
breaking an externally tranquil demeanor. Charlize Theron is fine as
his love interest; with an actress like her, it's not hard to see why
Homer takes a liking to Candy. The interplay between the two, with
Candy aloofly refusing to make a decision while Homer presses her for
one, is one of the most interesting aspects of the film.  Michael
Caine and Delroy Lindo give powerful turns as two of Homer's father
figures, both noble but flawed men. Caine's New Englander accent is
for the most part believable, though he tends to stress his R's a bit
too much (a common problem for British actors playing
American). Singer Erykah Badu is remarkably unglamorous and
surprisingly touching in a pivotal role.
John Irving adapted his own novel in writing the screenplay for "The
Cider House Rules," so it's not hard to figure out why the film feels
as if it's been gloriously over-stuffed. This being an Important Film
written by an author who apparently couldn't bear to let one bit of
his book be left out, we get one of the worst examples of
"kitchen-sink" filmmaking this side of Oliver Stone (Lasse
HallstrF6m's relatively restrained direction notwithstanding). Irving
seemingly isn't content to merely deal with the supremely thorny issue
of abortion; we must also get, in order, orphans, dying children,
dying mothers, drug addiction, adultery, incest, and suicide. When the
film finally pulled out (I kid you not) a crippled war veteran,
Irving's emotional manipulation had reached its nadir. Playing with an
audience's emotions is one thing, but does it have to be drummed in
with a sledgehammer? I was with the film through many of its jumps
through sentimental hoops, but by the final reel, it had lost me. Plot
developments that could have been affecting were now merely grating,
not to mention convenient.
Furthermore, for all the film's posturing about being a frank and open
debate about abortion, the subject is given no more than a superficial
gloss-over by Irving. It does deliver a fairly strong argument in
favor of legalizing abortion (or keeping it legal in the contemporary
sense): Dr.  Larch clearly explains his position, that he performs
abortions so they will be done properly and in a sanitary
environment. That's fine, but Homer's great "objection" to the
practice is little more than a peep about it being illegal, and Irving
eventually negates that argument by introducing the idea of making
one's own decisions, regardless of what the law may dictate (as in the
rules posted in the cider house, which are routinely broken by the
farm workers). Where is the counter-argument, the one pro-lifers
consistently spout about protecting life? The film is most definitely
not an even-handed treatment of the subject, but rather an obvious
pro-choice diatribe.  This critic isn't even a pro-life advocate; I
actually tend to fall in the pro-choice camp, but I also recognize
that an argument is made stronger by acknowledging the opposing
viewpoint. "The Cider House Rules" barely does, and Homer's eventual
decision to perform an abortion in the case of incest (which he never
had a problem with anyway) doesn't force him or the film to take a
definite stand on the issue one way or the other. This is a perfectly,
infuriatingly safe way to deal with an issue, and one as controversial
as abortion deserved better.
Irving's screenplay is a perfect example of why keeping film
adaptations faithful to their source material is not necessarily a
good idea.  Several things here almost certainly worked better on
paper than on screen, such as the double-pronged storytelling that
keeps frustratingly cutting back to the orphanage when we ought to be
caught up in Homer's travels. "The Cider House Rules" isn't a bad film
-- it's far too crisply-made and nicely-acted for that. Toss in some
beautiful New England scenery and economic direction, and you're
pretty much assured that it will at least be a pleasing trip. But
those looking for something a little more substantial will be
disappointed, and certainly we ought to expect more out of our Best
Picture nominees.  Sadly, "The Cider House Rules" isn't quite the
Important Film it wants to be. There is no narrative or thematic
consistency to it; the film never takes a definite course. As a
picture that deals with some morally thorny issues, this one stays
relentlessly safe, and irritatingly aloof from its subject matter,
which all adds up to a great deal of emptiness when the end credits
roll: We realize that "The Cider House Rules" was a good-looking,
well-acted film about nothing in particular.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Bringing Out the Dead (1999)
If there's something Martin Scorsese can always be credited for, it's
getting whatever his subject is portrayed correctly on screen. "GoodFellas"
is considered by many to be the most accurate Mafia film ever made. "Raging
Bull" got inside a boxing ring with striking realism. His 1997 film,
"Kundun," was a meticulously crafted biography of the Dalai Lama. In his
latest film, "Bringing Out the Dead," Scorsese is clearly going for a
somewhat realistic depiction of the life of a New York City paramedic.
Frankly, never having been a paramedic, I don't really know how good it was,
but it was realistic enough for me. Unfortunately, "Bringing Out the Dead"
isn't quite up to par with other Scorsese works. It's mediocre Marty, which
basically means that while it's not the best he can do, it's well above
average when compared to everything else.
Nicolas Cage stars as Frank Pierce, a paramedic who works the night shift in
New York's Hell's Kitchen. Frank hasn't been sleeping well. He hasn't saved
anyone for months, and he is constantly haunted by the spirit of a dead
girl, the one that kicked off his "losing streak." The film opens has Frank
and his partner, Larry (John Goodman), take a call for an old man suffering
from a heart attack in his apartment. The old man seems to be a lost cause,
but shows a faint heartbeat at the last minute. This sudden hopeful case
causes Frank to become enamored of the old man's daughter Mary (Patricia
Arquette), despite his colleagues' warnings not to get involved with
patients. The rest of the film shows three nights Frank spends on the job,
with a new partner on each of the following two nights. Marcus (Ving
Rhames), the second partner, is a religious man who takes each assignment as
an opportunity to turn his patients into believers, while Tom (Tom
Sizemore), the third partner, is a sadistic fellow who enjoys his job only
for the chance it affords him to see blood. Frank, meanwhile, spends each
day looking for some kind of redemption for his previous failure.
If the previous paragraph doesn't sound like much of a plot summary, that's
probably because "Bringing Out the Dead" doesn't have much of a plot to
speak of. That's not necessarily a detriment, mind you. This is clearly a
character-driven flick, concentrating on three days in the life of Frank
Pierce. Scorsese provides plenty of his trademark visual flair, which keeps
the proceedings continually interesting, even while the story slows down. We
see New York City as only Martin Scorsese could film it, with the worst kind
of scum imaginable, and Scorsese films them from all angles, in all shades
of color. It's a kind of acid trip, only legal. Like most of this director's
films, this one is always strangely engrossing, the kind of film you can't
take your eyes off of, even if you don't know why.
Nicolas Cage seems a little too restrained in his role, one that he probably
should have cut loose in. He seems to spend an awful lot of time staring up
into the camera and looking a little too disinterested. Maybe he's been
ruined by appearing in one too many brainless action movies that didn't
exactly demand much from him as a thespian. I really shouldn't knock Cage,
though. This is definitely his best performance since "Leaving Las Vegas,"
and it's loads better than his impression of a sleepwalker in "8mm." After
all, to see a truly disinterested performance, one need look no further than
Cage's co-star in this film. I don't know what somebody slipped into
Patricia Arquette's drink, but it definitely put her to sleep. Granted, she
has an uncanny ability to resonate innocence and warmth, but far too many of
her scenes felt like line-reading, complete with the random pauses of
someone who sounds like she's reading the script for the first time.
Arquette is certainly better than she was in "Stigmata," but that's not
saying much. The real bright spots of the cast are in the supporting parts.
All three of Cage's partners are perfect in their roles. John Goodman is
laconic and tired as Larry, which is exactly what the character calls for.
Ving Rhames is a hoot as the devout Marcus, who spends the early part of the
night flirting with the dispatcher (voiced by Queen Latifah), and then
treats his assignments as a chance to convert patients to Christianity. A
particularly good scene has him tricking a bunch of Goth rockers into
believing that their friend has been healed by divine intervention, when it
was really just an adrenaline shot from Cage. Tom Sizemore is appropriately
over-the-top as the psychotic Tom Walls. The scene where he attacks his
ambulance as Cage takes off work is priceless. Pop singer Marc Anthony does
a surprising turn as a whacked-out junkie, and does it well.
As is to be expected from Scorsese, the film is often exhilarating, with
symbolism to spare. I particularly liked the allegory of the dying man in
the desert, begging for a glass of water. Frank has had people dying on him
for so long that he just wants to save a life because "it's the greatest
high in the world." There is plenty of wry humor to counterbalance the
seriousness, meaning that "Bringing Out the Dead" is almost always
interesting to watch. There's just something wrong with it, however, that
keeps me from proclaiming it a masterpiece along with Scorsese's greatest
films. I think it has to do with a lack of true focus in Paul Schrader's
screenplay, and with the performances of Cage and Arquette. The film isn't
plot-driven, which is fine if you've got an interesting and well-developed
character. After all, "Taxi Driver" didn't have much of a plot, but Travis
Bickle was one of the most dynamic characters in American cinema. Frank
Pierce just isn't very interesting. There isn't half the character
development we saw in "Taxi Driver" or "Raging Bull" (no Robert De Niro
either, interestingly enough), and Cage doesn't help much with his
good-but-not-great performance. Another problem is the surprising lack of
chemistry between Cage and real-life wife Arquette. Where are De Niro and
Jodie Foster when you need them? I wasn't terribly interested in their
relationship until the final scene which, though a beautiful image, had its
power diluted by the draggy early ones.
Scorsese always has a knack for finding wonderful imagery in every film,
which he does in "Bringing Out the Dead." I loved seeing his vision of how
the ghost of the young girl appears to Cage, the aforementioned final shot,
Cage's hallucination about pulling people out of manholes, and countless
other breathtaking images. Even though he does go a bit overboard with this
when he practically turns Cage into a walking light bulb in the penultimate
sequence, it's not in Scorsese's direction that the major problem lies. The
real problem is a surprisingly lackluster screenplay turned out by Paul
Schrader, who scripted many of Scorsese's better films ("Taxi Driver,"
"Raging Bull," "The Last Temptation of Christ"). There is plenty of clever
dialogue and dark comedy, but little story or character development, and I
can't shake the idea that I just saw "Taxi Driver Lite." Despite these
problems, "Bringing Out the Dead" is still a fascinating film. It may not be
up to Scorsese's usual high standards, but would certainly be an impressive
accomplishment for an artist of lower standing. It's mediocre Marty, but
certainly top-level Schumacher.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring Jim Carrey, Renee Zellweger, Robert Forster, Chris 
Cooper, Anthony Anderson, Mongo Brownlee, Jerod Mixon, Michael Bowman, 
Traylor Howard, Tony Cox. Written by Peter Farrelly, Mike Cerrone, and 
Bobby Farrelly. Directed by Bobby Farrelly and Peter Farrelly. Rated R.
It seemed like the perfect concept. What better for the Farrelly 
Brothers, famous for writing and directing comedies with offensive 
subject matter, than to make a movie about a guy with a split 
personality? It's exactly the sort of thing the Brothers relish: poking 
fun at something serious (in this case mental illness), throwing all 
care to the wind to get a laugh. Jim Carrey's signed on too? Even 
better. The National Alliance for the Mentally Ill even helped out by 
levying complaints against the Brothers' new film before its opening, 
claiming it was misrepresenting the condition of split personality, 
labeling it incorrectly as "schizophrenia," and so forth. Such a protest 
seemed like just the sort of thing that would, of course, only add more 
fuel to the Farrelly Brothers' fire, proving that some people just 
couldn't take a joke, and that the Farrellys would be helping the more 
enlightened viewers to yet another dose of their brilliantly subversive 
comedy.
Yes, it all seemed perfect, but one thing went wrong: Their movie isn't 
funny.
It's not for lack of trying. The Farrellys utilize in "Me, Myself & 
Irene" their most high-concept premise ever: Carrey plays Charlie 
Baileygaites, a man who after being dumped by his wife for a midget limo 
driver, decides to bury all his aggressive feelings deep down inside and 
never release them. This, of course, means all his neighbors exploit his 
entirely too-forgiving nature, making his job as a Rhode Island state 
trooper increasingly difficult. Soon enough, Charlie's repressed 
aggression manifests itself into a second, independent personality named 
Hank, a deep-voiced, boorish ogre unafraid of taking the assertive 
actions his predecessor had been unable to muster. This guy isn't above 
crashing a car through the wall of the barber shop in which he's been 
insulted, or holding a little girl's head underwater because she refused 
to stop jump-roping in the street.
Then things start getting lost in the most complicated plot the 
Farrellys have ever attempted, and the film runs off its tracks. Some 
have suggested that this isn't a problem, because the Farrelly Brothers' 
brand of humor doesn't require plot to work. They're wrong, of course: 
Plot was greatly instrumental in building up the kind of rollicking 
comic energy that infused the Farrellys' last effort, 1996's "There's 
Something About Mary." (1999's "Outside Providence" was technically an 
earlier project.) The brothers' earlier film wasn't funny merely because 
it contained outrageous gags (despite what some newsmagazine articles 
would have you believe), but rather because its most outrageous gags 
were entirely unexpected. In "Mary," the Farrellys managed several times 
to pull off a neat sleight-of-hand trick: They'd have you thinking the 
story was going one way, then reveal its real direction in delightfully 
surprising fashion.
"Me, Myself & Irene," by contrast, seems to have been made by folks who 
looked at "Mary" and saw only the surface grossness, missing all of the 
subtle machinations that really made it work. Having been produced by 
the same guys who made "Mary," "Irene" seems like an even bigger 
disappointment. The brothers pile on the offensive humor, taking shots 
at race, midgets, albinos, mental illness, and all manner of bathroom 
jokes. But they haven't come up with a way to make any of it fresh; most 
of "Me, Myself & Irene" comes off as rote, by-the-numbers, adolescent 
comedy. The plot, with Carrey forced to drive alleged fugitive Irene P. 
Waters (Renee Zellweger), who's in more trouble than anyone knows, back 
to New York, has an ending that's entirely predictable from the get-go. 
(Think Charlie and Irene will fall in love? Yeah, me too.) The Farrellys 
then introduce scores of different characters, and none of them ever 
manage to do anything you haven't already expected them to do, no matter 
how outrageous their actions might be. Compared to the curveballs the 
Farrellys are used to throwing, this stuff is almost entirely 
soft-tossed, presenting an obvious problem: When gross-out humor loses 
its shock value, it's no longer funny, merely gross.
The jokes that do work are milked over and over until their 
effectiveness runs dry. Take, for example, the subplot involving 
Charlie's three Black sons (Anthony Anderson, Mongo Brownlee, Jerod 
Mixon). The incongruity of it all is funny for a while, with three burly 
Black men discussing higher math in ghetto language and white-bread 
Carrey mouthing said language with an entirely too-pleasant smile on his 
face. But by the end of the film, they're still doing the same schitck; 
it hasn't been elevated to another, funnier level, and it hasn't been 
dropped either. That's too bad, because it ceases to be amusing about 
halfway through. "Me, Myself & Irene" reeks of wasted opportunities. 
There ought to be more focus on how other people react to Charlie's new 
personality, and on how Charlie deals with the consequences of Hank's 
actions. This doesn't really happen; nearly every supporting character 
learns about Charlie's condition early on, so they don't have any 
opportunity to be surprised by it. The film throws what looks like a 
patented Farrelly curve in a scene towards the midway point (involving 
an albino companion Charlie and Irene pick up called, appropriately, 
"Whitey"), but the script doesn't go anywhere with it, instead leaving 
the thread twisting in the wind before awkwardly tying it up during the 
climax.
Jim Carrey is a gifted comedian, both physically and vocally, but he's 
left with nothing much to do here except contort himself in a manner 
similar to Steve Martin in "All of Me." It's a great showcase of 
flexibility and split-second role-shifting, but none of it is terribly 
funny. Carrey doesn't pull any stunts we don't expect him to pull, and 
the Farrellys' script doesn't give him anything else to pull: The 
situations in which he must perform the role-shifting aren't set up in 
any meaningful way. Perhaps Carrey can take solace in the fact that his 
supporting actors fare no better. Zellweger's Irene is not a strong 
female lead; Mary in "Mary" may have been part adolescent fantasy, but 
she was also intelligent and strong-willed. Irene is nothing in 
particular, as the film never makes clear whether she's ditzy, clever, 
or neither. As such, she gives us nothing to latch onto as the only 
"sane" person in the film. Chris Cooper is stuck playing exactly one 
note as a corrupt FBI agent, and his character is entirely too 
straight-laced for a movie like this. He, like the others, does 
absolutely nothing unexpected.
After viewing the shapeless mess that "Me, Myself & Irene" eventually 
dissolved into, I was stuck wondering whether or not the Farrellys had 
outsmarted themselves. Maybe their kind of comedy can only work for so 
long until audiences get wise to it and stop being shocked. But I don't 
believe it -- good filmmakers find ways of surprising their audiences 
even after people have grown attuned to their style. If the Farrellys 
are indeed good, smart filmmakers (and I still think they are), they'll 
rebound just fine. Even after that happens, though, I'll still consider 
"Me, Myself & Irene" to be a high-caliber misfire.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for American Psycho (2000)
Year: 2000.
Starring Christian Bale, Willem Dafoe, Jared Leto, Reese Witherspoon, 
Samantha Mathis, Chloe Sevigny, Justin Theroux, Josh Lucas, Guinevere 
Turner.
Screenplay by Mary Harron and Guinevere Turner.
Directed by Mary Harron.
Rated R.
"American Psycho" opens by presenting us with a plain white screen and 
proceeds to drop big red things down across the opening credits. Then 
red stuff is smeared across the screen -- it's blood, right? After all, 
this is a movie about a serial killer, isn't it? Our anticipation grows 
as a big knife is raised, ready to slash its next victim, which turns 
out to be . . . a piece of meat. Whoops. All that red stuff was nothing 
but pieces of fruit and some sauce, and we are not looking at a 
conceptualized murder; we are looking at food preparation. This opening 
credit sequence is a fine precursor for what "American Psycho" will 
eventually become: This is a film out to give you exactly what you don't 
expect. It's not going to be an easily consumed slasher flick. "American 
Psycho" wants to subvert your expectations -- to make you think.
Christian Bale plays Patrick Bateman, a hotshot young Wall Street 
executive. Patrick is handsome and successful. He gets chauffeured 
around in a limo, lives in a cavernous, posh apartment, and throws money 
around like confetti. He also has a problem: He kills people. Not right 
away; he's busy trying to make himself appear successful to his 
coworkers by getting fancy new business cards and attempting to score 
reservations at the most exclusive European restaurants. But Bateman is 
frustrated. He still gets one-upped by a fellow exec who looks just like 
him (Jared Leto), he is still bored with his socialite fiancE9e (Reese =
Witherspoon), and his extramarital lover (Samantha Mathis) has grown 
cold and drugged-out. So he takes out his aggression by committing 
violent murders, usually in the comfort of his own apartment while 
philosophizing about the virtues of commercialized 80's music (Huey 
Lewis, Phil Collins). Patrick likes to kill prostitutes mostly, but 
he'll take a coworker or a homeless man if it suits him. Possible 
problems surface when a private detective (Willem Dafoe) is hired to 
look for one of his victims, and this detective may or may not suspect 
Patrick of the murder.
"American Psycho" was based on the novel written by Bret Easton Ellis, 
one that drew controversy at the time of its publication for its graphic 
descriptions of brutal murders and perceived misogyny. It was considered 
"unfilmable." Despite such sentiment, director Mary Harron has managed 
to produce a film version, and she's made a fairly coherent work out of 
it too. If there is a misogynist streak in this version of "American 
Psycho," it's of the deeply satirical variety: Harron doesn't glorify 
Bateman's murders, but rather presents them as the deeds of a sad, 
repressed man who turns to murder as his only recourse against a 
stifling world. This is satire of consumer culture at its best. The film 
jabs at the vast emptiness caused by defining oneself by comparison to 
others, as Bateman does, eventually letting his jealousy push him over 
the edge. A colleague has a superior business card? Invite him to your 
house and kill him! Frustrated with your more conventional sexual 
conquests? Invite prostitutes in and kill them too! The analogies are 
not lost on Harron: Bateman even holds a chainsaw over his crotch in one 
of the later (and more over-the-top) scenes, and black comedy abounds in 
the early going. Witness Bale dissecting the finer points of "Hip to Be 
Square" while preparing to take an ax to a man's head (also witness his 
hilariously stiff dance moves)-never has Huey Lewis seemed so profound. 
The aforementioned "pissing contest" involving business cards is also 
extremely well-done, and very funny, unless you're the sort of person 
who actually *can* explain why eggshell is preferable to off-white.
Christian Bale delivers a whale of a performance, one that may not be 
fully appreciated until the film has run its course. Playing a weird 
hybrid of Tom Cruise and Jim Carrey (with a little Malcolm McDowell 
thrown in for good measure), he initially appears to be underacting, 
then overacting. But afterward comes a realization that he delivered a 
perfectly modulated, very carefully planned performance, one that 
managed to consistently jibe with Harron's ever-shifting objectives. 
It's important to realize that Bale is not so much playing a person as 
he is a representation of a specific kind of person, one who has put 
material gain above all else. His facial ticks and voice inflections are 
meant to confuse initially and illuminate afterward -- many of the 
choices Bale makes don't appear to have a clear meaning until after the 
end credits begin to roll. Bale is also surrounded by a capable 
supporting cast, including Dafoe, Leto, Witherspoon, Mathis, and Chloe 
Sevigny as Bateman's insecure secretary. Their performances generally 
range from "good" to "excellent," and their efforts help the film a 
great deal.
It's important to realize that Harron's film is one that requires a 
certain investment from the audience to be effective. It is not enough 
to sit back and demand entertainment from "American Psycho." Only the 
attentive viewer will be rewarded, and nowhere is this more evident than 
in the final suggestion that none of Bateman's murders actually 
happened. This is not certain-the script (by Harron and Guinevere 
Turner) is ambiguous enough to allow for multiple possibilities-but it 
helps to explain certain formerly inexplicable occurrences. No one hears 
Bateman comment about wanting to kill people or being in the business of 
"murders and executions, mostly" (a model hears it as "mergers and 
acquisitions," and I'll leave interpretation of the wordplay up to you). 
But maybe no one hears because he never actually said it. That would 
also explain why no one in his apartment building complains about 
screaming women running down the halls while chased by naked men with 
chainsaws, and why our boy Patrick is somehow able to blow up a cop car 
with a handgun. The argument over whether or not Bateman imagined all 
his murders is not, as some critics have suggested, pointless. An 
entirely new dimension is added to the film once you consider Patrick a 
repressed loser who only wishes he were someone as cool as a serial 
killer. It better supports a point Harron seems to be making here: A 
person need not be a murderer to be a "psycho." He just needs to be 
insane. Bateman's crisis isn't resolved either; by film's end, he still 
hasn't escaped from his shell. This is not an exit.
"American Psycho" has its share of problems: It repeats itself too much 
and seems to consider itself far more important than it actually is. I'm 
also wondering why it had to be set specifically in the 80's. The satire 
is universal enough to be applied to many a time period, so specificity 
only makes the film feel dated. It would probably have been better to 
set "American Psycho" in an invented world that doesn't actively suggest 
any particular time or place, a la "A Clockwork Orange" or "Fight Club." 
Still, "American Psycho" must be given attention despite its problems. 
It's deeper than it appears, far less bloody than advertised, and also 
begs an interesting question: Does all that 80's music help make one a 
better murderer? Notice how Patrick Bateman only actually succeeds at 
(or imagines succeeding at) killing someone after listening to music. 
Considering his taste, it's not surprising. Heck, if I listened to Phil 
Collins every day, I might be about ready to kill someone too.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Stigmata (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring Patricia Arquette, Gabriel Byrne, Jonathan Pryce, Nia Long, Thomas
Kopache, Rade Serbedzija, Enrico Colantoni, Dick Latessa, Portia de Rossi.
Written by Tom Lazarus and Rick Ramage.
Directed by Rupert Wainwright.
Rated R.
If anything, "Stigmata" should be taken as a warning against releasing
similarly-themed films relatively close to one another. Of the four
supernatural horror flicks released this year, it is clearly the worst. I
suppose I should have seen this coming. After all, "Blair Witch" thoroughly
creeped me out, "Sixth Sense" was mildly spooky, and then "Stir of Echoes"
had its moments, but wasn't anything I'd lose sleep over. Clearly, the
quality of the horror this summer has slowly been dropping. Is it then any
surprise that "Stigmata" is the dullest, most horribly executed piece of
MTV-influenced tripe I have seen in a long while? No, not really.
Patricia Arquette plays Frankie Page, a hairdresser from Pittsburgh who
receives a rosary as a gift from her globe-trotting mother. As it turns out,
the rosary belonged to a recently-deceased Brazilian priest. The priest's
church had been under investigation by Father Andrew Kiernan (Gabriel Byrne)
because of the mysterious appearance of a bleeding statue. Father Kiernan is
an investigator who has made a career out of disproving supposed religious
signs, but this time he believes there is something to the bleeding statue.
His investigation is soon called off, however, when the Frankie starts
exhibiting signs of the stigmata, in which a person is inflicted with wounds
like that of Jesus Christ. Father Kiernan is initially skeptical of Frankie'
s story, considering she's an atheist, but once he witnesses the stigmata
attacks himself, he dedicates himself to finding out what is going on. He
eventually begins to suspect that his boss, Cardinal Houseman (Jonathan
Pryce), is concealing something that could bring down the Catholic Church.
As it turns out, the dead priest had been working on the translation of a
"fifth gospel" before they were excommunicated.
The new Rupert Wainwright music video . . . I mean film "Stigmata" is the
sort of film that starts off OK and only gets worse. Indeed, it would have
been good if it were a music video, because it's only interesting for about
five minutes. I'm not sure what Wainwright is trying to prove with his
endless parade of slow-motion, double-exposure, and extreme close-ups
(Whoaaaaaa!!!!), other than the fact that he has the most swelled head of
any director in Hollywood and, yes, he has been to film school. His camera
trickery is interesting for a little while, but eventually, it becomes
headache-inducing. What this film needed is a second audio track to be
played over the dialogue (such as it is), with Wainwright screaming at the
audience, "See? Look at what I can do! I'm an EX-cellent dir-ECT-or." Maybe
then he'd explain why he decided to start half of his scenes with
slow-motion shots of water dripping in reverse, or why he included random
superfluous shots as that of an egg frying (ooh, scary!). If there was some
underlying meaning behind all this camera trickery, I didn't see it. Just
when you thought it was safe to get involved in the story, here comes a
double-exposure shot of two Patricia Arquettes collapsing into bed for no
reason whatsoever. Arrrrrrrghhhh . . .
Then again, the superfluous camera trickery wouldn't bother me if "Stigmata"
had a story or characters that were remotely engaging. Though Wainwright's
vanity certainly doesn't help, he does seem to have been given a nearly
unworkable script. Where are plot continuity and character development when
you need them? Case in point: Frankie Page is the character that (I assume)
we are supposed to identify and sympathize with, but we aren't given any
back story on her character, or any reason to like her. The extent of her
character development seems to be that she is a hard-working hairdresser
(who can somehow afford a cavernous apartment on the top floor of her
building) and she's kind of cute, so let's start the bleeding! The fact that
she's clearly not the brightest bulb in the drawer doesn't help, either.
According to Frankie Page, what is the first thing to do after receiving
mysterious wounds on your wrists and back? Go clubbing! Sure, that makes
sense. Arquette, Byrne, and Pryce give it the old college try, but their
characters are so one-dimensional that they just appear to be sleepwalking.
Scenes between Arquette and Byrne that were probably supposed to be sexually
charged fall almost embarrassingly flat, because the setup of the romantic
subplot is so clumsily handled that it almost reaches the point of becoming
laughable. Even though Frankie Page's life is falling apart before her very
eyes, she still finds the time to hit on a priest who wanders in to her hair
salon. Even more curiously, he seems to be interested in her advances.
Father Andrew's religious doubt pops up so suddenly that it seems more silly
than dramatic. As for Pryce, he may as well wear a curled mustache and
cackle, "I'll get you, my pretty," for all the depth his Cardinal Houseman
is afforded. Trust me, I'm not revealing anything by telling you Pryce turns
out to be a villain.
What's worse, after being faced with dull characters and the prospect of
having annoying camera tricks and loud music jammed down our throats, we now
have to contend with a story that starts off in one direction, veers off in
another, then another, and ends up being totally incomprehensible. First of
all, the film doesn't even bother to explain what should be very simple plot
details. How does Frankie get the stigmata merely by touching a rosary? How
come an atheist like her was chosen, since Father Andrew mentions that only
very devout believers have ever received stigmata? Actually, I'm not sure
what Frankie was posessed by. Supposedly, stigmata occurs when one is
posessed by the Holy Spirit, but the film later has her being posessed by
the dead priest, and later by some evil spirit (I think). Which one is it?
The answer to this question, of course, is very simple: the possessing
entity in each scene is determined by whichever effects and flashy camera
work Mr. Wainwright wants to use this time. Furthermore, the ending is a
ridiculously neat little wrap-up, and the filmmakers compound this problem
by ultimately turning the film into a diatribe against the Catholic Church.
If you do any research at all about the Gospel of St. Thomas, you'll find
that it is not being suppressed by the Church (as the film seems to claim),
but that it is readily available at your local library. There's nothing the
Catholics need to worry about, though. "Stigmata's" religion is so off-base
that it can't be confused for anything remotely resembling the real Catholic
Church. If they wanted to portray Catholic priests as mobsters, they should
have gone all-out and equipped them with sharkskin suits and tommy guns,
which would have been far more interesting. I'm not Catholic; in fact, I don
't care much for the Catholic Church, but its cartoonish misrepresentation
in this film should not be considered realistic by any means.
It's rare to see a film that fails on as many levels as "Stigmata" does. It'
s not thought-provoking, though it would like to be, and it is definitely
not scary, though it pretends to be. I'm not sure why they tried to pass
this off as a horror film, because there is absolutely nothing scary about
the story. Maybe it's an attempt to cover up the fact that none of the
scenes have any dramatic weight whatsoever. The initial shock of seeing
Arquette covered with blood is dulled by the fact that it happens over, and
over, and over. Like so many films of the MTV generation, this one suffers
from overkill. So much is overdone in "Stigmata," that it eventually has no
effect on the audience, leaving us to pick out the film's (many) flaws. I'm
also still trying to figure out why the quotation they take from the Gospel
of St. Thomas is so Earth-shattering. When we finally hear it, the saying
sounds like something every five-year-old learns on their first day of
Sunday School, which means that for all its flash, the whole film is really
much ado about nothing. The dog days of summer usually produce one monstrous
dog, and "Stigmata" is it.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring the voices of Matt Damon, Drew Barrymore, Bill
Pullman, Nathan Lane, Janeane Garofalo, John Leguizamo, Tone Loc, Jim
Breuer, Alex D. Linz, Ron Perlman. Story by Hans Bauer and Randall
McCormick. Screenplay by Ben Edlund, John August, and Joss Whedon.
Directed by Don Bluth and Gary Goldman. Rated PG.
"Titan A.E." is a frustrating movie. You watch it, and you get the idea
that it's trying really, really hard to be a great film, a modern
classic. But then you come up with an unshakable feeling that the movie
just isn't working, and no matter how many stops it pulls out, you
just can't shake that feeling. That's what happened to me
while watching "Titan A.E." It's an ambitious film, but it's
nowhere close to greatness. And the more I think about it, the more its
failures stand out.
The film takes place roughly a thousand years in the future, where an
evil race made of pure energy called the Drej has destroyed Earth. Humans
now exist as an "orphan" species, drifting from outpost to outpost
without finding any real home. Cale (voice of Alex D. Linz) was a young
boy when Earth was destroyed, and his father was one of the principal
officials in charge of evacuating the planet. But Cale's father
disappeared after Earth's destruction, never to be heard from
again. Now a cynical survivor (and now voiced by Matt Damon), Cale
stumbles upon a ship with a partially human crew at a space dock.
He's startled to find that the captain of the ship, gruff Commander
Korso (Bill Pullman), has actually been looking for him. Korso, a friend
of Cale's father, reveals that Cale actually holds the key to the
humans' last hope at finding a new home: His father left him a
genetically-encoded map pinpointing the whereabouts of the Titan, a
planet-sized space station hidden somewhere in outer space.
Unfortunately, the Drej are interested in finding the Titan as well, and
they are hunting Cale down in order to pry the information from him. Not
allowed much of a choice after the Drej attack his current residence,
Cale agrees to go with Korso.
The story sounds fine, like a pretty good opportunity for an exciting
space adventure. It's derivative, sure, but most movies of this
kind are, and "Titan A.E." can hardly be faulted for cribbing ideas when
the films it's cribbing from ("Star Wars," "Star Trek") would have
to plead guilty to the same charge. But that doesn't let it off the
hook for getting its premise all wrong. "Star Wars" took place in a
consistent, expansive universe you always felt that what made it to the
screen was only a small fraction of what was floating around inside
George Lucas' head. "Titan A.E." presents no such depth, because
the writers haven't paid much attention to the details of their own
plot. For example, it's established that the Drej want to destroy
the human race, but we never find out why they want to do that. What
threat do the humans pose to them? Who knows? Supporting characters are
introduced without any reason given for them to be there. How did
Commander Korso put together such a diverse crew? Who knows? Korso
remarks that he's been looking for Cale "for many years," so he can
find the Titan, for which he's also been searching "for many
years." A single person is easier to find in the vast expanse of space
than a planet-sized spaceship? Why not just look for the Titan itself?
Who knows?
The script fails at proper characterization, too. The heroes in a space
opera don't have to be deep, but they should at least be likeable.
"Titan A.E." fails on both counts. The apparent good guys are only good
in the sense that they don't wish anyone else any specific harm.
Cale may be blond and fresh-faced, but he's so bland, and so
self-pitying, it's hard to really root for him. Japanese space-punk
Akima (Drew Barrymore) serves as Cale's love interest, and
she's not very interesting either. Nor is her character consistent:
Sometimes she's tough, sometimes she's helpless, depending on
what the rote story demands. Korso comes off as equally subject to the
whims of the script. His motivations change back and forth without much
conviction by the end, you're wondering if this guy believes in
anything at all. It doesn't help that the big-name cast turns in
mostly uninspiring voice performances. Damon, Barrymore, Pullman, and
Janeane Garofalo sound bored. Nathan Lane and John Leguizamo (as the
ostensibly "colorful" sidekicks) are at least enthusiastic, but still
unfocused. Most of the actors' dialogue is horribly concocted: The
"funny" lines induce cringing, the serious ones occasional giggling.
"Titan A.E." does contain some breathtaking imagery. Visuals, not
surprisingly, are the film's saving grace. Two action set-pieces,
one during the Earth's destruction and another in a field of ice
crystals, are about as exciting as anything you're going to see
this year. But they're oases in a desert, because "Titan A.E."
doesn't make these or any other scenes feel necessary. A
plot-driven film's narrative ought to be a fast-paced, naturally
flowing progression to a satisfying climax, but "Titan A.E." feels more
like a series of individual scenes slammed together in chronological
order. It doesn't move.
What "Titan A.E." forgets about making a fun space adventure is that the
adventure is supposed to be *fun*. Almost every plot point is treated
with such grim portentousness that any and all vitality is sucked right
out of the production. Obviously, a film of this nature can't goof
its way through the story, and some things need to be treated seriously
(like the Force, for example). But there also needs to be a sense of
giddy enthusiasm, an indication that the filmmakers were having as much
fun making their movie as they expect the audience to have watching it.
This film gives no such indication. Instead of being a "Star Wars"-like
joyous romp, "Titan A.E." is a somber march towards a predictable
conclusion. This is not the stuff of a modern classic.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Boiler Room (2000)
Year: 2000.
Starring Giovanni Ribisi, Vin Diesel, Nia Long, Nicky Katt, Tom Everett
Scott, Ben Affleck, Scott Caan, Ron Rifkin, Jamie Kennedy, Taylor Nichols.
Written by Ben Younger.
Directed by Ben Younger.
Rated R.
After viewing "Boiler Room," I came to an interesting conclusion: Most
movies looking to provide viewers with an "in-depth" portrayal of a
particular profession end up making it look like a pretty lousy job. Either
they take the route of most movies about the teaching profession and show
that, however worthwhile, the job is exceedingly difficult ("Stand and
Deliver," anyone?), or they show you all the nasty, ugly stuff lurking under
the surface that you don't want to see. "Boiler Room" goes for the latter. I
can't think of anyone who would want to be a stockbroker after seeing this
one. Trouble is, the characters in "Boiler Room" take a look at a film
equally critical of the same profession -- Oliver Stone's "Wall Street" --
and find exactly what they are looking for. Huh? Good question. This film
attempts to explain the mentality that leads young men to the high-pressure
world of selling stocks. And though "Boiler Room" doesn't quite work as a
complete piece of cinema, some of its insight into this world is still quite
fascinating.
Seth (Giovanni Ribisi) runs a private casino out of his basement. Though he'
s supposed to be in college, he has since dropped out and concentrated
entirely on his new business. Soon, however, Seth's disapproving father (Ron
Rifkin), a judge, discovers his deception and virtually disowns his son.
Seth, desperate to gain his father's respect, takes up a job offer from one
of his customers: A small firm called J.T. Marlin is offering young recruits
instant wealth -- they'll be millionaires within their first three years.
Seth goes to the job "interview," which is more like a recruiting session,
where broker Jim Young (Ben Affleck) delivers forceful speeches designed to
draw the men to the company. After joining the firm as a trainee, Seth finds
 the work hectic and stressful, but still satisfying. He meets his
co-workers, such as Greg (Nicky Katt) and Chris (Vin Diesel), two group
leaders who keep up a friendly stream of insults with each other, Michael
(Tom Everett Scott), the charismatic chairman, and Abby (Nia Long), a
beautiful secretary Seth takes a liking to. He's good at his job and is
finally doing something his father can approve of. But Seth starts noticing
suspicious things about his seemingly gracious employer. J.T. Marlin can
afford to pay its employees exorbitant amounts of cash, strange for such a
small firm. Eventually, he discovers the truth: The firm is a "chop-shop," a
place that sells nonexistent stocks to unwitting customers, and one that is
under investigation by the FBI.
The films which served as Younger's inspiration for "Boiler Room" are quite
evident. His characters quote lines from "Wall Street" and extol the virtues
of "Glengarry Glen Ross," while Younger himself seems to channel David Mamet
when writing his dialogue; his film is full of quintessential Mamet-speak --
curt, profane, and riddled with epithets. Derivative nature aside, most of
these conversations are sharply written, even darkly funny at times. Younger
displays some ironic wit here: These characters are well-to-do white men who
speak like they came from the ghetto. The film utilizes a rap-infested
soundtrack to enforce the notion (and just in case you're wondering, yes,
Younger did start out directing music videos), and many of the scenes in
"Boiler Room" are quite stunning in their effectiveness. The offices at J.T.
Marlin literally are boiling pots of tension, ready to explode at any
moment, and much of the tension is brought in by strong, forceful
performances by two actors: Nicky Katt and Vin Diesel. They aren't the main
characters (though sometimes I wished they were), but the duo bring energy
to the material whenever they arrive on screen. Ben Affleck, playing the
Alec Baldwin part (from "Glengarry"), delivers his monologues quite well.
"Boiler Room" is an interesting film, but the problem is that whatever
interesting points it might have delivered are dulled by the slipshod way
the film has been slapped together. Younger is still inexperienced as a
filmmaker, and his shot selection gets downright monotonous at times:
Practically every conversation is an endless stream of close-ups. But I'm
willing to overlook such faults, as long as the filmmaker has enough
material to keep me interested for the full running time. "Boiler Room" only
has enough to sustain about half a film. The first hour is quite good. We
meet plenty of colorful characters and learn quite a lot about the inner
workings of a firm like J.T. Marlin. But Younger, for all his dedication to
Mamet-style dialogue, forgets that it isn't enough to merely show us what
happens in an office like this, not enough to fill a feature-length film,
anyway. Conversations that seemed insightful in the first half become
tedious in the second. But why? Aren't they essentially the same
conversations? Yes, and it is precisely because they are the same
conversations that they cease to be interesting.  Notice how team leaders
Greg and Chris have the same racially-charged argument every time. Notice
how Ben Affleck delivers what is essentially the same speech no less than
three times. (In "Glengarry," Mamet was wise to have Alec Baldwin show up
once for a stunning and forceful monologue and then resist the temptation to
bring him back for another.) Notice how Seth, the ostensible lead character,
learns almost nothing by the end of the film -- other than that he should've
stuck with his illegal casino business. David Mamet is Younger's
inspiration, but he writes conversations that give us new insight into his
characters each time around; Younger writes conversations that go nowhere by
the time two characters talk to each other a second time. "Boiler Room's"
script is big on introduction, and short on development.
Younger also seems to be afraid of mainstream audiences not "getting" his
film, so he throws in several superfluous subplots that never amount to
much, like the truncated romance between Ribisi and Nia Long. While the film
should be commended for not harping on the interracial nature of the
relationship, it still never gets really interesting. Seth's relationship
with his father sits in neutral for a long while until the film pulls out a
contrived (and unearned) resolution to it. (Ribisi's "breakdown" scene
towards the end isn't the least bit believable.) And what was that about the
FBI sting? Don't even ask. The screenplay has hampered what ought to have
been a character-driven film and saddled it with far too much plot. It also
makes the grave mistake of having the laconic and disinterested Seth as its
lead character, because the film doesn't need a lead character at all. It
would have been better had Younger treated this as an ensemble piece, giving
more screen time to the interesting personalities employed by J.T. Marlin.
Perhaps I'm being too harsh on the film. I didn't hate "Boiler Room." Quite
the opposite, it intrigued me so greatly that I was left wanting more. The
film is good in pieces, particularly a scene where Seth berates a
telemarketer for serving him a lousy sales pitch (don't you wish you could
do that?) and a subplot involving a spineless middle-class family man
(Taylor Nichols) who gets taken for all he's worth by J.T. Marlin. This part
of the film is easily the most effective, portraying and personalizing just
what these "chop-shop" firms do to people. The result is absolutely
disgusting. Younger's film also manages to tap into a late-90's "boom
economy" mentality, one in which young men, having seen computer hackers and
stockbrokers making millions at the drop of a hat, demand their own
substantial slice of the pie. But all these good pieces don't add up to a
coherent whole, and this film ultimately fails, falling apart in a formulaic
and repetitive second half that loses whatever points it had been making.
"Boiler Room" does a lot of nice things; too bad it doesn't manage to do
them for a full two hours.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Being John Malkovich (1999)
It's unusual, but every once in a while there comes a movie that is utterly
unpredictable, one that starts with an idea and takes the viewer off in
every possible direction. "Being John Malkovich" is one such film. So often
we see movies that start off with a good idea and go absolutely nowhere,
getting lost in a predictable plot and contrived sitcom-friendly situations.
Not this one. This film explores every possible angle that could be derived
from its admittedly bizarre premise. The film is a funny, entertaining,
thought-provoking original. It's truly amazing this film actually got made
with studio backing, considering it's practically unmarketable.
Nevertheless, "Being John Malkovich" is here, and we're all better off for
it. It's the most creative film of the year.
John Cusack stars as Craig Schwartz, an out-of-work puppeteer who longs for
the chance to become famous through his craft. Pushed by his wife Lotte
(Cameron Diaz) into getting a steady job, he becomes a filing clerk for the
company on the 7˝ floor (don't ask). While working in his office, Craig
discovers a portal in the wall that leads into the head of John Malkovich,
allowing him to see through the actor's eyes for fifteen minutes. Craig lets
Maxine (Catherine Keener), a co-worker he is attracted to, in on the secret.
The opportunistic Maxine convinces Craig to turn the portal into a tourist
attraction, and it becomes a huge hit. Complications ensue when Lotte visits
Malkovich's brain while Maxine is seducing him, and the two women find they
are attracted to each other . . . but only through Malkovich. The situation
grows ever more bizarre when Malkovich himself realizes what has been going
on, and Craig learns how to control his new "puppet."
This film takes a lot of chances, the biggest of which may be in taking its
most marketable stars and robbing them of their glamour. Cusack and Diaz
play so far against type that I was barely able to recognize them (it took
me 20 minutes to realize Diaz was even in the movie). Both actors acquit
themselves nicely. Cusack's bemused nature is perfect for the part of Craig,
and Diaz delivers an unexpectedly touching performance as his homely wife.
Catherine Keener, so wasted in "8mm," plays the femme fatale to delicious
perfection-every one of her lines drips with contempt for the smitten Craig.
As for the title character himself, Malkovich must first be given credit for
his willingness to go along with such a self-deprecating premise, and then
given accolades for a truly brilliant performance. The actor begins by
playing what is supposed to be himself, but seems more like a composite of
how the general public pictures him. He must then pull off something even
more difficult, which is to take on the personality of whoever is inside his
head. When Craig learns to control his body, Malkovich makes a notable shift
into playing John Cusack. He does it so well that I eventually forgot he was
acting; it really seemed like John Cusack inside John Malkovich. It's most
likely the best work he has ever done.
The screenplay, by Charlie Kaufman, is quite simply one of the most
inventive and clever screenplays to be released in a long while. "Being John
Malkovich" has a seemingly endless supply of clever ideas and jokes. It has
hilarious sight gags, like the "half-floor" Craig works on that causes
everyone to stoop down constantly, a fact most of Craig's coworkers seem
blissfully unaware of. There are classic supporting characters, like the
lecherous old Dr. Lester (Orson Bean), who believes he has a speech
impediment because his secretary (Mary Kay Place) mishears everything said
to her. Numerous self-parodying cameos by Hollywood stars (Charlie Sheen,
Brad Pitt, Sean Penn) crop up, each more surprising than the last. The
laughs come consistently in "Being John Malkovich," and best of all, they
are of the subtle and intelligent variety. The film unapologetically resides
in the absurd for its entire running time. If you're willing to buy into its
skewed sense of reality, you'll have a great ride.
What's truly most admirable about this film is that it doesn't shy away from
any exploration of its central idea. There are countless issues raised by
and possible ramifications resulting from entering another man's head, and
"Being John Malkovich" eschews conventional (read: formula) movie plots to
explore all of them. A less ambitious film might have gone for sappy
sentimentalism or cheap jokes with a predictable story, but this one
actually surprised me fairly consistently. I was never certain where the
story was going, and I loved discovering it. Nearly any pressing question
about the premise one might ask is explored. For example, what happens if
someone learns to control Malkovich? What if Malkovich went inside his own
head? What if more than one person takes control? What if there are others
who have people inside their heads? Most films might only explore one or
fewer of these possibilities. "Being John Malkovich" explores all of them.
There are plenty of mind-bending issues raised by the film that it is sure
to become the topic of many a late-night dorm room conversation. It raises
questions about the nature of celebrity, and why we are fascinated by them.
(Perhaps the film's best joke is that no one can name one of Malkovich's
films, even though everyone recognizes him.) It raises issues of
self-identity and role-playing. (Is it a coincidence we are sent into the
brain of an actor?) It raises issues of homosexuality and sexuality in
general. In fact, there are so many pressing ideas brought up by this film,
it would be pointless to try to list them all. I'll just leave it at this:
After seeing "Being John Malkovich," it's hard to figure just who is pulling
anyone's strings, including your own. A film that can accomplish that is
definitely doing something right.
A film as creative as "Being John Malkovich" doesn't get made very often. It
's funny, inventive, and unpredictable. It may have some difficulty reaching
mainstream audiences because it's so far "out there." After all, this film
takes place in a distorted reality, one in which people don't find the
concept of going into someone else's head remotely unusual. All they see it
as is a business venture, or a new toy. Some may find this hard-to-swallow,
but the removal of what might have been used as an easy comic device helps
make the issues that much clearer. Whatever one may think of it, "Being John
Malkovich" is probably the most original film to be released through
Hollywood in the past few years, and it's definitely a must-see.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
Year: 2000.
Starring Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Bruce Greenwood, Guy 
Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Anne Archer, Blair Underwood, Philip Baker Hall,
Nicky Katt.
Written by James Webb (story) and Stephen Gaghan (screenplay).
Directed by William Friedkin.
Rated R.
Have you ever seen a movie that, no matter how much you tried to wrap
your head around it after leaving the theater, you just couldn't
figure out what in the world it was trying to say? That you weren't
sure if you liked or hated, merely because you had no idea what it was
really about? Such was my reaction to "Rules of Engagement." As with
most films, it has its good points and its bad points, but in this
one, there isn't a clear dominance of one over the other. The bad
points perfectly negate the good points, and it' s not just a question
of dramatic effectiveness. The themes are contradictory too. Every
time you think you have a handle on the movie's main "point," you
think of something else that contradicts it. The result is a film that
is tough to label as "bad," but is also far from being good.
Col. Hayes Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones) and Col. Terry Childers (Samuel L.
Jackson) are old Marine buddies with a strong connection: Childers
saved Hodges' life in Vietnam. Now old friends, Hodges is retiring
from his career as a military lawyer and Childers is leading a mission
to Yemen, where a crowd of protesters have begun a demonstration
outside the American embassy.  Upon arriving, Childers finds the crowd
much more hostile than intelligence reports had indicated. After
evacuating the ambassador (Ben Kingsley) and his family, Childers
returns to find his troops under heavy fire. He gives them the order
to fire into the crowd. Reports of the shooting reach American
newspapers, and the military subsequently receives harsh criticism for
what the public believes to be a breach of the Geneva convention, an
illegal slaughter of innocent civilians. Looking for a scapegoat, the
scheming National Security Advisor William Sokal (Bruce Greenwood)
places the blame on Childers and plans to bring him up on charges of
murder.  Childers, eschewing an assigned defender, asks Hodges to be
his counsel, despite the latter's assertion that he is a "poor
lawyer."
"Rules of Engagement" is such a contradictory film that a review of it
might be well served by merely listing the good and the bad. So that's
exactly what I'm going to do.
The good: The cast has been very well assembled. Jones and Jackson are
acting powerhouses, interesting by their mere presence. Guy Pearce
does a decent (though strangely chosen) American accent, Bruce
Greenwood is appropriately smarmy (apparently carrying over much of
his smarm from "Double Jeopardy"), and there are good supporting jobs
turned in by Ben Kingsley, Philip Baker Hall, and Nicky Katt. The bad:
These characters are fairly clumsily sketched. The camaraderie between
Jones and Jackson is indicated by a few contrived lines of dialogue
("Your only real problem, Hayes, is that you never lived up to your
father.") and an unbelievably stupid fist fight scene. The supporting
characters get even shorter shrift, with good actors like Kingsley and
Blair Underwood wasted in superfluous subplots that only look like
they're going somewhere. They're not. Anne Archer's part as the
ambassador's wife is so useless, and her few token scenes so riddled
with clumsy dialogue, that she comes off as a bad actress.  Her
attempt to breathe life into the character by hamming it up does not
work.
The good: There are plenty of crackling scenes, most notably the early
battle sequences, one in Vietnam and one in Yemen, that are filmed
with a nice amount of whirlwind action. Director William Friedkin is
clearly taking pages from both Spielberg's "Saving Private Ryan" here;
his bob-and-weave camera technique and in-the-action sound recording
create the feel of being in combat nicely. Likewise, some of the
courtroom scenes, however cheesy they may be, are well-acted and
filled with clever dialogue. It's not "A Few Good Men," but for a
bunch of testosterone-fueled speechifying-lawyer stuff, it's pretty
good. The bad: For every powerful scene, there's an equally dead one
to accompany it. There is the aforementioned Jones-Jackson fist fight,
and also any scene involving the ambassador's wife. Then there's
virtually anything in between the opening battles and the courtroom
business.  Every time you think the film might start getting good, it
pulls itself down again quickly, either by drawing scenes out longer
than necessary (Jones spends far too much time in Yemen, considering
how little it all ends up signifying) or by drawing attention to the
stupidity of the characters (I still don't know why the N.S.A. didn't
just release the hidden tape to the public, especially since it seems
to exonerate the U.S. on all counts) or the multiple plot holes. (Why
didn't Childers just fire at the snipers in the first place, anyway?
The Marines had a tactical advantage over the demonstrators.)
But thin characters and plot holes can be forgiven if a film is
genuinely entertaining, as "Rules of Engagement" often is, or if the
film delivers some pointed social commentary. Unfortunately, this film
also runs into problems with clarifying just what its message is
supposed to be. Some reviewers have criticized it for having a
right-wing bent. I can understand how one might see it that way -- the
resolution seems to advance the rather suspect argument that "If you
weren't there in combat, you're in no place to judge." If that's the
case, why have military trials at all? Even so, if we' re supposed to
consider "Rules of Engagement" a conservative film, what are we to
make of the brief, but notable, scenes of Jackson's character losing
his cool? We see that his firing into the crowd may have been
understandable, but that he might have made a better decision by
firing at the snipers. The film seems to reinforce the conservative
argument by painting the Arab characters as liars or needlessly
violent savages, but then what are we to think about the sequence in
which Jones' character visits wounded children in a Yemeni hospital?
Too bad the film ultimately manages to render any debate about the
ambiguity of war useless by painting its characters as obvious heroes
and villains, giving us a thoroughly sappy ending (whose worst part is
the ridiculous "final salute"), and leaving many pressing aspects of
the issue unaccounted for. Perhaps one of the defense's strongest
arguments, that Childers shouldn 't have been sent into such a hostile
area without correct information, isn' t touched upon at all. And what
may be the most pressing question of all seems to have been the most
overlooked: Why was there a protest in the first place? "Rules of
Engagement" isn't a bad film, but it's one that is often too
dramatically and intellectually inert to warrant a full
recommendation.  I suppose "Rules" is entertaining in its own small
way, but it's a very small way.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
Year: 2000.
Starring Matthew McConaughey, Bill Paxton, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon Jovi, 
Jake Weber, David Keith, T.C. Carson, Jack Noseworthy, Tom Guiry, Thomas 
Kretschmann, Matthew Settle.
Written by Jonathan Mostow, Sam Montgomery, and David Ayer.
Directed by Jonathan Mostow.
Rated PG-13.
"U-571" is the kind of movie that cannot be taken seriously. In fact, it 
is absolutely imperative that you don't take it seriously. At all. If 
you do, you'll hate it. But this isn't a terribly serious movie; it's 
cotton candy cinema. You pays your money, you gets your thrills, and you 
shouldn't expect anything more. It's also somewhat pointless to harp on 
the obvious: "U-571" is filled with war movie clichE9s, stands as a =
retread of previous submarine movies ("The Hunt for Red October," 
"Crimson Tide"), and therefore doesn't have much in the way of original 
material to offer. But I liked it. Why? Because this movie manages to do 
something that a lot of bloated Hollywood blockbusters don't: give the 
audience no-frills, old-fashioned entertainment. I didn't gain any great 
insights from "U-571," but I had a blast watching it.
The plot? OK, so there are these men, see, and they're on a submarine, 
see, and they're trying to steal something from another submarine, see, 
and it doesn't quite go as planned and . . . oh. You want names, don't 
you? Fine: Lt. Andrew Tyler (Matthew McConaughey) is the executive 
officer (i.e. second in command) aboard an American submarine during 
World War II. His captain (Bill Paxton) doesn't think he's ready for his 
own boat, so despite Tyler's impressive service record, he has withheld 
his recommendation. While on shore leave, the crew of the sub is called 
into action: A German sub has been disabled somewhere in the Atlantic, 
and that sub, the U-571, contains a special encoding device called the 
Enigma. Since its capture means they will be able to crack the German 
code, the Allies want to get their hands on this device, and the mission 
is to board the ship disguised as German sailors, steal the Enigma 
machine, and get out without anyone knowing. Unfortunately, the plan 
goes awry when the American sub is destroyed during the raid, leaving 
Tyler and a skeleton crew stranded aboard the disabled U-571 boat.
But as I said before, specifics don't matter. What matters is that 
director Jonathan Mostow manages to hit the proper marks with a simple 
premise, so "U-571" has very little to bog it down. There is a simple, 
straightforward narrative, nary an extraneous subplot, and a simple 
goal, and that's all you need to make an effective adventure movie. 
You'd think it's an easy thing to do, but recent action films have 
repeatedly failed to get the point. Either we got murky self-importance 
("End of Days"), annoyingly "clever" self-parody ("The Mummy"), or 
pointless and underdeveloped subplots ("The 13th Warrior"). Compared to 
some of the action-oriented duds thrown our way in the last year, 
"U-571" is remarkably unpretentious. Mostow keeps it simple: The 
Americans are the good guys (duh), the Nazis are the bad guys (double 
duh), and the Americans have to fight improbable odds to beat the Nazis. 
This gives us ample opportunity for nail-biting action sequences with 
plenty of leaking water, shaking subs, and the requisite big explosion 
to top it all off. Mostow handles this all with marvelous economy; there 
are few unnecessary scenes, and action sequences don't run any longer 
than they have to. Any director wondering how to properly make a big, 
dumb, entertaining movie should give this guy a call.
The cast, most likely realizing they are only around as props, just say 
their lines and get out of the way. In a movie like "U-571," this is as 
it should be. McConaughey, Paxton, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon Jovi (your 
guess is as good as mine), and a score of hard-nosed sailors deliver 
their frequently dopey one-liners and patriotic soliloquies with 
square-jawed conviction. That's all they're required to do. After all, 
we don't root for these guys because they're fully-realized human 
characters (and they most definitely aren't); we root for them because 
they're remarkably less evil than the Nazis. Most of the actors' lines 
practically scream "Exposition!" or "Foreshadowing!" But that's okay -- 
if you're looking for character development, you're in the wrong place. 
Let me see, if McConaughey's character has been held back because he's 
"too close to his men," will he have to make a difficult decision later 
in the film to sacrifice one of his crew? If there's a German captive 
kept -- alive -- on board the sub, will he try to sabotage the 
Americans' chances? Will the good guys win out in the end? Don't worry; 
you don't have to answer those questions.
So yes, the plot developments in "U-571" are awfully predictable. They 
also happen at reasonable times, and nothing is overly contrived. When a 
young sailor has to display some selfless heroism, it happens at the 
right time. When the Nazi gets his comeuppance, it happens at the right 
time. Once it gets past the fairly quick character introductions and 
becomes focused the accomplishment of a simple goal, "U-571" is 
astoundingly well-paced. It's also Hollywood entertainment, which means 
that it should not be confused with a history lesson. Controversy has 
arisen about the film's decision to depict the main heroes as Americans, 
despite the fact that the first Enigma machines were actually captured 
by the British Navy. The film does include some end credit title cards 
to document these achievements, so it's at least managed to cover its 
bases, but to me, this controversy seems like much ado about nothing. Is 
anybody going to mistake "U-571" for a factual document? I hope not.
It's easy to complain about historical inaccuracies in an action film, 
just as it's easy to snipe at cardboard characters and a thin plot. In 
fact, after watching "U-571," there isn't a whole lot to say in its 
favor, at least not from a quantitative standpoint. I found that the 
film fell apart quite easily upon even a cursory reflection. But therein 
lay my problem: I was *thinking* too much. "U-571" is not the kind of 
film you have in-depth discussions on; it's the kind of film you watch 
and appreciate how much the armrest-grabbing suspense and spectacular 
action is making you forget you're watching trash. You're not in a movie 
theater; you're 200 meters below the surface, much deeper than the 
submarine was meant to go, the Nazis are dropping depth charges on your 
head, and you're scared as hell. That's where "U-571" shines. Jonathan 
Mostow hasn't made an intelligent, thought-provoking film out of 
"U-571," but he didn't try to. He just wanted to give us two hours of 
solid entertainment. That he has.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring Jim Carrey, Renee Zellweger, Robert Forster, Chris
Cooper, Anthony Anderson, Mongo Brownlee, Jerod Mixon, Michael Bowman,
Traylor Howard, Tony Cox. Written by Peter Farrelly, Mike Cerrone, and
Bobby Farrelly. Directed by Bobby Farrelly and Peter Farrelly. Rated R.
It seemed like the perfect concept. What better for the Farrelly
Brothers, famous for writing and directing comedies with offensive
subject matter, than to make a movie about a guy with a split
personality? It's exactly the sort of thing the Brothers relish:
poking fun at something serious (in this case mental illness), throwing
all care to the wind to get a laugh. Jim Carrey's signed on too?
Even better. The National Alliance for the Mentally Ill even helped out
by levying complaints against the Brothers' new film before its
opening, claiming it was misrepresenting the condition of split
personality, labeling it incorrectly as "schizophrenia," and so forth.
Such a protest seemed like just the sort of thing that would, of course,
only add more fuel to the Farrelly Brothers' fire, proving that
some people just couldn't take a joke, and that the Farrellys would
be helping the more enlightened viewers to yet another dose of their
brilliantly subversive comedy.
Yes, it all seemed perfect, but one thing went wrong: Their movie
isn't funny.
It's not for lack of trying. The Farrellys utilize in "Me, Myself &
Irene" their most high-concept premise ever: Carrey plays Charlie
Baileygaites, a man who after being dumped by his wife for a midget limo
driver, decides to bury all his aggressive feelings deep down inside and
never release them. This, of course, means all his neighbors exploit his
entirely too-forgiving nature, making his job as a Rhode Island state
trooper increasingly difficult. Soon enough, Charlie's repressed
aggression manifests itself into a second, independent personality named
Hank, a deep-voiced, boorish ogre unafraid of taking the assertive
actions his predecessor had been unable to muster. This guy isn't
above crashing a car through the wall of the barber shop in which
he's been insulted, or holding a little girl's head
underwater because she refused to stop jump-roping in the street.
Then things start getting lost in the most complicated plot the Farrellys
have ever attempted, and the film runs off its tracks. Some have
suggested that this isn't a problem, because the Farrelly
Brothers' brand of humor doesn't require plot to work.
They're wrong, of course: Plot was greatly instrumental in building
up the kind of rollicking comic energy that infused the Farrellys'
last effort, 1996's "There's Something About Mary."
(1999's "Outside Providence" was technically an earlier project.)
The brothers' earlier film wasn't funny merely because it
contained outrageous gags (despite what some newsmagazine articles would
have you believe), but rather because its most outrageous gags were
entirely unexpected. In "Mary," the Farrellys managed several times to
pull off a neat sleight-of-hand trick: They'd have you thinking the
story was going one way, then reveal its real direction in delightfully
surprising fashion.
"Me, Myself & Irene," by contrast, seems to have been made by folks who
looked at "Mary" and saw only the surface grossness, missing all of the
subtle machinations that really made it work. Having been produced by the
same guys who made "Mary," "Irene" seems like an even bigger
disappointment. The brothers pile on the offensive humor, taking shots at
race, midgets, albinos, mental illness, and all manner of bathroom jokes.
But they haven't come up with a way to make any of it fresh most
of "Me, Myself & Irene" comes off as rote, by-the-numbers, adolescent
comedy. The plot, with Carrey forced to drive alleged fugitive Irene P.
Waters (Renee Zellweger), who's in more trouble than anyone knows,
back to New York, has an ending that's entirely predictable from
the get-go. (Think Charlie and Irene will fall in love? Yeah, me too.)
The Farrellys then introduce scores of different characters, and none of
them ever manage to do anything you haven't already expected them
to do, no matter how outrageous their actions might be. Compared to the
curveballs the Farrellys are used to throwing, this stuff is almost
entirely soft-tossed, presenting an obvious problem: When gross-out humor
loses its shock value, it's no longer funny, merely gross.
The jokes that do work are milked over and over until their effectiveness
runs dry. Take, for example, the subplot involving Charlie's three
Black sons (Anthony Anderson, Mongo Brownlee, Jerod Mixon). The
incongruity of it all is funny for a while, with three burly Black men
discussing higher math in ghetto language and white-bread Carrey mouthing
said language with an entirely too-pleasant smile on his face. But by the
end of the film, they're still doing the same schitck it
hasn't been elevated to another, funnier level, and it hasn't
been dropped either. That's too bad, because it ceases to be
amusing about halfway through. "Me, Myself & Irene" reeks of wasted
opportunities. There ought to be more focus on how other people react to
Charlie's new personality, and on how Charlie deals with the
consequences of Hank's actions. This doesn't really happen
nearly every supporting character learns about Charlie's condition
early on, so they don't have any opportunity to be surprised by it.
The film throws what looks like a patented Farrelly curve in a scene
towards the midway point (involving an albino companion Charlie and Irene
pick up called, appropriately, "Whitey"), but the script doesn't go
anywhere with it, instead leaving the thread twisting in the wind before
awkwardly tying it up during the climax.
Jim Carrey is a gifted comedian, both physically and vocally, but
he's left with nothing much to do here except contort himself in a
manner similar to Steve Martin in "All of Me." It's a great
showcase of flexibility and split-second role-shifting, but none of it is
terribly funny. Carrey doesn't pull any stunts we don't
expect him to pull, and the Farrellys' script doesn't give
him anything else to pull: The situations in which he must perform the
role-shifting aren't set up in any meaningful way. Perhaps Carrey
can take solace in the fact that his supporting actors fare no better.
Zellweger's Irene is not a strong female lead Mary in "Mary" may
have been part adolescent fantasy, but she was also intelligent and
strong-willed. Irene is nothing in particular, as the film never makes
clear whether she's ditzy, clever, or neither. As such, she gives
us nothing to latch onto as the only "sane" person in the film. Chris
Cooper is stuck playing exactly one note as a corrupt FBI agent, and his
character is entirely too straight-laced for a movie like this. He, like
the others, does absolutely nothing unexpected.
After viewing the shapeless mess that "Me, Myself & Irene" eventually
dissolved into, I was stuck wondering whether or not the Farrellys had
outsmarted themselves. Maybe their kind of comedy can only work for so
long until audiences get wise to it and stop being shocked. But I
don't believe it -- good filmmakers find ways of surprising their
audiences even after people have grown attuned to their style. If the
Farrellys are indeed good, smart filmmakers (and I still think they are),
they'll rebound just fine. Even after that happens, though,
I'll still consider "Me, Myself & Irene" to be a high-caliber
misfire.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring John Travolta, Madeline Stowe, James Cromwell, Timothy Hutton,
James Woods, Leslie Stefanson, Daniel von Bargen, Clarence Williams III.
Screenplay by Christopher Bertolini and William Goldman.
Directed by Simon West.
Rated R.
Actors love this stuff. They love to dress up as army guys, stand really
straight, and salute a lot. I mean, it made the careers of such actors as
Louis Gossett Jr. and George C. Scott, while somehow making Demi Moore look
like a respectable actress. This time, John Travolta tries it in "The
General's Daughter," a movie that desperately wants to be a Tom Clancy
adaptation, but falls just short of stuff like "A Clear and Present Danger"
and "Patriot Games." Travolta? Well, he's no Harrison Ford, but he's pretty
good. Too bad the story isn't given the same effort as Travolta gives to his
performance. Otherwise, we'd have a nice little political thriller here.
Travolta plays Sgt. Paul Brenner, an investigator for the military currently
working on an undercover mission to bust a weapons shipment to the leader of
a militia. While on the mission, he meets Elisabeth Campbell (Leslie
Stefanson), a pretty young officer working in the army's psychology
department. After Brenner finishes his original mission, he is called out on
another job, which has Elisabeth dead, bound, and naked in an army training
ground, the apparent victim of rape and strangulation. Brought in to help
Brenner with the investigation is Sarah Sunhill (Madeline Stowe), a rape
expert with whom Brenner has had a romantic past. Further complicating
matters is the fact that Elisabeth is the daughter of respected General
Joseph Campbell (James Cromwell), under whom Brenner served in Vietnam and
who wants the matter kept entirely within the military. Brenner and Sunhill
discover that there is more to the murder than simple rape, as they find
that Elisabeth was involved in sadomasochistic sexual activity, and has more
than her share of skeletons in the closet.
The strongest part of "The General's Daughter" is that all the actors give
enthusiastic performances. Travolta does his best to emulate Harrison Ford,
playing the man with unshakable moral character who must fight for what's
right while everyone else tells him to keep his nose out of it. While he's
not nearly as compelling as Ford was in "A Clear and Present Danger," he
still does a respectable job of carrying the film. He hits the right note in
most scenes and delivers one-liners with fine comic timing. His scenes with
James Woods, playing Elisabeth's teacher who obviously knows more than he's
letting on, are among the best in the movie. Woods' character is a
psychological expert, and Travolta matches him line for line as the two go
through a nicely-written little psychological battle. James Cromwell now
seems to be making a living of playing seedy high-ranking officers with
plenty to hide. After his role in "L.A. Confidential," he's up to his
villainous old tricks here. We're not sure if he's the killer, but there is
little doubt that he had something to do with it. Madeline Stowe, being the
woman, is (not surprisingly) underwritten. These movies just aren't made for
female actors. She has little more to do than follow Travolta around and
make vague allusions to some romantic rendezvous they had years ago. Won't
the writers please give her more to do?
Veteran screenwriter William Goldman was brought in on this project to spice
up the dialogue, and it shows. There are plenty of clever one-liners and
scene-closing zingers in "The General's Daughter." While Goldman may have
gone a bit overboard by ending practically every scene with a snappy joke,
his dialogue is quite good in most scenes. Now, one would think that snappy
dialogue and above-average performances would make for a great movie, but
they don't, because the story is not nearly up to par. What's wrong with it?
First off, the whole thing is pretty routine and, at times, downright silly.
Bad guys are bad guys and good guys are good guys. While we are at no time
certain who the killer is, there is no doubt who was involved. The film runs
into a problem near the end when, after throwing us red herring after red
herring about the identity of the killer, it suddenly has to decide on
someone, and the decision left me somewhat nonplused. The choice seemed
rather arbitrary and was not explained terribly well, a surprise after the
movie has held our hand most of the way through, explaining in great detail
exactly what is going on, and leaving nothing to the imagination. The film
also gets into trouble because of that very dedication to detail. We see the
events of Elisabeth's rape in harsh and unnecessary flashbacks, while her
naked corpse is left out in the open for an awfully long time. I thought it
was standard procedure to cover up the body at a murder scene. In "The
General's Daughter," it is apparently not. Not only that, but most of the
major revelations come in a sort of "Whoops, I found a clue" fashion.
Brenner is constantly noticing things out of the corner of his eye, and
after a while it becomes annoying.
Director Simon West keeps the film moving quickly, if nothing else, but his
direction is far too obvious when it comes to setting the tone for a scene.
There are "meaningful looks" galore in "The General's Daughter." Travolta
walks into a bar and it seems that everyone, even the extras, is glaring at
him. West's attempts to set "mood lighting" only give the impression that
someone forgot to pay the lighting bill. Nobody ever has a well-lit
basement, apartment, or office in a movie like this, and for some reason the
investigators decide to drop in on the crime scene in the dead of night. The
director, along with the screenwriters, also allows random subplots to
disappear at whim. A bit about a meddling local sheriff ends up being used
only as comic relief. The story of Brenner and Sunhill's relationship goes
nowhere, and it becomes clear that it was only mentioned to set up romantic
"tension" between the two, not to develop their characters.
"The General's Daughter" is obviously not trying to win any points for
originality, but at least it could have tried to tell us something new.
Instead, we get mixed messages about women in the military and corruption of
high-ranking officers, nothing that we didn't already see done much better
in "G.I. Jane," or any number of Tom Clancy adaptations. It's too bad that
the story doesn't provide better punch, because this film has a few things
going for it: (1) It's mercifully short (after sitting through oppressively
long films of this genre, a two-hour running time is a blessing), (2) it
boasts an A-list cast, and (3) it has plenty of good dialogue. With those
things going for it, "The General's Daughter" stood a good chance of being
an intriguing military drama. With such a formulaic and obvious plot,
however, it stands as a mediocre entry into the realm of political
thrillers.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Year: 2000.
Starring Gary Sinise, Tim Robbins, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Jerry O'
Connell, Kim Delaney, Elise Neal, Peter Outerbridge, Armin 
Mueller-Stahl.
Written by Lowell Cannon (story), Jim Thomas & John Thomas (story &
screenplay), Graham Yost (screenplay).
Directed by Brian De Palma.
Rated PG.
There should be a requirement that a potential viewer be under a
certain film IQ in order to see "Mission to Mars." There are probably
quite a few people who are going to enjoy it, and most of them will
probably be those who have seen very few films of its kind. But there
are those who will not, and those will most likely be people who have
already seen one or more of the following movies: "2001: A Space
Odyssey," "Armageddon," "Apollo 13," "The Abyss," "Close Encounters of
the Third Kind," "E.T. the Extra-Terrestrial," "Alien," and "Aliens."
Why? Because there is not one original idea in "Mission to Mars." All
of it is cribbed from other films (and in most cases, better
films). If this is the sort of thing you don't mind, you might like
the film. Of course, there are other reasons not to like "Mission to
Mars," the main one being a script written by people who seem to
assume their audience is filled with people who haven't used their
brains in some time, and who don't intend to start during the film's
running time. "Mission to Mars" manages to be both stupid and boring
at the same time.
The plot, cribbed greatly from "2001," concerns a team sent to Mars,
the first manned trip ever made to the red planet. Luke Graham (Don
Cheadle) leads the team, jointly formed of Americans and Russians. The
team encounters a mysterious monolith that emits a strange pulse (this
being nothing like the pulse-emitting monolith in "2001" -- that one
was on the *moon*), but when they try to study it, a giant sand
tornado comes out of the top and swallows them (all except Luke, who
survives long enough to send a garbled message back to the rotating
space station, which looks strangely like the rotating space station
in "2001"). A rescue mission is planned with husband & wife team Woody
Blake (Tim Robbins) and Terri Fisher (Connie Nielsen), obligatory
pilot with a troubled past Jim McConnell (Gary Sinise), and extra crew
member Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell) along for the ride.  After some
zero-gravity dancing, they run into problems when one of their engines
is blown, forcing them to attempt a desperate landing aboard a supply
vessel. Now stranded on Mars with minimal supplies, the team must
decide whether or not it can risk entering the monolith or if they
should return home. After all, that monolith just might contain
information about how life originated on Earth.
"Mission to Mars" is one of those films that makes a critic wonder
where to start when talking about all the things that are wrong with
it, so let's start with one of the things that does work: Director
Brian De Palma manages to create some eerie tension in a few scenes
during the middle of the film.  That's it. Everything else fails. The
failure isn't De Palma's fault; he's working from an atrocious
script. Only during the sequence aboard the ship (looking an awful lot
like the Jupiter vessel in "2001") where the rescue team's air begins
running out and they must frantically search for the hole and patch it
up does "Mission to Mars" come to life. A scene where they attempt to
save a comrade floating away into space also provides some tension,
until you realize that the entire danger/more danger/attempted rescue
sequence has absolutely nothing to do with the rest of the film; it's
just a contrived way to generate thrilling scenes. Take it out, and
the plot isn't affected in any way. The sequence also suffers from a
few plot holes (as does the rest of the film): Why is the ship's
computer (which sounds strangely like HAL from, uh, "2001") able to
detect a hole in the main chamber but not one in the engine? Why did
Tim Robbins' character have to go outside the ship when the solution
easily presented itself from inside?  Shouldn't the astronauts be
better trained to deal with a hull breach?
Why are the characters such idiots? Because the script makes little
attempt to properly develop them. All the "conflict" is clumsily
delivered in excruciatingly obvious exposition in the opening scene
(which rips off Orson Welles and Robert Altman by utilizing a long
opening tracking shot) during which the characters repeatedly tell
each other about things all of them should already know: "Jim, it's
too bad you can't go on this mission because you were determined
'psychologically inadequate' because your wife died right before you
were to go on the mission together" -- does anyone really talk like
this? Can't we find out these things in a less grating matter, like
maybe in a flashback? The whole film is like that. The filmmakers are
not content to merely show us something and assume we know what's
going on; they must *tell* us exactly what we're looking at *every*
time.
That exchange isn't actually in "Mission to Mars," but I wouldn't be
surprised if it were. For all their cribbing from Kubrick, Spielberg,
James Cameron, and even Ron Howard, the makers of this film haven't
learned to do something all those directors did very well: show and
don't tell. De Palma used to know how, but seems to have
forgotten. This is mentally-challenged filmmaking; they assume the
audience won't get what's going on, so they explain everything five
times over. Fourth-graders may appreciate this, but more learned
viewers will have their intelligence insulted.
The principal actors sleepwalk their way through "Mission to Mars,"
never managing to do away with an apparent "I'm just here to get a
paycheck" attitude. Cheadle stumbles over his awkward lines. Armin
Mueller-Stahl manages to thoroughly embarrass himself in an unbilled
cameo. Robbins puts his game face on and phones in his standard
"decent guy" performance.  And Sinise hams it up with "wistful" facial
expressions while watching tapes of his dead wife (played by Kim
Delaney, who only has one scene during which she still manages to
deliver some ridiculous dialogue in a heavy-handed monologue about the
meaning of life), and especially during the
stolen-from-no-less-than-three-movies (a lollipop to whoever names
them) conclusion, which combines endless, obvious explanation and
sub-par CGI effects with gagging sentimentality and is sure to
alienate any viewers who had been enjoying the show up until then. And
of course, these aliens from Mars who facilitated the evolution of
life on Earth are entirely different from the aliens in "2001" who
facilitated the evolution of life on Earth; those aliens were from an
*unknown* world.
It could be said that fans of brainless action films might enjoy
"Mission to Mars," but such a comment ignores the fact that the film
is also incredibly slow-going. Leisurely pacing might have helped a
film with a little more substance to it, but all of the substance of
"Mission to Mars" has been stolen from other films, and those other
films dealt with their ideas in a much more thoughtful fashion and
generally contained more engaging characters. Supposedly we're
intended to choke up when one character decides not to return home at
the end of this one (totally different from the
one-character-decides-not-to-return ending of "Armageddon"), but I
suspect most people will either be laughing or groaning. Me, I
alternated between the two. There is only one good thing about the way
"Mission to Mars" finally ends: the fact that the movie is over.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Man on the Moon (1999)
Year: 1999
Starring Jim Carrey, Danny DeVito, Courtney Love, Paul Giamatti, Vincent
Schiavelli, Peter Bonerz, Jerry Lawler, Gerry Becker, Leslie Lyles
Written by Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski
Directed by Milos Forman
Rated R
Perhaps the best question to ask of a biographical film on the late comedian
Andy Kaufman is whether or not it finds Kaufman's true essence, if it helps
you discover what Andy was really like. It is indeed ironic that "Man on the
Moon" does exactly the opposite-and may be better off for it. Milos Forman's
biopic on the mercurial performer doesn't claim to get a handle on what made
Kaufman tick. It offers up suggestions and possibilities, but can't quite
arrive at a conclusion. Why might this be a good thing? Because "Man on the
Moon" has few pretensions. The film doesn't take one tack on Andy Kaufman
and call it the ultimate truth; rather, it explains his ultimate mystery. No
one knew who Andy was, not even his closest friends. What "Man on the Moon"
displays is how Kaufman's comedy affected others, his friends, co-workers,
and audiences. Aided by an astonishing performance by Jim Carrey in the lead
role, Forman's rendition of this is impressively entertaining and strangely
affecting.
Carrey plays Andy Kaufman, the late comedian whose life "Man on the Moon"
chronicles. The film shows Andy as a showman from the start, "performing" to
the characters on the wallpaper of his childhood bedroom. We then flash
forward to Andy as a young man, performing in local nightclubs. Told by one
owner that he must do a more conventional act, Andy replies he doesn't want
to go for cheap laughs and refuses to merely "tell jokes." He gets his break
when he goes on stage pretending to be a shy foreign man bumbling through
his act-until he launches into a smashing Elvis impersonation that
thoroughly impresses talent scout George Shapiro (Danny DeVito), who lands
him appearances on "Saturday Night Live" and a plum role on the TV sitcom
"Taxi" doing his foreign-man shtick as Latka, the lovable mechanic. Kaufman,
however, treats his regular job almost as a chore, merely a vehicle he can
use to pursue more creative endeavors. With the help of his friend and
writing partner Bob Zmuda (Paul Giamatti) and eventual girlfriend (who meets
Andy initially by accepting his challenge to a wrestling match) Lynne
Marguiles (Courtney Love), Andy creates the repulsive lounge singer
character Tony Clifton (for whom Andy demands appearances on "Taxi," with
disastrous results), fools with the sketch-comedy show "Fridays," takes up
pro wrestling as "Inter-gender Champion," getting into a fight with
fan-favorite Jerry Lawler, and plays Carnegie Hall. Kaufman's life was
tragically cut short in 1984 by a rare form of lung cancer. He was 35.
"Man on the Moon" clearly leans on how well Carrey performs in the lead
role, and fortunately, he is fantastic. For a lifelong comedian who has
spent almost his entire career mugging for the camera, this is an impressive
accomplishment. Carrey truly embodies the character and spirit of Andy
Kaufman. It's hard to explain. Certainly the actor does a fine job of
imitating Kaufman's stunts. His Clifton impression is dead-on, his SNL
"Mighty Mouse" singalong could easily be mistaken for the real thing, and
his "feud" with Lawler that came to a head on David Letterman's "Late Night"
is surprisingly convincing. But that's all imitation-impressive, but not
indicative of a real performance. What Carrey really does well is to
convince the audience that they are not watching a Jim Carrey movie. Without
a doubt, we are always watching a movie about Andy Kaufman, not a movie
about Jim Carrey playing Andy Kaufman. This is a real leap for Carrey. His
star vehicles ("Ace Ventura," "The Mask," "Dumb and Dumber") were exactly
that: means for Carrey to show off, whether you found him amusing or not.
"The Truman Show" gave us some sign of him breaking out of this rut, but it
was still a role that required him to mug, since he was playing a famous TV
star whose life has been constructed to get precisely those reactions out of
him. Here, he cannot do his usual act. He must convincingly embody another
person. For my money, he did as good a job as anyone could have done.
The supporting performers turn in solid turns as Kaufman's closest
companions. DeVito comes off well as George Shapiro, though the role seems
to hamper the later recreation of "Taxi" scenes, since he can't reprise his
part on that show. I liked seeing Paul Giamatti as Bob Zmuda. The man is a
talented character actor who does more good work here. Courtney Love's part
is surprisingly small, almost to the point of becoming the dreaded
Superfluous Love Interest. To her credit, Love doesn't overact and doesn't
distract, accepting her limited role gracefully. What could have been a
major annoyance barely registers. Several star cameos show up in
reenactments of Kaufman's antics. Judd Hirsch, Marilu Henner, Christopher
Lloyd, and Carol Kane make appearances as "Taxi" cast members. Real former
pro wrestler and current broadcaster Jerry Lawler appears in a rather large
part, and does fairly good screen work, to my surprise. A scene where he and
Kaufman explain their act to George Shapiro is priceless. Current WWF
commentator Jim Ross also appears, to no one's surprise, as a wrestling
announcer. Along to recreate the "Late Night" fight are Letterman himself
and bandleader Paul Shaffer. SNL producer Lorne Michaels also plays himself.
Seeing these now more grizzled stars playing younger versions of themselves
is a bit jarring at first, but not hard to get used to.
"Man on the Moon" refuses to be a conventional biopic. Many will go into the
film expecting to get some kind of great insight into Kaufman's life. Why
was he the way he was? Why did he choose to pursue such a career, and why
did that career take such unusual turns? "Man on the Moon" doesn't know. It
doesn't claim to know. In many other films, this could be seen as a cop-out,
but Forman's film is not, because it explains exactly why this approach has
been taken. There are several telling exchanges between Kaufman and his
business partners, friends, and lover. When Lynne tells Andy "There is no
real you," the film's vision has become clear. No one knew who Andy Kaufman
was. If you're looking for insight into that, you've come to the wrong
place. What "Man on the Moon" claims is that Andy was all out there in his
performances, but you had to figure out where that was.
Andy was not a comedian; he was a showman, a man seeking to get people's
attention, to see their reaction to his performances. Some got it, some didn
't, and if you're going to appreciate his brand of "comedy," you had to
first understand what he was trying to do. Explaining this is where "Man on
the Moon" really succeeds, because it starts out with perhaps the most
clever opening of the year: Carrey comes out, brandishing Kaufman's
wide-eyed stare and tells the people in his Latka voice that since so much
of it was false, he had to cut the movie so much that there was no movie
left. He then plays his mini record player and begins rolling the credits.
After a bit of silence, Andy returns and says that was to clear out all the
people who wouldn't understand. This is Forman's way of letting you know
that this will be a story told on Andy's terms, not one to give us a
sentimental picture of his life, but one that will leave us guessing. Andy
often had people so turned around that they didn't know if he was performing
or being serious. When he read "The Great Gatsby" in its entirety to a
theater full of rowdy college students, only those who stuck around really
"got" the joke. Not many cast members got the joke when Tony Clifton trashed
the "Taxi" set. Not many women got the joke when he put himself up as a
misogynist wrestler. Even when he was diagnosed with cancer, no one believed
him.
Likewise a whole lot of people won't really get "Man on the Moon." There is
sure to be a whole lot of disappointment coming from audiences viewing this
film. Some might see it as a mere chronology of Kaufman's life and career,
pointless and empty. Others might think Kaufman was a repulsive person, not
worthy of having a feature film based on his life. But "Man on the Moon" is
really Andy's final performance, his final refusal to play by the rules and
give the people what they think is best. The irony here is that everyone who
is disappointed with this film, everyone who didn't get what they expected,
are those that would be clowned by Andy consistently. So a lot of people are
going to dislike Forman's film. So what? George Shapiro complained to Andy
after a performance, "They hated you out there." And Andy said just what he'
d say about this film: "That means we're a success."
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Shaft (2000)

*** out of ****
Year: 2000. Starring Samuel L. Jackson, Vanessa L. Williams, Christian 
Bale, Jeffrey Wright, Busta Rhymes, Toni Collette, Dan Hedaya, Ruben 
Santiago-Hudson, Richard Roundtree. Written by John Singleton & Shane 
Salerno (story) and Richard Price (story & screenplay). Directed by John 
Singleton. Rated R.
Coolness is hard to attain. It's really not something you can learn: 
Richard Nixon spent much of his administration trying to figure out how 
to be cool, and he failed miserably. What's worse, he wasn't the only 
one. No matter what they do, there are some people that just can't be 
cool. Martha Stewart can't be cool. Barry Manilow can't be cool. Pat 
Boone, despite his most bizarre efforts, can't be cool. John Shaft, on 
the other hand, was one cool motherf***er. He was played by Richard 
Roundtree, and Richard Roundtree is cool. The new edition is played by 
Samuel L. Jackson, and Samuel L. Jackson can't help but be cool. His 
Shaft 2000, nephew to the original, fights a war against all the 
seriously uncool enemies trying to bring him down. The bad guys might 
claim money or racism as their reasons for going after Shaft, but make 
no mistake; the bad guys are against Shaft because they're jealous of 
his ultimate coolness. Can you dig it?
Shaft 2000 is most definitely a new Shaft; this film goes to great 
lengths to explain that Jackson's John Shaft is the nephew of Richard 
Roundtree's original, and *not* the same guy. He's angrier, perfectly 
willing to punch a suspect in the nose right in front of all his 
supervisors. His sense of humor is a bit stronger: he enjoys making 
threatening movements towards criminals, watching them jump, and 
laughing at them. He's also been updated for the new millennium. Uncle 
was a "sex machine to all the chicks," but the new guy was obviously 
brought up with a slightly more modern worldview. He respects women and 
keeps his distance, though he doesn't mind a bit of flirting now and 
then. This is a good choice -- the 1970's Shaft held a rather cavalier 
attitude towards sex that simply wouldn't fly in today's HIV-infected 
society. Shaft 2000 may be a flaming heterosexual, but he's not stupid. 
Secondly, a "sex-machine" version of Shaft wouldn't work with Jackson in 
the role. We all know Jackson is an actor of many talents: his line 
readings are perfect, making even the clumsiest passage of dialogue 
bearable, and when he's really on (as in the scripture-quoting scene in 
"Pulp Fiction"), his unmatched intensity can galvanize an audience like 
no other. Jackson, in most ways, is a far better actor than Roundtree 
ever was. But Roundtree had something that can't be taught: sexual 
allure. He has it; Jackson doesn't.
Therefore I find it amusing to read several critics expending great 
energy writing long-winded analyses that all boil down to one complaint: 
not enough sex. If this were a remake, I'd see where they were coming 
from, but "Shaft 2000" is very much a sequel, and as such, the new Shaft 
is in no way required to mimic his predecessor. Director John Singleton 
has gone on record as saying that he wanted to update "Shaft," and it's 
a good idea. The original 1971 film has many good elements, but it's 
also badly dated. Nowadays, it exists mainly as a cinematic relic, 
historically important to the development of black film, but not 
terribly relevant to contemporary society. The 2000 version updates the 
dialogue and attitudes, but keeps the issues that made "Shaft" and its 
fellow blaxploitation movies important.
Shaft is still a character that fights not only against criminals, but 
against an indefinite, institutionalized force. While his superiors make 
thinly-veiled racist remarks to him, Shaft watches a rich white punk 
(Christian Bale, in a one-dimensional, but effective, performance) get 
away with killing a young black man because of his wealthy connections. 
Shaft vows to bring him to justice, quitting the police force. But he's 
now got to contend with crooked cops, a local crime boss, calling 
himself Peoples (Jeffrey Wright, strangely compelling despite a 
caricatured accent), who wants to expand his drug trade uptown, and an 
eyewitness who won't testify in court out of fear for her life (Toni 
Collette). Singer Vanessa Williams and rapper Busta Rhymes give Shaft 
support as, respectively, an old partner and a loudmouth Rastafarian 
sidekick.
As in most action movies, "Shaft 2000" draws up a very clear line 
between who is a "good guy" and who is a "bad guy." Here, it could not 
be simpler: the good guys are cool and the bad guys are not. Shaft is 
cool, obviously. Ditto Uncle Shaft (the original, played again by 
Roundtree). Other characters are cool by their willingness to hang with 
Shaft. The bad guys, meanwhile, couldn't be cool if their lives depended 
on it. Christian Bale's character may have lots of money, but he 
wouldn't know coolness if it jumped up and bit him in the ass. He's 
thoroughly outclassed in a restaurant by the young man he eventually 
murders, and watching him stroll through the 'hood, with his cap pulled 
forward and his collar turned up, he could not be more of a square. 
Peoples wants to be cool, but his goofy accent and even goofier 
entourage keep him from attaining his goal. Dan Hedaya plays half of a 
crooked-cop team, and there's no way this guy can be cool. He played 
*Nixon* (in 1999's "Dick"), for God's sake! Shaft, meanwhile, thrives on 
cool; he does things a person of lesser cool wouldn't even bother 
trying. His coolness makes him invincible. What else then do we require 
of an action hero? Shaft is ideal because nothing fazes him. Under 
pressure, he always keeps his head.
All of this is neatly packaged by director Singleton. The plot is simple 
and easily comprehensible, the action scenes are exciting, and there are 
bits of humor spread here and there to keep things from getting too 
somber (Busta Rhymes provides the most amusing moments). So what if the 
conclusion seems to come straight out of nowhere in particular, and the 
characters' motivations are about as subtle as a shovel to the forehead? 
What really matters is that the new John Shaft stands as a fine example 
of how to be a cool action hero. As for his movie, it's cool too.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Talented Mr. Ripley, The (1999)
Identity is a tricky thing. Many of us would like to think we have a single
identity, that it causes us to always act a certain way. But what Anthony
Minghella's latest film "The Talented Mr. Ripley," which was based on a
Patricia Highsmith novel, seems to explore is how "identity" can be whatever
one wants it to be at any particular moment. Its title character, Tom
Ripley, is a man of many voices, and a man with the kind of face everyone
recognizes, but can't really place. In short, he is a man whose identity may
be left open to dispute, and also a mentally unstable person who has few
qualms about killing those in his way. But what's disturbing about "The
Talented Mr. Ripley" isn't the murder. It's the fact that when seeing it
from Tom Ripley's perspective, it all makes a whole lot of sense.
The film opens with Ripley (Matt Damon) playing piano for several wealthy
members of the New York social scene. Fooled by his Princeton blazer,
Herbert Greenleaf (James Rebhorn), takes a liking to the charming young man,
who he believes went to school with his son Dickie. Being a lower-class boy,
Tom doesn't know what he's talking about, but decides to play along. Soon,
Greenleaf asks Tom to go to Europe, find Dickie, and convince him to come
home. When Tom finds Dickie (Jude Law), he is lounging around Italy with his
jet-setter girlfriend Marge (Gwyneth Paltrow). Dickie doesn't know Tom, but
thinks he might be an old college buddy he's forgotten. When Tom reveals his
father's plan, Dickie takes a special liking to the "talented" young man.
Soon, however, Dickie becomes bored with Tom's earnestness and wants to get
rid of him. Unfortunately, Tom doesn't want to give up the life he's come to
love. Thus begins a story in which Tom slowly but surely takes over Dickie's
identity, doing whatever necessary, including the occasional murder, to
maintain the illusion.
First and foremost, "The Talented Mr. Ripley" is a great-looking film. The
Italian locations, including Rome, Venice, and Naples, are filmed by
Minghella in sweeping, panoramic shots exhibiting the beauty of the
Mediterranean. The scenery is quite breathtaking. Minghella also engages in
some delightful Hitchcockian technique, beginning with throwback opening
credits that split the screen into shards as Ripley's face is first
revealed. More startling visuals can be had in Minghella's creative camera
positioning, including some very interesting use of mirrors, and in the way
he and his editor move between scenes, with unconventional wipes and fades
being the norm. All of this goes toward indicating the film's central idea
of Tom Ripley having a confused identity. There are several shots of a
mirror placed in front of Tom or Dickie, replacing the other's image.
Likewise, Tom is forced to look at himself in the mirror on several
occasions-an old trick often used when a character questions his identity or
motives, but effective nonetheless.
Minghella's film also boasts an impressive cast, all of which turn in solid
performances. Damon manages to put aside his so-called "boyish" charm and
turn it into something far more sinister. He smiles constantly, but not with
that cute, fleeting half-smile used by so many of today's teen heartthrobs.
Instead, Damon breaks out a huge, toothy grin so picture-perfect that when
he flashes it for the sixth or seventh time, it starts looking awfully
scary. During their screen time together, co-star Jude Law matches Damon
easily. His Dickie is a user, one who picks up friends everywhere he goes
until he gets bored with them, after which they are promptly forgotten. He
represents the most disgusting aspects of the "idle rich," taking material
wealth and a ring of friends for granted. Despite all this, it's not hard to
see how a man like Ripley could become enamored of a man like Dickie. He
lives a life of ease, one in which pleasure seems to find him, rather than
the other way around. Likewise, it's not hard to understand when Tom takes a
rather violent objection to his eventual "dumping." Gwyneth Paltrow is
solid, if unspectacular, in a role that starts off large, but turns up only
intermittently in the film's second half. Cate Blanchett shows up in a part
created exclusively for the film as an idle rich American girl who meets Tom
at the airport, believing him to be Dickie, and Philip Seymour Hoffman plays
Dickie's obnoxious friend Freddie, who turns out to be quite a bit smarter
than he looks. Both of the supporting actors deliver outstanding
performances, with Hoffman offering up some particularly good scene-chewing.
As played by this actor, Freddie is a character you can't take your eyes off
of, and every one of Hoffman's facial ticks and gestures indicates all we
need to know about his motives.
Fine performances, beautiful scenery, and artful direction notwithstanding,
there are problems with "The Talented Mr. Ripley" that I find difficult to
let pass without mention. First off, many of Minghella's "improvements" over
the novel (knowledge of which is gained purely from hearsay; I've never read
it) don't seem to help much at all. First of all, Minghella makes quite sure
that we all know Tom feels really, really bad about all the horrible things
he's done. This may help towards creating a more well-rounded character, but
often it's hard to look at Tom and not think, "If he hates it so much, why
doesn't he just stop?" I'm willing to hazard a guess that the film would
have been far more disturbing with a killer who completely rationalizes all
his crimes and feels little remorse afterward. Actively trying to garner
sympathy for Tom Ripley doesn't quite work. The addition of Blanchett's
character also makes the question of Tom's sexuality a bit muddled, thought
I really don't have a problem with that. The real problem with the character
is that she, like many of Minghella's changes, helps draw out the film's
ending unnecessarily. The movie is just too long. As a general rule, I don't
like saying this, because I have no problem with long movies in principle
(after all, "Magnolia" was over 3 hours long, and I loved that one). But
"Ripley" gets bogged down when Minghella has created more plot threads than
he knows what to do with. To put it simply, the first act of the film is
enthralling, a superb buildup to the first climax on a boat (you'll know it
when you see it), the second act interesting, if only for its machinations
on how Tom is going to get out of the mess he's created, while the final
half hour just leads us around in circles. I don't know why Tom has to get
into trouble by unlikely coincidence so many times (Blanchett's character
seems to exist solely for this purpose), only to have another similarly
unlikely coincidence get him out. Eventually, I started to wonder if all the
setup of Tom being such an accomplished con-man (with his clever wordplay
and voice impersonations) went all for naught when these coincidences, and
not his own cleverness, started getting him out of jams. Is Mr. Ripley
talented, or merely lucky?
Minghella is obviously trying to pay homage to Hitchcock here, and it's a
shame that he misses only one thing that Hitch knew: economy. A little
judicious snipping here and there would have made "The Talented Mr. Ripley"
a tighter film with clearer focus. Still, the issues raised by Minghella's
work must not be denied. The identity issue is at the forefront, and it is a
pertinent one. Yes, Tom Ripley runs around pretending to be another person
for a great deal of this film, and we must all agree that in our minds, this
is an unforgivable act. But there is a side of me thinking that Tom's
actions are a whole lot more understandable than they might seem at first
glance. After all, who among us does not change identity frequently, often
several times a day? We go to the office and carry ourselves one way. We go
home and carry ourselves another way. Are these not separate identities
residing in the same person? The only difference is that Tom Ripley has
another name to go along with his separate identity, which is a far more
interesting idea to base a movie on.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Year: 2000.
Starring Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed, 
Derek Jacobi, Djimon Hounsou, Richard Harris, David Schofield, John Shrapnel.
Written by David H. Franzoni, John Logan, and William Nicholson.
Directed by Ridley Scott.
Rated R.
"Gladiator" is silly, overblown, and shallow. Perfect. It's highly
flawed, with many glaring defects immediately visible. Lovely. It
represents the worst kind of Hollywood excess, great sums of money
thrown at something ultimately pointless. Yee-haw! At the risk of
having my "serious film critic" certification revoked, I'm also going
to have to say that "Gladiator" is fun. It kicks ass. It totally
rules, dude. This movie forced itself on me; it made me have fun in
spite of myself. That's not supposed to happen -- I'm supposed to be a
serious, studious, jaded film critic! I did not think that "Gladiator"
was the greatest movie ever, but I suspect many critics are having the
same reaction I did (and some to a much greater extent): "Gladiator"
is greater than the sum of its parts. It turns critics into
hypocrites. Cool, huh?
This is the story of Maximus (Russell Crowe), top general in the Roman
Army and favorite of the current, aging emperor (Richard
Harris). After a major victory, the emperor calls Maximus in and tells
him that he, and not the emperor's cowardly son Commodus (Joaquin
Phoenix), will be named heir to the throne. Maximus is stunned by this
news, but he requests to return to his family once his military duties
are over. The emperor begs him to think about the offer before making
a decision, and Maximus agrees.  Unfortunately, he never gets to make
that decision, because Commodus kills his father upon hearing the
news, and by making it look like a natural death, is able to claim
innocence. Since no one else knew about the late emperor's offer, the
throne goes to Commodus, and the new emperor's first decision is to
order death upon Maximus and his family. Maximus manages to escape his
execution and is sold into slavery, eventually ending up in the hands
of Proximo (Oliver Reed), a trainer of gladiators. Maximus vows to get
his revenge by fighting his way to Rome and killing the emperor, but
he must stay alive long enough to do so.
"Gladiator" can easily be nit-picked to death. There are a lot of
little things wrong with it. The dialogue, for example, is usually
functional and unassuming, but the odd unintentional knee-slapper does
sneak in. (The early "emotional" scene between Commodus and his father
elicited a few chuckles from the audience, though I don't think it was
supposed to.) Sometimes the heroism gets a little overblown: Does
everyone need to react in overblown emotional fashion to everything?
And the characters mostly remain shallow archetypes; there's not a
whole lot of development here. Maximus is a good, honest man with a
short fuse, while Commodus is a slimy, cowardly snake who calculates
behind closed doors. The screenwriters make a few lame attempts at
developing these two, but their attempts generally fall flat. A family
for Maximus? Great, but we never really get to know them. Commodus
shows signs of an incestuous relationship with his sister Lucilla
(Connie Nielsen)? That wasn't necessary; we already know he's a bad
guy.
But despite all these problems, "Gladiator" still manages to be an
enjoyable ride, and I think part of the reason is Crowe. He has easy
charisma, which is instantly perceivable to the audience as soon as he
steps in front of the camera. We *want* to root for him. Crowe has
that elusive Mel Gibson quality: He's attractive to both men and women
(for sometimes different -- and sometimes similar -- reasons), he has
a voice that can make even the most banal lines sound sincere, and the
more he gets beaten and bloodied, the more we love him. Even when the
script gets preposterous, Crowe keeps it grounded in humanity with his
naturally honest performance, bringing his character more sympathy
than the script afforded him. If the early audience reaction to
"Gladiator" is any indication, Crowe could have a long and prosperous
career ahead of him.
Ridley Scott directs the film with some efficiency; his only real
missteps are some befuddling decisions he makes on how to film
transitions. Shots of clouds moving rapidly across the sky look great
-- but they belong in another movie. Most of "Gladiator" is grimy,
earthy, and grounded. This means that when Scott tries for an ethereal
feel between scenes, it's jarring. But that's okay; the battle
sequences deliver the goods.  Desiring to create whirling dervishes of
action, Scott does away with long establishing shots here; you get a
quick set-up detailing who's fighting who, and then the camera starts
spinning. Some may find this disorienting, and I can't really blame
them: Sometimes it is hard to tell what's going on.  But that's pretty
much the point. Real gladiator battles probably weren't carefully
choreographed dances. They were ugly, brutal, and short.  Scott's
accomplishment is in finding split-second pauses in the chaos to
center on one beautiful image, suggesting everything that has gone on
before it, before moving on to the next bit of jumbled action. You get
a shot of a gladiator raising his spear, some whirling movement, and
then a shot of an impaled foe. Put the pieces together.
It's hard to figure out what makes "Gladiator" so darn fun to watch.
It's not particularly original; the story and events have largely been
stolen from "Spartacus" and "Braveheart." The acting, while good (I
particularly liked the supporting turns from Oliver Reed and Derek
Jacobi, as a sympathetic senator), doesn't really stand out. The
battle scenes are exhilarating, but nothing new. The political
intrigue does provide some points of interest, especially in the
comparisons of the gladiator games to modern spectacles, professional
wrestling in particular. For example, the central conflict could
parallel any number of recent WWF storylines, with Maximus the popular
anti-hero and Commodus the reviled heel who cannot defeat the hero
without first winning over the crowd. Scott even seems to be making a
point here about the whole spectacle: Marx's famous quote about
religion being the "opiate of the masses" fairly describes Scott's
attitude towards spectator sports. Commodus uses the games to keep the
people complacent while he seizes power for himself. At one point,
Maximus screams to the bloodthirsty crowd, "Are you entertained?!" Is
Scott suggesting the audience question their own responses to his
bloody battle scenes?  Perhaps.
But even the political intrigue and contemporary references aren't the
real focus of the film; "Gladiator" is plot-driven, not
theme-driven. And that brings up the same question: What makes
"Gladiator" good? Considering that no one single part of it really
stands out, it ought to come off as a fairly mediocre film. But for
some reason, it doesn't, and I think I know why: "Gladiator" is an
*epic*, in every sense of the word, making liberal use of modern
technology to produce a movie in the Old Hollywood style. Sure, it's
no "Spartacus." It's not even "Braveheart." But all the right elements
are here: A hero who falls, only to rise again. A villain who thinks
he has the upper hand, only to have his one mistake come back to bite
him. Romance, politics, action -- what more could you ask for?
"Gladiator" isn't groundbreaking, but it's good old-fashioned
entertainment.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Fight Club (1999)
"Fight Club" is a challenging piece of work, a film demanding that its
viewers look past what's on its surface and find something deeper. Certainly
those not used to thinking critically about a film will either be put off by
"Fight Club's" violence or completely buy into the hackneyed philosophy of
its most visible character, Tyler Durden. Both of these reactions are
understandable, but also miss the point. "Fight Club" is not glorifying
violence at all; rather, it's actually a kind of morality play, one whose
central character struggles with two conflicting visions of society, neither
of which seems particularly desirable. Though it may be shocking, and will
certainly be controversial, "Fight Club" is rewarding to those willing to
take an honest look at society. Director David Fincher has created a modern
fable, one that's both confused in its message and shocking in its final
realization.
The film centers on a nameless character, called the Narrator (Edward
Norton, who is called "Jack" once or twice, but is most often not referred
to by name), an insomniac who works a boring job deciding whether or not
products should be recalled (read: whether or not it's cost-effective).
Desperate to cure his insomnia, he asks for medication from a doctor, who
sarcastically tells him to go to a support group for men with testicular
cancer "to see what real suffering is like." The Narrator goes to the group,
surprisingly finding that crying in the embrace of men with "bitch tits"
(you'll know it when you see it) actually helps him sleep. He signs up for
all sorts of support groups, attending each under a different name, faking
illness. It works right up until Marla Singer (Helena Bonham Carter), a
chain-smoking fellow "support group tourist," ruins the Narrator's plan.
Since Jack can't cry in the presence of another "faker," his insomnia
returns. He comes upon another solution when he meets a mysterious soap
salesman named Tyler Durden (Brad Pitt). Tyler's idea is that men are being
stifled by modern society, which is too "feminizing," not allowing men a
chance to release their aggression. His solution? For Jack to hit him, and
have the two proceed to beat each other to a bloody pulp. This ritual soon
evolves into a weekly club (called Fight Club, appropriately) in which other
men in Jack's situation find their release by fighting strangers in the
basement underneath a seedy bar.
"Fight Club" is an exhilarating rush, a wild roller-coaster of energy that
doesn't let up. Whatever one may think of its philosophy, one can certainly
agree that the film is never boring. Director David Fincher, who showed a
great visual flair in "Seven" and "The Game," pulls out all the stops here,
and the result is a dizzying experience. His style represents the best of
post-MTV filmmaking, with a camera that explores anything and everything in
each scene, often indicating a sly sense of humor on the director's part.
The early scenes take some funny and on-target jabs at 90's society, and
Fincher's visual style compliments that quite well. He includes a scene in
which Norton strolls around his apartment, and each piece of furniture is
labeled with a price and description, like in a magazine catalogue. A
breaking-of-the-fourth-wall sequence in which Tyler, working as a
projectionist in a movie theater, splices single-frame shots of porn into
family movies, is by far the most clever, and actually serves as a trick to
clue the audience in to what is going on. Here's a hint: Look very closely
at the opening scenes, and the final shot, just before the closing credits.
If you miss it, don't worry, you're sure to register it subliminally . . .
The performances in "Fight Club" are uniformly brilliant. Brad Pitt delivers
his most assured and daring performance since "12 Monkeys," and Edward
Norton delivers further proof that he may be one of the best actors of his
generation. Helena Bonham Carter, in a strange departure from her earlier
period films, has a whole lot of fun with her relatively small, but not
unimportant role. Meat Loaf, a former rock signer, does a fine supporting
turn, despite being saddled with unusually large breasts (in one of the film
's more bizarre sight gags). The actors are perfectly cast. It's difficult
to imagine anyone else playing Pitt's and Norton's parts, and every
performer has clearly thrown himself (or herself, in Bonham Carter's case)
into the role. Fincher must be credited for getting the most out of his
actors, which is usually an added plus for directors who concentrate on
visuals. With David Fincher, it's almost become expected.
This is a daring film, and as with most daring films, there is a danger of
many people missing the point. "Fight Club" is no different. Those unwilling
to look any deeper may see Tyler's philosophy as dangerously fascist and
nihilistic, a call for random violence and the destruction of civilization
as we know it. There's very little doubt that Tyler is advocating these
things, but the film is not. "Fight Club" is not so much an endorsement of
fascism as an allegory for it. If one takes Tyler's message to be the film'
s, then "Fight Club" will most likely be utterly repulsive, and downright
ludicrous once Tyler recruits members from around the nation for the next
step of Fight Club, called Project Mayhem. Certainly a bunch of "space
monkeys" running around in black masks and planning to blow up all the
credit card companies is not a reasonable solution to the country's
problems, but look at the irony of what Tyler's army becomes. "Fight Club"
is certainly critical of 90's culture, as its Narrator works a mind-numbing
job in which he recites corporate slogans about "de-prioritizing" this and
making these his "primary action" whatchamacallits, while he becomes a
sleepwalking drone. This is definitely no way to live a fulfilling life, but
Tyler's Project Mayhem group is no better. Its members can eventually do
little more than recite "Tyler-isms" and follow orders, essentially becoming
mindless drones of another sort, the only difference being that they are now
drones following a wildly different dogma from the corporate one. Is this
presented as an ideal? I think not.
The screenplay, written by Jim Uhls and adapted from Chuck Palahniuk's
novel, is sharp and fast-paced, with clever dialogue and sly jokes to spare.
In fact, the only fault I can find with "Fight Club" is that it comes
dangerously close to running itself around in circles in the last 30
minutes. This is a possible case of David Fincher's apparent desire to have
a mind-bending plot twist at the end of every one of his movies (remember
"Seven" and "The Game?"). "Fight Club's" twist isn't just unnecessary (the
film could have worked without it), but it comes far too early, and it keeps
on twisting until the final scene, when it almost comes unraveled. The twist
isn't really awful, and it works if you think about it, but it causes "Fight
Club" to become too plot-oriented during its final act, whereas it had been
about mood and philosophy early on. Don't get me wrong, this doesn't ruin
the film. After all, "Fight Club" is a risk-taker, and films that take risks
often have problems like this. An overly "plot-twisty" (look, ma, I invented
a word!) finish doesn't change the fact that the film is a challenging and
impressive work. One thing is for sure, my interest didn't wane at any point
during the film.
I know that a whole lot of people are going to buy into the words of Tyler
Durden, to them I say to be careful, because this film is not telling anyone
to do the things he advocates. Tyler's philosophy smacks too much of
fascism, leaves no room for moderation, which indicates what the film is
actually calling for: balance. (The final sequence would seem to suggest
this.) Tyler and Jack are right: The men in Calvin Klein underwear ads are
not real men. The members of Project Mayhem, however, are not what men
should aspire to be. They are not intelligent beings; they are robots. Tyler
demonstrates how Hitler rose to power, by finding disgruntled members of
society and convincing them that someone else is the source of all their
problems. Such clear allegory to one of the darkest periods in world history
indicates that this film is in actuality a cautionary tale. Much like the
initially misunderstood "A Clockwork Orange" before it, "Fight Club" is a
warning that if society suppresses man's more primal urges too much, it will
pay the consequences. As a study of how a crazed, but charismatic leader can
lead followers to violence, it's a frightening study indeed.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Iron Giant, The (1999)
Why do so many children's films treat their target audience with utter
contempt? Too many of those who write or direct for children's movies assume
that the kids just can't handle serious, thoughtful discussions on
meaningful issues. "The Iron Giant," which was directed and co-written by
Brad Bird, late of such animated series as "The Simpsons" and "King of the
Hill," assumes that not only can children handle such discussions, but that
they can do so while being entertained at the same time. "The Iron Giant"
holds absolutely no contempt for the young people in the audience, making it
a film that's enjoyable for both children and adults alike.
Hogarth Hughes (voice of Eli Marienthal) is a spirited young lad who lives
with his hard-working single mother, Annie (Jennifer Aniston), in a small
town in Maine. After staying up late and watching scary movies on a night
his mother is away, Hogarth treks out into the forest to investigate what
has stolen his antenna and ruined his TV reception. He comes across a giant
robot (Vin Diesel) from space that eats metal for food. After saving the
robot, nicknamed the Iron Giant, from electric shock, Hogarth befriends the
creature and takes him in as a pet of sorts. Because of damage he suffered
upon landing, the Giant has forgotten what his original mission was, so he
just follows Hogarth around like a lost puppy. Realizing he can't just keep
the Giant in a barn all the time, and that the Giant needs food, he takes
him to a junkyard owned by Dean (Harry Connick Jr.), an eccentric artist who
assembles sculptures out of scrap iron in his spare time. It soon becomes
apparent that Dean and Hogarth can't keep the Giant a secret forever,
because a government spook named Kent Mansley (Christopher McDonald) has
been brought in to investigate mysterious sightings in the surrounding
forest area and considers the Giant a threat to national security. He
suspects Hogarth knows something about the Giant, and takes up residence in
Hogarth's house as a lodger. Meanwhile, the Giant begins to exhibit ominous
behavior that suggests he was built to be a weapon of some kind.
"The Iron Giant" is exactly what family films ought to be, because it doesn'
t talk down to its audience. The story is simple, very simple, about an
alien being that drops out of the sky and befriends a young boy. It's very
similar to the Spielberg classic "E.T.,' and such comparisons are actually
deserved in the case of "The Iron Giant." The film holds many of the better
elements of Spielberg's film, such as the ability to be sentimental without
turning sappy. The film delivers several serious messages, the most
important of which is one's ability to choose one's own fate. Hogarth
teaches the Giant to go against his programming and become what he wants to
be: a hero. The final sequence is touching and appropriate, though I won't
give it away, I will say that very few will be disappointed.
The animation, while not up to Disney standards (what could be, after
"Tarzan"?), is good enough to make you forget you're watching a cartoon. The
Giant is computer-animated, while the human characters are all hand-drawn
the old-fashioned way. The characters' faces are done quite well, drawn
realistically enough to make the personalities credible, but the features
are exaggerated so as to allow for the cartoonish expressions that provide
for comic relief. Fine voice work is turned in by young Eli Marienthal as
Hogarth, and Jennifer Aniston is surprisingly convincing as his waitress
mother. Harry Connick Jr. does a nice characterization as Dean, and I really
enjoyed the voice work of John Mahoney (of TV's "Frasier") as an Army
General called in by Agent Mansley. Unlike several cartoon features, each
character is actually a developed personality, rather than a stereotype, and
is actually integral to the plot, rather than being a superfluous
comic-relief sidekick (a cliché  Disney still hasn't ditched). Dean, for
example, could have been a stereotypical beatnik (his character profile
seems to suggest that), but he is presented as a character with real
emotions, thoughts, and motivations. Even the heavy, Agent Mansley, is not a
villain who does bad things simply because he wants to, but out of his own
fear and paranoia. A lesser animated feature would have drawn up paper-thin
stereotypes and figure the kids won't mind, but "The Iron Giant" has clearly
put a little work into making the characters real, and it pays off.
The film isn't only around to deliver heavy-handed messages, though. It's
also very funny, and the humor is of the kind that both children and adults
will enjoy. The scenes in which Hogarth teaches the Giant to do certain
things, such as dive into a pool, are handled well, and director Brad Bird
clearly has a sense of comic timing, having worked on "The Simpsons" for
many years. A sequence where Hogarth and Mansley attempt to "outlast" one
another by trying to stay awake is very nicely timed, and also extremely
clever. The film even takes some jabs at America's nuclear paranoia during
the early stages of the Cold War, satirizing the lame safety films shown to
grade school students that tell them to "duck and cover" in the event of a
nuclear attack. "The Iron Giant" has much more of a satirical edge to it
than most family films, and the edgy humor is actually quite refreshing.
Instead of seeing people get bonked on the head, we get well-timed, clever
gags that seem to have required some imagination to come up with.
When you get right down to it, "The Iron Giant" is no more than the story of
a boy and his robot. The story is so straightforward, so quaint, that it
ultimately becomes charming. Though I enjoy the complex plotting of film
noir as much as the next person, when it comes to family entertainment,
simple is the way to go. It's akin to one of those bedtime stories your
father told that had you hanging on his every word, but it's not the story
that sets the film above others of its kind, but rather the elements that go
into the story, namely real characters and thoughtful dialogue, which "The
Iron Giant" has in spades.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Deep Blue Sea (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring Saffron Burrows, Samuel L. Jackson, Thomas Jane, LL Cool J, Michael
Rapaport, Jacqueline McKenzie, Stellan Skarsgĺrd.
Written by Duncan Kennedy, Wayne Powers, and Donna Powers.
Directed by Renny Harlin.
Rated R.
"Jaws" it ain't. It may have fearsome sharks chasing some humans around and
certain scenes may bear some relation to scenes from the Spielberg classic,
but "Deep Blue Sea" has neither the interesting characters nor the
engrossing story of that film. It is, however, a pretty good summer flick
that will keep you munching on your popcorn while it serves up everything a
summer monster movie should. It's fun, thrilling, and totally unpredictable.
In the end, unpredictability is what saves "Deep Blue Sea" from being a dull
action movie and turns it into a decently entertaining thriller, one that
will keep the audience on their toes.
Saffron Burrows plays Dr. Susan McAllister, a scientist studying sharks'
brains in an attempt to find the cure for Alzheimer's Disease. After a shark
escapes and assaults a boat full of teenagers, corporate honcho Russell
Franklin (Samuel L. Jackson) gives her one last chance to prove the value of
her work before her funding is pulled. She takes him out to the site, a huge
underwater facility called Aquatica, so he can observe what happens there.
After most of the crew leaves for the weekend, a skeleton crew is left
behind, including shark hunter Carter Blake (Thomas Jane), computer expert
Tom Scoggins (Michael Rapaport), scientist couple Janice Higgins (Jacqueline
McKenzie) and Jim Whitlock (Stellan Skarsgĺrd), and Preach (LL Cool J), the
religious cook. The sharks begin to exhibit signs of intelligence and, when
a freak storm hits the facility, they take over, flooding entire sections of
Aquatica and trying to eat the humans. It is eventually revealed that
McAllister has violated ethical principles of science and increased the
sharks' brain mass, making them smarter. The trapped humans must now try to
outrun the sharks as well as outsmart them, while trying to figure out how
to reach the surface.
"Deep Blue Sea" contains all the problems that most action films suffer
from. First of all, the dialogue is trite, pathetic, and unconvincing. The
plot also makes very little sense. The biggest problem is, of course, that
Burrows' supposedly "brilliant" scientist hadn't figured out ahead of time
that increasing the sharks' brain mass might make them a little smarter. The
other big problem with the film's premise is that the simple fact that the
sharks are now super-intelligent does not mean that they have seen full
schematics of the facility, or that they know what materials were used to
build it. "Deep Blue Sea" seems to make that assumption when explaining what
the sharks are trying to accomplish. Furthermore, the characters are not
terribly interesting, nor (with the exception of LL Cool J's Preach) are
they terribly charismatic characters. Burrows is an irresponsible jerk,
Jackson is pompous and self-satisfied, and the rest merely fill out the rest
of the necessary stereotypes. All of these problems contribute to a
dragged-out, boring, and infuriating first act, in which we are introduced
in plodding fashion to these uninteresting characters who speak ridiculous
dialogue. During these first 45 minutes or so, this critic was getting all
geared up to proclaim "Deep Blue Sea" as the worst movie of 1999.
Then something happened. I won't give it away (that would be a crime), but
director Renny Harlin sees fit to give us a death that happens so
unexpectedly, at such a surprising time, and to such an unlikely victim,
that I was forced to applaud for how the film had shocked me so
successfully. The film manages to do many things with this one death. Not
only does it kill one of its characters, but it sets up the idea that
absolutely no one will be spared on the basis of race, creed, or box-office
drawing ability. Let's face it, in most films of this nature, it's
relatively easy to determine not only who will die, but also the order in
which the murders will happen. In "Deep Blue Sea," this cannot be done.
Harlin may be a hack, ripping off of "Jaws" and "Jaws 2" (though that may be
considered as more of a tribute), but he at least knows how to surprise an
audience and leave them shrieking with delight after the shocking scene is
over with. The film has no obvious set-up for a death, with slowly rising
music and many obvious shots of the approaching monster. In "Deep Blue Sea,"
the characters are sitting around during a supposed lull in the action, when
suddenly, just when the audience least expects it, CHOMP! The shark has
struck, it's all over, and the audience is struggling to catch its breath.
In this age of overused special effects and directors with horrible shot
selection, this film actually comes as a refreshing bit of fun, a tribute to
B-movie scares that relied more on filmmaking savvy rather than fancy CGI
effects.
Not that the effects in "Deep Blue Sea" aren't convincing. The mixture of
real, animatronic, and computer-generated sharks make for an impressive
package indeed, but it's not the number of effects Harlin uses, it's how he
uses them. Like Spielberg did in "Jaws," Harlin makes sure that, when
building a proper suspense sequence, we don't get to see the shark until
absolutely necessary. Until then, an ominous underwater shadow followed by
an approaching fin cutting through the surface is all we need. He also plays
on monster movie conventions, especially the one that demands that black
characters are not permitted to act intelligently, and that one of them must
be killed first. In one of the film's better jokes, LL Cool J remarks, "I'm
toast. Brothers never make it out of situations like this." His character is
by far the most interesting, since he starts off like a typical ethnic
Hollywood stereotype, that of the bumbling black service employee. Why, they
even made him a religious man. Cool J, however, is able to transcend such
convention and morph, rather suddenly, into a suave action hero, and the
transformation is a welcome change.
So, "Deep Blue Sea" is an effects-driven monster movie that starts off
lousy, but after one very surprising turn of events, becomes an effective
thriller. Don't get me wrong. All the things that were wrong with the first
act apply to the rest of the movie. The dialogue doesn't get any better, the
plot still has major holes in it, and any character not played by a famous
rapper remains a flimsy sketch of a person. If those are the sort of things
that bother you, then you'll probably want to skip "Deep Blue Sea." If you'
re willing to look past those shortcomings and just want to have a good time
at the movies this summer, then this one will fit the bill. I'm giving "Deep
Blue Sea" a recommendation because I was entertained despite the B-movie
quality of the screenplay, and because the picture has one thing going for
it: The element of surprise. That element will keep audiences on their toes
as they engage in a futile effort to predict what will happen next. Any
movie that can do that is a success in my book.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
Year: 1999
Starring Al Pacino, Cameron Diaz, Dennis Quaid, James Woods, Jamie Foxx, LL
Cool J, Matthew Modine, Lawrence Taylor, Lela Rochon, Ann-Margret, John C.
McGinley, Lauren Holly
Screenplay by John Logan and Oliver Stone
Directed by Oliver Stone
Rated R
Oliver Stone's latest effort is officially a "sports movie." You know the
type: a misfit team or player battles through adversity and comes out on top
in the end. "Any Given Sunday" is a movie about football that does contain
some of the classic sports movie elements, but it is not a standard sports
movie, not by a long shot. Stone's film refuses to skirt the surface of its
subject matter. "Any Given Sunday" burrows under the skin of professional
football, exposing backdoor deals, negligent doctors, and all sorts of other
sordid affairs. Like much of the football action portrayed within, this film
resides not in the announcer's booth or the stands, the vantage point from
which most fans see the sport, but in the huddle, on the bottom of a
pile-up, in the football trenches. For those interested in the sport, this
football movie is a revealing experience.
Al Pacino stars as Tony D'Amato, head coach for a fictional professional
football team called the Miami Sharks. Once a proud franchise, the Sharks
are in decline. Their aging star quarterback Cap Rooney (Dennis Quaid) has
suffered a back injury that will keep him out for several weeks during the
playoff drive. Without him, the team doesn't seem to have much chance at the
postseason. After the Sharks' backup quarterback also goes down,
third-stringer Willie Beaman (Jamie Foxx) gets his chance. When he performs
well, D'Amato and the team's young owner, Christina Pagniacci (Cameron
Diaz), butt heads over what ought to be done about the team once Rooney
returns. Tony wants to stay loyal to his old friend Cap, while Christina
believes the team must travel in a new direction with the younger Beaman.
Unfortunately, Beaman's loose-cannon style is clashing with the buttoned
down D'Amato, and his propensity to change plays on the field is bothering
egotistical star running back Julian Washington (LL Cool J), along with
several other veteran players.
"Any Given Sunday" is definitely a movie for football fans only. Anyone who
doesn't follow pro football most likely will not understand it. Those who do
will recognize just how much director Oliver Stone gets right in his stab at
transferring the sport to cinema. Many sports movies use for their "action"
scenes what is essentially tricked-up television footage of a sporting
event. Stone seems to realize that most fans have seen reels and reels of
that stuff, so he moves in a much more interesting direction. In "Any Given
Sunday," we see all the action from the point of view of the characters in
the film, from the players'. Anyone who has watched a football game on TV
has seen a long pass being thrown to a receiver deep downfield, but who
knows what the receiver sees? Stone shows us: he sees a solitary ball
sailing through the air against a clear blue sky, nothing else, no
defenders, no blockers, just the ball. Most of the football action in this
film is presented in this manner. We see a play from the perspective of the
quarterback, scrambling to find an open man with defenders bearing down on
him. We see it from the coach's perspective, dashing down the sideline,
trying to get a peek at how the play is unfolding. We see what it's like for
the linemen, the men in the trenches, toiling to help others score points.
To someone unfamiliar with football, this scenes will probably be merely
disorienting, leaving them to wonder just what in the world is going on.
Veteran football watchers should have no problem filling in the details and
marveling at Stone's very original method of filming the action. "Any Given
Sunday" has some of the most pumped-up sports scenes I've ever seen. It
truly manages to capture the speed and bone-crunching intensity of the game.
Football aficionados will also notice how uncannily true-to-life this film
can be. There are several spot-on elements to this story: the injured
veteran quarterback being replaced by a hot young player whose star is
rising; the young and cocky owner, inheriting a sports franchise from her
father without much chance to learn how to run it; the players doing rap
videos; the smarmy TV journalist (John C. McGinley) who shoots off at the
mouth without really knowing what he's talking about. To anyone who has
followed pro football both on the field and in the media, much of this film
is so realistic, it can hardly be considered satire. But satire it is, and
Stone doesn't shy away from presenting all sides of this complicated sport,
no matter how ugly it might be. The vision of James Woods' corrupt doctor,
giving injured players a clean bill of health so they can be ready for the
next game, is so plausible it's downright scary. You won't find any far-out
conspiracy theories like in Stone's 1991 effort "JFK," but a clear
indictment of the world of pro sports is definitely in effect.
The casting is remarkably efficient. Pacino is dynamic as usual, turning up
the volume as Stone would want him to, and Jamie Foxx matches him
surprisingly well as a dramatic actor. Fans of his comedy work won't be
disappointed, though, when they see his hilariously ludicrous rap video.
Cameron Diaz does another unusual turn, and does it well. She's building
quite an accomplished resume as a character actress. I particularly enjoyed
John C. McGinley as a bothersome reporter. He exists as the perfect parody
of the self-satisfied TV "journalists" splashed all over cable sports
channels. Several real NFL players appear in small roles, and a substantial
one is given to former linebacker Lawrence Taylor, as a veteran close to
retirement. Taylor, to his credit, inhabits his role quite convincingly.
Stone paces his film reasonably well, though he can't avoid his familiar
indulgences, like numerous cuts to seemingly random images. These have
always annoyed me. He nearly ruins a scene between Pacino and Foxx by
continually intercutting shots of gladiators and old football heroes.
(Please, Mr. Stone, we got the football players-as-gladiators allegory some
time ago.) The director's kinetic camera work is fine for the action, but
when Stone slows it down, he really slows it down. He concentrates a little
too much on some unnecessary family subplots, such as a wife for Cap Rooney
and a family D'Amato never sees. The side stories are so badly
underdeveloped (Rooney and his wife are given one measly scene, and we never
even meet D'Amato's family) that they probably should've been removed
entirely. Certainly the film, at nearly three hours' length, didn't need any
padding.
Finally, this is a sports movie, so we still get the familiar old climax of
the big game that solves all conflicts at the end, but "Any Given Sunday" is
more than that. It's familiar story and characters are counterbalanced by
its almost unflinching look at the world of pro football. Again, please keep
in mind that those unfamiliar with the sport will most likely miss the
satirical effect Stone utilizes in this film. I am recommending "Any Given
Sunday" for football fans only. For my money, this is probably the best
football movie made in a long while, almost startling in its truthfulness.
Afterward, I almost felt as if I had been in the game myself.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
Year: 1999 (or is it 6661? I could be reading it upside-down.)
Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, Gabriel Byrne, Robin Tunney, Kevin Pollack,
CCH Pounder, Renee Olstead, Rod Steiger, Derrick O'Connor, Miriam Margolyes,
Udo Keir
Written by Andrew W. Marlowe
Directed by Peter Hyams
Rated R
And I thought "Stigmata" would be the worst religiously-oriented thriller
released this year. Turns out I was wrong, because while "Stigmata" was
merely boring and self-important, "End of Days" is completely inept on all
fronts. It's a silly, incomprehensible, endlessly stupid mess. For a guy
like me who grew up watching Arnold Schwarzenegger at his best, it's
extremely disconcerting to see where the big man has ended up. For the first
time in recent memory, an Arnold action movie (and "Batman & Robin" doesn't
count) is no fun at all. "End of Days" is a major stinker.
The movie opens in Vatican City, 1979. Some Catholic priests have observed
an ancient prophecy, which says that a girl will be born on that night that
Satan will have targeted for impregnation. If he impregnates her between 11
and midnight on December 31, 1999, the world will be destroyed. The pope
orders protection of this girl, though some priests believe she ought to be
killed. In New York, that very night, a girl is born to fulfill the
prophecy. Twenty years later, we meet Jericho Cane (Schwarzenegger), a
suicidal ex-cop with a drinking problem. Now working as a security guard for
hire, he is protecting a local businessman (Gabriel Byrne), who is actually
possessed by the devil. An assassination attempt on the businessman by a
crazed former priest leads him to the girl Satan is after, Christine York
(Robin Tunney). Recognizing elements of his own murdered daughter in
Christine (including ownership of the same music box, apparently), Jericho
swears to protect her against the devil and the faction of priests looking
to kill her.
There are so many problems with this film it's hard to know where to begin,
but how about starting with the concept? Casting Arnold in a role like this
was a mistake to begin with. Schwarzenegger is a persona, not an actor, so
putting him in a role that contradicts his usual strong personality is a bad
idea. Arnold has neither the dramatic range nor the speaking ability to pull
off a character tormented by conflicting emotions. In other words, trying to
give him dimension was a mistake. Harrison Ford, Mel Gibson, or even Bruce
Willis could have played this role (they've all played noble and flawed
heroes), but not Schwarzenegger. There are several scenes that attempt to
establish Jericho's character; one has him contemplating suicide, another
crying over the loss of his wife and daughter, and even one in which the
devil tries to tempt him into revealing Christine's location by offering him
his old life back. None of these scenes really work, because Arnie isn't up
to the task. The filmmakers would have been better off making Jericho a
strong, confident character (like the Terminator, for example), the likes of
which Schwarzenegger has excelled in before. This one isn't at all
believable the way Arnold plays him.
The supporting cast tries their hardest, and only Gabriel Byrne makes any
impact at all. As the Prince of Darkness, he's suave and confident. He acts
like one would expect the devil to act. The problem is that the script has
him doing things that make no sense (more on that later) and that undermines
him as a powerful villain. Byrne out-performs Arnold in every scene they
have together (including the aforementioned temptation bit), but this is
problematic when it causes the audience to start doing the unthinkable: root
for the devil. Byrne's speech about the Bible being "overrated" actually
starts to make sense, mainly because Arnold's attempts at refuting it
(mostly of the "'tis not!" variety) are feeble at best. The only problem is,
Arnold has to win, so in the end, nobody really cares. Kevin Pollack plays
Jericho's security guard sidekick and tries to liven things up with some
comic asides, but like most bad action movie sidekicks, he disappears after
about an hour. Robin Tunney isn't given much to do except look scared. In
fact, all of the supporting players are good actors, but none, save for
Byrne, is given anything interesting to do.
Performances aside, it would be really hard to enjoy this film no matter who
starred in it. This being an action blockbuster, it's no surprise that the
worst thing about it is the script, which starts off totally confusing, and
when some of it is explained (and not much of it is), it's utterly
ridiculous. Why is the devil coming on New Year's Eve, 1999? Because it's
exactly 1000 years after the year of the devil, which isn't 666, it turns
out. Some nutty priest accidentally read it upside down, so the real year is
999, so just add a 1 to the beginning, and you've got 1999! If you don't buy
this explanation, you're not alone. It's convoluted and silly at the same
time. The method by which Jericho locates Christine York is equally
ludicrous (she's Christine, see, and she lives in New York, see . . .), and
if that weren't bad enough, there's plenty of bothersome stuff in this film
that isn't explained at all. Why can Satan kill everyone he passes on the
street, but when it comes to snuffing out one drunk ex-cop, he's powerless?
Is he impervious to only one kind of bullet? How come he can't control
Jericho or Christine? And how did those Gregorian monks deal with time zones
in their prophecies? A clumsy attempt at a joke is made about this, but it's
never actually explained.
Usually, this sort of thing wouldn't matter in a Schwarzenegger flick (I
mean, don't get me started on the time paradoxes offered up by the
Terminator movies), but this time the plot inconsistencies stand out even
more than usual because the action is rarely exciting. There are several
predictable horror film clichés present in "End of Days," complete with the
old "black cat hiding in a cabinet" bit, not that we ever find out what the
cat was doing in there. It gets so formulaic that it's possible for those
uninterested in being scared to close their eyes at the precise moment a
"boo" will come. Their predictions will rarely be wrong. The more grandiose
action sequences are utterly charmless, partially because we don't care
about these characters (due to the script's pathetic attempts at
characterization and setup), and also because they, too, don't make any
sense. There's a scene where Schwarzenegger gets thrown around a room by a
little old lady. It's good for a few chuckles, but not much else. Supposedly
we're to believe she now has super strength by virtue of being controlled by
Satan, but the script never sets that up, so the scene is merely silly. None
of this is terribly exciting, because all the action sequences are so badly
framed that it's often hard to tell why it's happening in the first place,
not to mention that they're edited in full-on incomprehensible MTV quick-cut
style. Most of them had me scratching my head, rather than saying, "Wow,
cool!"
"End of Days" is not only silly and confusing, but it's also distinctly
unpleasant to watch. The devil apparently doesn't operate in the more
subtle, I'll-convince-people-to-kill-each-other fashion outlined in the
Bible, but instead enjoys killing people gruesomely in broad daylight. This
doesn't only make him an awfully predictable sort, but it also means that
not a single scene in "End of Days" goes by without unnecessarily graphic
violence, or the odd kinky sexual encounter (yet another bit that had me
scratching my head). If violence is supposed to be shocking, it's not a good
idea to throw so much of it into a movie that the audience goes numb. Scenes
aren't connected through any reasonable means, so a lot of the time, stuff
gets blown up, or people get killed, and I had no idea why. Reasons? To hell
with reasons! Let's just blow stuff up! Isn't it cool? Nope, not by a long
shot.
This film is thoroughly unwatchable. It's dull, interminable, and
unrelenting in its stupidity. Perhaps Arnold needs to make some movies with
James Cameron to revive his career, because it's not happening with hack
Peter Hyams here. "End of Days" might have had camp value, if only it didn't
top itself off with an overly pious ending that nobody's going to buy. If
the movie is going to be serious, the filmmakers should have come up with a
decent script. If it's going to be campy, Arnold shouldn't be taking himself
so damn seriously (I didn't actually see him put up on a cross, did I?), and
his character shouldn't be such a sad sack. As it stands, "End of Days" is
just a bad movie, and an awfully gloomy one at that.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
Good God almighty, what a movie. Let me ask you something, fair reader. Are
you feeling a little down after wading through the late-summer dreck thrown
at us by the movie studios recently? Do you need something to restore your
faith in film making? Never fear, because a film called "American Beauty"
has come along to prove that, yes, studio-funded films can still be
ambitious and intelligent. It's funny, tragic, entertaining, and
thought-provoking all at once, and may be the most impressive film released
by a major studio in the last three years. If nothing else, "American
Beauty" proves that Hollywood can still churn out a well-written and
satisfying movie when it wants to. Oh, and by the way, Kevin Spacey is one
hell of an actor.
Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey) is a man stuck in a rut. He works at a
dead-end job, is married to Carolyn (Annette Bening), a wife he no longer
cares for, and has a teenage daughter (Thora Birch) he pays no attention to.
The film opens with Lester, as narrator, telling the audience about how
pathetic his life has become. He would seem to have it all: a family, a
house in the suburbs, and a steady job, but he is unhappy. Wishing his life
weren't so boring, Lester waits for something to pull him out of his
oppressively dull existence. His wait is ended when he is dragged to a
basketball game at the local high school during which his daughter Jane will
perform in a cheerleading routine. During the routine, Lester's focus turns
to his daughter's beautiful friend and fellow cheerleader Angela (Mena
Suvari), who awakens his previously-dormant libido and inspires him to break
out of his dead-end life. He quits his job (but not before blackmailing his
former employers for a sizable severance payment), begins lifting weights
and smoking pot with abandon, and buys a brand-new sports car in which he
cruises around town blasting 70's rock music. Lester's newfound freedom has
serious repercussions on his family, who are taken completely by surprise
when he starts behaving so strangely.
The above plot summary doesn't remotely do justice to the numerous sub-plots
and characters in "American Beauty," and I will touch on several of those
later on, but I begin by centering on the character of Lester Burnham
because the actor playing him has delivered the best performance of his
rather illustrious career. That's not an exaggeration. Folks, if there was
ever any doubt of Kevin Spacey's immense acting talent, this film should put
an end to it straight away. Spacey is a complete delight here, delivering
each line with such conviction and depth that one can find at least two, and
often three meanings behind everything he says. At times, it seems like he
finds meaning that the screenwriter didn't even intend to be there. When his
lines are comical, Spacey makes them hilarious. When they're dramatic, they'
re shattering. When poignant, it's absolutely heartbreaking. I could go on
raving about Spacey, but he has plenty of worthy co-stars, so I'll just say
that he delivers the kind of performance that makes you think the actor has
far more screen time than he actually does.
While Spacey delivers the standout performance in "American Beauty," part of
the film's genius is that his is not necessarily the most important
character. That burden may actually fall on the shoulders of Wes Bentley,
who plays Ricky, the boy next door who spends much of his time videotaping
his neighbors, particularly the melancholy Jane. He initially appears as a
peripheral character, an outside observer, but Jane is soon drawn to his
mysterious nature, while Lester finds in him an unexpected confidant (and
drug provider). As it turns out, Ricky is not videotaping the Burnhams
solely for voyeuristic purposes, but because he sees something strangely
beautiful in them, along with everything else he records. A particularly
revealing passage has Ricky narrating some footage he took of a plastic bag
blowing in the wind, telling Jane, "Sometimes I feel there's so much beauty
in the world, I just can't take it." The quote feels like it should, a
little bit simplistic, but awfully profound for a 17-year-old kid.
Bentley is a revelation in his role, which should garner him more choice
parts in the future. It's not easy to play a character like Ricky without
coming off as silly, but Bentley manages a certain earnestness that can't be
dismissed. Every other actor in "American Beauty" also delivers a fine
performance. Bening starts off as an annoyingly shallow caricature, but
reveals a sad desperation when left alone with her own self-doubt. Suvari
likewise seems a stereotypical teenage vixen, but in a particularly rending
scene near the end of the film, Bentley tears down her facade with a few
well-placed comments. Suvari really shows some acting chops here, and it may
be the most singularly honest scene in the film. Chris Cooper, playing Ricky
's controlling ex-Marine father, is intense and frightening. It's a fine
performance from an unappreciated character actor, and even though his
character isn't fleshed out as much as the others, rest assured that even he
is not what he seems on the surface.
A great strength of "American Beauty's" script is its refusal to draw up
simple characters and keep them as they are. The characters here change and
grow, and even though they aren't the nicest people in the world, I couldn't
help but feel sympathy for each and every one of them at some point during
the movie. I was often reminded of the first time I saw "A Streetcar Named
Desire" and was initially put off by what I saw as the inherent shallowness
of Blanche DuBois. Of course, it is eventually revealed that the shallowness
is there for a reason, as Blanche's annoying personality is only skin deep.
There are similar characters, and similar disrobing moments in "American
Beauty" (and I'm talking about metaphorical disrobing, not the literal kind
that Birch and Suvari each engage in during the film). Just remember,
whatever you think of the characters' personalities early in "American
Beauty," it's a very thin veneer.
What makes this film's accomplishments all the more remarkable is that the
director, Sam Mendes, is directing a feature film for the first time! Having
only worked in live theater previously, Mendes directs "American Beauty" as
though he's been making movies for years. The film doesn't feel like a
photographed play; rather, the director has a good feel for
three-dimensional space, and he delves into symbolism and expressionism with
a steady hand. The screenplay, by Alan Ball, occasionally sinks into the
plotting of a trumped-up sitcom, but the characters are fully realized, and
its most shocking scenes hit like a ton of bricks. Mendes utilizes the
script to its full extent, and succeeds in squeezing every last drop of
effort out of his actors. It's nice to see a movie in which the entire cast
has put their best foot forward, and the end result doesn't look like a
wasted effort.
Ultimately, this film is about people who feel trapped. Sometimes they are
trapped by others, and sometimes they have trapped themselves. An overriding
illustration of this is in Spacey's opening narration, in which he reveals
to the audience that he will be dead by the end of the year. Not only does
this help us focus on the characters by drawing attention away from the film
's plottier elements and set up Lester as a tragic figure, but it has the
added effect of creating him as a man who is "trapped" by fate. No matter
how much Lester tries to recapture his youth, it is too late for him. In
this, the film would seem terminally cynical, but it is ultimately
redeeming. For you see, though he has lost his life, Lester Burnham has
accomplished his goal. At the time of his death, he has long since broken
out of his rut, while forcing others to break out of theirs, with sometimes
disastrous results.
"American Beauty" is the kind of film that when looking for something to
best encapsulate the 90's, one could hold up as a prime candidate, and few
would argue. It takes a microscope to the overriding cynicism of the decade
and tries to discover just what triggered such an attitude. Several films
have tried to get at this idea, with varying results, but none have been
half as entertaining and satisfying as "American Beauty." This is a stunning
film, a rare occasion when direction, writing, acting, and even studio
funding blend to create a masterpiece.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible II (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring Tom Cruise, Thandie Newton, Dougray Scott, Ving 
Rhames, Richard Roxburgh, John Polson, Brendan Gleeson, Rade Serbedzija, 
Anthony Hopkins. Written by Ronald D. Moore & Brannon Braga (story) and 
Robert Towne (screenplay). Directed by John Woo. Rated PG-13.
Now here's a curious beast: A film that's equal parts tedious and 
exhilarating, partially absorbed in its own self-importance, but also 
possessing moments of pure, unpretentious exuberance. That's what 
happens when an acclaimed action director (John Woo) meets crass 
Hollywood commercialism (personified by *producer* Tom Cruise). 
"Mission: Impossible 2" bogs itself down as a star vehicle and glamour 
project, but succeeds when egos get out of the way and allow Woo to work 
his special kind of magic. It's enjoyable once it gets to the good 
stuff, but the good stuff only takes up about half of the running time.
Cruise returns in his role as Ethan Hunt, super-secret agent for the 
mysterious IMF agency. He's called in to deal with a new crisis: Sean 
Ambrose (Dougray Scott), a former IMF operative, is attempting to steal 
both a new deadly virus and its only known cure. After releasing the 
virus to the public, he will make millions by investing in the only 
company producing the antidote. The plan is for Hunt to recruit one of 
Ambrose's old flames, Nyah Nordoff-Hall (Thandie Newton), professional 
thief and sexy love interest, to spy on the disgruntled former employee. 
Unfortunately, Hunt has fallen into a romantic relationship with Nyah, 
and is therefore reluctant to send her into dangerous situations.
Most of the setup is fairly laborious, with an exciting opening scene 
aboard a plane giving way to long, dull passages of exposition and a 
tedious romantic dalliance for Cruise and Newton. You can see the 
problems coming quickly: The script has been written in just such a way 
so that even the biggest idiot in the house will be able to understand 
what's going on. That means every time something is *shown* to us, it 
must also be *told* to us. I don't understand why this had to be done; 
Woo is a good enough director to indicate things to the audience. We 
don't need a shot of Newton entering a house and then a character 
saying, "She's in the house now."
The romantic relationship is set up in a ridiculous slow-motion car 
chase scene: They hate each other, get into a car crash, and then sleep 
with each other-just your standard action movie logic. I didn't find the 
romance at all credible, despite Woo's best efforts to spice up the 
proceedings. (I did like the scene with Cruise and Newton gazing at each 
other through the dress of a salsa dancer.) Then after Cruise gets some 
booty, the movie shuttles Newton off into support mode, revealing that 
all her thief skills won't be necessary; she's just supposed to be a 
front for the main man. You can tell this was Cruise's pet project 
because other characters are dashed off every time Tom wants to preen. 
Ving Rhames and Richard Roxburgh are brought in as Hunt's presumably 
skilled associates, then mainly stand around giving reasons why they 
can't help him at the crucial moment. That's too bad, because I wanted 
to see more of these guys. They're interesting characters; why not give 
them more screen time? Ms. Newton, meanwhile, is an absolutely gorgeous 
woman with tremendous screen presence and a lovely 
can't-quite-tell-what-race-she-is look that can't be manufactured. But 
she disappears for long stretches while Cruise shows off his pecs and 
flicks his hair. Again, too bad.
That's not to say there isn't fun stuff. There's fun stuff. The ending 
motorcycle chase scene is fun. The spycraft stuff, with earpieces, 
interceptions, and fancy Macintosh laptops, is fun. Slow motion gun 
battles are fun. The movie does come down with Invincible Villain 
Syndrome at the end (a Woo trademark that has always annoyed me), but 
the second half of "Mission: Impossible 2" does seem remarkably less 
tedious than the first-no surprise, because it's at about the halfway 
point that the script gets out of the way and lets Woo's action set 
pieces take over. But it's not only action scenes that have driven 
previous Woo films to success. His most successful American release, 
"Face/Off," had a human interest story at the center of the outrageous 
action. "Mission: Impossible 2," by contrast, barely has time for 
characters. Cruise is too busy posing to play a character, and the other 
actors have been shoved aside to make room for more of his posing. 
Consequently, all hopes for a great, well-rounded film have been dashed 
because of a star's ego.
Ultimately, there's a question one must ask when a film has fun action 
scenes conflicting with a lame script: Is the action good enough to make 
you forget about the other stuff? For me, for this movie, it wasn't. 
Maybe Tom Cruise felt he had the right to indulge himself in 2000 after 
delivering two of the least narcissistic performances of his career in 
1999. In "Eyes Wide Shut" and "Magnolia," Cruise put his ego aside and 
deferred to two directors he respected, Stanley Kubrick and Paul Thomas 
Anderson. Why couldn't he have done the same for John Woo? Where 
Cruise's deference helped elevate his previous two films to artistic 
heights, his egotism has deflated his latest.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Ninth Gate, The (1999)
Year: 2000.
Starring Johnny Depp, Frank Langella, Lena Olin, Emmanuelle Seigner, 
Barbara Jefford, Jack Taylor, Jose Lopez Rodero, James Russo.
Screenplay by John Brownjohn, Roman Polanski, and Enrique Urbizu.
Directed by Roman Polanski.
Rated R.
When Arnold Schwarzenegger fights the Devil, you know the prince of
darkness is a popular subject. But 1999's "End of Days" was a critical
and commercial flop that trailers for Roman Polanski's latest effort
"The Ninth Gate" made their film look dangerously similar to. Those
who endured Arnold's misfire may therefore be pleased to find out that
"The Ninth Gate" is a refreshingly slow-paced and thoughtful detective
story involving a protagonist who collects books for a living, and
veteran director Polanski has spiced up the proceedings enough to make
his film consistently engrossing -- for about three-fourths of its
running time. A shame that Polanski didn't quite know how to end his
movie; "The Ninth Gate" slowly but surely pulls us in, making us
believe that it's building towards a grand ending, one that never
comes.  It's a disappointing conclusion to an otherwise good film.
Johnny Depp stars as Dean Corso, a book collector hired by wealthy
professor Boris Balkan (Frank Langella) to find two other copies of a
book reputed to have been written by the devil himself. The book, "The
Nine Gates of the Kingdom of Shadows," will supposedly call up Satan
when used properly, but Balkan worries that the copy he has recently
acquired may be a fake. He dispatches Corso to examine the other two
books and discover which, if any, is an authentic version. Corso's
quest leads him to Europe, where the other two copies are held in
private collections. But in his search, Corso discovers he may be
getting more than he bargained for. The vampish widow of the recently
deceased former owner of Balkan's copy (Lena Olin) wants the book
back, despite Corso's insistence that the book is not his to give up.
He notices a strange blonde woman (Emmanuelle Seigner) following him
wherever he goes, dead bodies keep turning up in his wake, and
eventually Corso's own life is threatened. Cars try to run him
over. Thugs encounter him in dark alleys. And it seems the closer Dean
Corso gets to the secret of the ninth gate, the more dangerous his
search becomes.
Polanski has been known in the past for his updating of the film noir
genre, especially in his most well-known (and probably best) film
"Chinatown."  In "The Ninth Gate," he returns to the genre with which
he has been most successful. The film is partially a homage to, and
partially a parody of, the classic Hollywood detective story. We see
it in the cast: Depp is a strangely detached main character,
definitely not the classic Humphrey Bogart model detective. He's a
"book detective," and he looks the part, wearing glasses and a goatee,
looking as if a stiff wind might knock him over. The other characters
are near-cartoonish parodies of traditional noir characters. Frank
Langella, Lena Olin, and Emmanuelle Seigner ham it up (as they were no
doubt told to do) as, respectively, the shady businessman and female
vamps. Other amusing characters turn up in smaller roles, most notably
a pair of Italian book dealer brothers, both played by the same actor,
Jose Lopez Rodero, and one of the surprising things about "The Ninth
Gate," despite its supposedly weighty subject matter, is how darkly
funny it often is. Some may see this as a failure on Polanski's part,
but not if one takes it as an intended joke on the director's
part. Polanski obviously doesn't see Satanism as seriously as many
other directors would, and the intentional stabs at humor work a whole
lot better than the unintentional ones in the ridiculously serious
"End of Days."
In many ways, it's fun to see Polanski fooling around with genre
cliches: the femme fatales, the trail of dead bodies, the car chases,
and the fistfights in back alleys. It could be said that "The Ninth
Gate" is little more than conventional film noir with a supernatural
element, but that's a bit of an understatement. There aren't many new
noir ideas here, but then again, there aren't many new noir ideas to
be had. What's important is that in "The Ninth Gate," Polanski does
classic film noir well. Until the final reel, his storytelling is
near-perfect. The mystery of the ninth gate is handled well, with
layers of truth gradually revealed until we figure out what's going
on. Polanski's handling of the camera is also as adept as ever.  It's
wonderful to see a director who is just as willing to let pictures
tell the story as dialogue; very often the camera reveals more in one
continuous shot than could be told in ten minutes of exposition. For
about 100 minutes, "The Ninth Gate" manages to be an engrossing,
amusing thriller.
I would certainly love to keep on talking about why I enjoyed the
first three-fourths of this film, but eventually, we have to get to
that final reel, don't we? What a shame. All I can say for the
conclusion of "The Ninth Gate" is "Huh?" I was engrossed in the film's
plot most of the way, and for devoting my attention to a picture for
that long, one might expect a decent payoff. Too bad this film doesn't
have one, and it's not just one of those "Blair Witch Project"
we-didn't-get-to-see-the-witch endings. That film's directors had the
good sense to at least give us something to think about, clues as to
what had happened, even if they didn't spell it out for us.  "The
Ninth Gate" gives us nothing, and it doesn't help that the film had
clearly taken a turn for the worse in its final half hour: There are
too many endings, too many loose ends, and far too much silliness
leading up to the abrupt fade-out, which is possibly the most
uninvolving way Polanski could have ended his film. It's as if he ran
out of film before shooting the final scene. Questions linger, those
that one would expect to have been at least touched upon before film's
end. Who was the mysterious girl? Why does Corso take such a sudden
interest in the occult after it had previously been only the money
that he wanted? And most importantly, does the devil get called up or
not?
You won't find answers to any of these questions in "The Ninth Gate."
Though repeat viewings may bring to light more aspects of the ninth
gate legend, there doesn't seem to be much revealed about what
actually happens when (and if) Satan is called up, and that is a major
disappointment. You aren't left with a whole lot to chew on after
seeing "The Ninth Gate." The ending, perhaps intended to appear
"clever" and ambiguous, mostly comes off as lazy, and as much as I
would like to proclaim Polanski's return to the director's chair a
triumphant one, his film is far too imperfect for me to do that.
Polanski came very close to creating a great film here. It's just too
bad he forgot to end it.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
Year: 1999
Starring Tom Hanks, David Morse, Bonnie Hunt, Michael Clarke Duncan, James
Cromwell, Michael Jeter, Graham Greene, Doug Hutchison, Sam Rockwell, Barry
Pepper, Patricia Clarkson, Harry Dean Stanton
Screenplay by Frank Darabont
Directed by Frank Darabont
Rated R
What is it about Frank Darabont and prison films based on Stephen King
novels? His "Shawshank Redemption," based on a King novella and taking place
in a prison setting, collected several Oscar nominations in 1994 (including
Best Picture), and has since become a major fan-favorite, constantly ranking
high on Internet movie polls. "The Green Mile," also set in a prison and
based on a series of books written by King, is Darabont's latest effort.
Just in time for the Christmas season, the writer-director delivers what
audiences are often looking for at this time of year: a weepy drama that
packs an emotional punch and preaches a humanist message. "The Green Mile,"
though by no means a perfect film, succeeds on both levels.
Two-time Oscar winner Tom Hanks stars as Paul Edgecomb, a prison guard in
charge of death row, otherwise known as "the green mile" because of its
linoleum-tile floor. A new prisoner catches his eye: John Coffey (Michael
Clarke Duncan), a massive black man convicted of raping and murdering two
young girls. To Edgecomb and the other guards (David Morse, Barry Pepper,
Jeffrey DeMunn), Coffey seems exactly the opposite from his profile. Though
large, he is a gentle giant who loves animals and is afraid of the dark.
Edgecomb suspects Coffey may have been unjustly convicted, and his
suspicions are raised even more when the prisoner begins exhibiting a
strange supernatural power: the power to heal people. Other characters in
this colorful group include Percy Wetmore (Doug Hutchison), a stuck-up
sadistic guard who only has his job because he's related to the governor,
and the other prisoners, which include Arlen Bitterbuck (Graham Greene), a
quiet Native American; "Wild" Bill Wharton (Sam Rockwell), an insane serial
killer; and Eduard Delacroix (Michael Jeter), a Cajun who takes a mouse
living in the block for a pet. The mouse, called Mr. Jingles, provides a
source of amusement for the guards and inmates, save for Percy, who has been
frustrated in his attempts to catch the mouse.
The strong suit of "The Green Mile" is the acting. Tom Hanks, excellent as
usual, takes another step towards his evident goal of becoming this
generation's Jimmy Stewart, with a sympathetic, human performance. He's
surrounded by a fine supporting cast, most notably Michael Duncan as John
Coffey and David Morse as Edgecomb's right-hand man "Brutal" Howell. Each
would be a fine choice for a Supporting Actor nomination. The characters
remain somewhat sketchy, this being a narrative-oriented fable, but Duncan
and Morse manage to find some underlying humanity underneath what the script
gives them. The story also contains villains, with Doug Hutchison having a
great deal of fun as Percy, the world's biggest cad, and Sam Rockwell
hamming it up as the psychotic Wild Bill. Do they resemble real people? No,
but they still serve their purpose: to give the audience someone to root
against. In Percy's case, this shouldn't be a problem. Some well-known
actors show up in relatively small roles, such as James Cromwell (whose part
probably should have been larger) as Warden Hal Moores, Gary Sinise in
exactly one scene (a good one) as Coffey's lawyer, and Bonnie Hunt as
Edgecomb's supportive wife Jan. This film is lifted by all-around good
performances, one of the finest casts that could have been assembled.
Darabont's direction seems to exist in sharp contrast to the modern
quick-cut, moving-camera style so common to young directors. He engages in
elegant, throwback storytelling, in which he holds back most of the time and
pulls out all the stops for the big emotional climaxes, of which "The Green
Mile" has many, most resulting from Coffey's supernatural gifts. Darabont
swells the music, utilizes close-ups of his actors' faces, and plays the
audience's emotions like a drum. Of course, it's not as though the audience
will complain much about this sort of thing, being that it's what we expect
at this time of year. "The Green Mile" is a melodrama, a bit hokey, but
still effective. The film is lengthy, at over three hours of running time,
but strangely refuses to drag. It moves fairly quickly, leaving me
hard-pressed to come up with a way Darabont could have edited it without
damaging the narrative, save for one: the elderly bookends, in which an aged
Paul Edgecomb narrates the script's main story, are fairly unnecessary, with
the closing one providing not only a major anticlimax, but a seeming
contradiction to the film's original message. It's a similar problem to
those that marred two other highly-touted "epic" films of the past two
years, "Titanic" and "Saving Private Ryan." I'm still unclear as to why
filmmakers feel the need to include these devices. They don't add much to
the story, and merely cause the audience to leave on a bit of a let-down,
dragging on after the primary narrative has already run its course.
Other than the unnecessary bookends, the only other thing "The Green Mile"
suffers from is being overly familiar. If you've ever read a fairy tale, you
'll know exactly what's going to happen when credits roll. The good guys
will come out on top, and the bad guys will get their just desserts.
Furthermore, the script contains several plot contrivances that, while not
major atrocities, do tend to get bothersome after a while. Case in point:
when the real identity of a particular inmate is revealed near the end of
the film, it seems a little too coincidental to believe. Contrivances aside,
this film doesn't claim to be an exact representation of real life. (How
could it be, with so many non-racist white guards and a major supernatural
element?) It's a fable, and an effective one. The emotional climaxes hit
like a ton of bricks, and I must admit that I even got choked up a few
times.
"The Green Mile" is certainly not a perfect film, and probably not the major
Oscar contender the filmmakers intended it to be, but it is a well-acted,
tautly-directed film with emotional weight. It's schmaltzier elements (like
the affectionately cute Mr. Jingles) actually seem in place. You won't
receive any great revelations about the human condition from this movie, and
it's not remotely realistic, but with so many things going for it, it's not
hard to overlook such flaws and see the film for what it is: a story very
well told.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
Logical time travel movies are a near-impossibility. Considering that
the skeptic's best argument against the possibility of time travel is
the idea of altered realities, writing a script that deals with this
problem is an imposing task. Occasionally, we get a film that does
manage it. Terry Gilliam's "12 Monkeys" was one such film. But more
frequently, we get films that don't much deal with it at all. There is
one question to ask in this case: Does the film have other virtues
that override the existing logical inconsistencies? The "Terminator"
films made up for them with exciting action, "Back to the Future" did
it with an entertaining story, and the new film "Frequency" pulls off
the trick with a strong package of its own.  Is "Frequency" filled
with plot holes? Yes. Does it matter? Not really.
The film opens in October of 1969. Firefighter Frank Sullivan (Dennis
Quaid) puts his life on the line every time he suits up for his job,
then goes home to his loving wife Julia (Elizabeth Mitchell) and son
Johnny (Daniel Henson). The double-pronged story flashes forward to
1999, where Johnny (now Jim Caviezel) is all grown up and working as a
police detective. A strange occurrence -- the appearance of aurora
borealis over New York City -- allows father and son to communicate
through the same ham radio Frank used in '69 and that John has found
in the present day. Though both are initially skeptical of the idea,
John eventually takes this opportunity to warn his father against his
impending death in a warehouse fire, and he succeeds in saving Frank
from certain doom. Now flooded with memories of a full life with his
father alive, John is initially overjoyed, until he discovers that the
changes to the timeline have been disastrous: A serial killer that
would have died has instead lived to kill seven more women. Frank and
John now must work together to set things right, with John using the
information he has gathered in the future to instruct Frank on what to
do in the past.
The premise of "Frequency" is unusual, and requires getting over one
very important mental hurdle to fully accept: John and Frank are the
only ones conscious of how the timeline has been changed as a result
of their actions.  This isn't explained; you just have to go with
it. When Frank doesn't die in a fire, John is the only one who
remembers it differently, while everyone else remembers it the new
way. The concept also runs into problems concerning just how
synchronous the two realities -- 1969 and 1999 -- are to each
other. Sometimes Frank's changing the past results in something
happening right away in John's world, and sometimes John gets the
changes ahead of time. Now, the filmmakers might have perfectly good
explanations for this, and I could probably come up with something
fairly convoluted (but nevertheless logical) if I thought about it
hard enough (for example, the reason John gets advance information of
the serial killer's murders was because the change had already
happened in Frank's world, and John is only witnessing the
*projection* of that change), but explanations aren't really the
point. When "Frequency" gets cooking, it's a riveting little thriller,
even if it is confusing. What matters to a film like this is if the
plot makes sense in the moment, and "Frequency" works as long as it
keeps moving.
The film manages to be engaging despite the logical
confusion. Director Gregory Hoblit and screenwriter Toby Emmerich
structure "Frequency" as good Hollywood entertainment, establishing
decent, likable characters, making us care for them, and setting up a
goal to be reached and a conflict to be resolved. I liked many of the
creative touches: the split screens, allowing us to see how the
universe is being affected in both realities, and the greater
framework of baseball to drive the action forward. It actually uses
the 1969 Mets-Orioles World Series (the one that featured the Amazin'
Mets) to great effect -- Frank uses John's advance knowledge of the
Series outcome to convince his friends to believe him. (Admittedly,
this device may only be of interest to a baseball fan like myself.) I
even liked the final scene, which features Frank and John both
fighting the same man simultaneously in different time periods. Some
may find this scene blindingly confusing, as the reality shifts start
coming fast and furious, but it does make sense if you think about it
(and give the script a lot of leeway), and let's face it: It's a darn
cool way to end the film. There are enough surprises and plot twists
in "Frequency" to keep you on your toes, and as a result the movie
avoids growing stagnant.
The other major thing to appreciate about "Frequency" is the handling
of the father-son relationship. Quaid and Caviezel carry off their
parts easily; it's a rock-solid job from both actors. The relationship
is instantly credible because they find the human truth behind the
high concept: How would one react to being able to communicate with a
dead relative, or with a future descendant? Watching the exchanges
between Frank and John will give you a pretty good idea of how to
answer that question. The credibility of the human relationship is
absolutely crucial to the rest of the film; if we don't believe in the
characters, we don't care about the outcome of the thriller
plot. Here, we do care, because we like the lead actors. I also liked
some of the supporting cast members. Elizabeth Mitchell gets stuck
with two thankless roles, playing Julia the doting wife *and* mother,
but still performs admirably. Andre Braugher, late of the television
show "Homicide: Life on the Street," gives a nice supporting turn as
Frank's best friend and future colleague of John. He has a lovely
scene in a diner in which he tries to explain the situation to Julia
while Frank's World Series predictions come true before his very
eyes. Braugher strikes the perfect facial expression here,
simultaneously dismayed and amused.
Perhaps the only thing I didn't like about "Frequency" is the overly
sentimental coda, during which the camera's focus goes a little too
soft and the baseball theme gets carried overboard. But that's only
because the film had already earned a poignancy without resorting to
cheap tactics. I freely acknowledge that "Frequency" may best work as
a "guy" movie, since it focuses on the very male-oriented idea of
father-son relationships (echoes of "Field of Dreams" can be easily
heard), but the underlying concept is universally applicable. Who
wouldn't want to speak with a long-dead parent?  Or see how their
children turn out? "Tell me about your life, son" -- excuse me while I
mist up. And don't call me a sissy.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Year: 2000.
Starring John Travolta, Barry Pepper, Forest Whitaker, Kim Coates, 
Sabine Karsenti, Richard Tyson, Marie-Jose Croze, Kelly Preston.
Screenplay by Corey Mandell and J.D. Shapiro.
Directed by Roger Christian.
Rated PG-13.
"Battlefield Earth" is the best comedy of the year. It has to be. The
other prospect is just too horrifying to consider.
Bad Movie Syndrome struck me again, so after witnessing how much
"Battlefield Earth" has been proclaimed a train wreck in both critical
and popular circles, I felt the masochistic urge to see the disaster
first-hand.  Is it as bad as advertised? Oh yes, very much so. The
plot is incomprehensible. The acting is atrocious. The special effects
are mediocre.  The action is dull. The implausibilities are
legion. The dialogue is cringe-inducing. The whole package is funny
when it wants to be serious and irritating when it wants to be
funny. I don't even want to continue reviewing this movie; I'd like to
purge the atrocity from my mind as soon as possible, but you probably
want to read my thrashing in all its sarcastic glory, so here it is:
The premise is basically a rip-off of "Planet of the Apes," only minus
the apes and philosophical discussion, and plus a race of evil aliens
from the planet Psychlo. The year is 3000, the Psychlos have conquered
Earth, and the human population has been enslaved. Only a handful of
humans escaped to radiation-rich areas to escape the aliens; they live
out their lives in fear. One man, Johnny Goodboy (I know, I know)
Tyler (Barry Pepper), ventures to the outworld and is captured by the
Psychlos. There he confronts the Psychlo head of security: a big,
ugly, Klingon-looking creature called Terl (John Travolta). Pressed
into slavery, Johnny vows to lead a revolution and take the planet
back. Meanwhile, Terl is faced with his own problems: He has recently
learned that he's stuck living on Earth (which he hates) for the rest
of his career because he pissed off his boss by sleeping with the big
man's daughter. He decides to give Johnny knowledge of the Psychlo
language and technology (this is where the plot gets ridiculous . . .)
so the "man-animal" can lead a mining expedition into places the
Psychlos can't go. Terl then plans to keep the mined gold for
himself. Of course, his plan doesn't work.
So many things wrong with this movie -- where to begin? How about with
Travolta, whose Hollywood clout brought about this, the cinematic
version of Scientology guru L. Ron Hubbard's sci-fi novel? Early
previews for "Battlefield Earth," with constant shots of a
makeup-laden Travolta cackling like Lex Luthor, had me (and several
audience members) remarking, "What the hell is Travolta thinking?" The
movie did nothing to stem such remarks.  All that ridiculous cackling
he did in the trailers is in full force here: Terl cackles after
nearly every line, and so does every other Psychlo. Of course, this
makes every scene hilariously overwrought, no more so than when the
script clumsily stumbles into political commentary. The Psychlos are
probably supposed to be some kind of satire of corporate America, but
CEOs generally don't laugh maniacally after denying pay raises to
their employees. ("You were going to be promoted -- but now you're
not!  Fwahahahahahahahaha!!!!!")
It's no big surprise Terl loses to the humans -- he's an idiot. He
breaks every kind of supervillain rule in the book. He underestimates
his enemies, assuming he'll win just because he's smarter. (He uses
the word "leverage" like some sort of Scientologist mantra.) Not
content to go the James Bond villain route of explaining his plans to
the hero, he hooks him up to a machine that gives him knowledge of all
the Psychlos' language and technology. (Why this machine is even
around in the first place is beyond me.) He then appears shocked that
Johnny points a gun at him. No wonder this guy never got his
promotion.
The plot inconsistencies are too numerous to mention. Why do the
Psychlos build an Earth base in which both they and the human slaves
must wear little breathing apparatuses to survive? How come the
Psychlos are wasting their time mining for gold when the doors of Fort
Knox are wide open? How in the world did all those fighter jets
survive sitting in a hangar for 1,000 years? And how do all these
previously brain-dead cavemen learn to fly them so quickly? There's a
whole lot more to scratch one's head about in "Battlefield Earth."
Bring a scorecard to track the plot holes.
Director Roger Christian shoots "Battlefield Earth" in the most
distracting way possible, tilting nearly every shot sideways for no
discernible reason.  All the characters appear to be standing on the
walls, and it's awfully difficult to watch a movie when you must tilt
your head just to watch ordinary passages of dialogue. The action
sequences are atrociously edited, every one turned into an endless
slow-motion parade that drains all potential excitement. Are these
things really so hard to construct? My respect for supposed
"lightweight" action directors has grown by leaps and bounds after
witnessing in "Battlefield Earth" how badly an action sequence can be
shot.
This movie is an absolute headache. It's not just the shot selection
and editing; the movie, quite frankly, makes no sense. For most of
"Battlefield Earth's" running time, I just didn't know what was
happening. It didn't have anything to do with me finding the events
stupid or illogical (though they certainly are) -- I really had no
idea what the hell was going on. When I pieced the plot together
later, it didn't look any better. Here's how much of a disaster this
is: "Battlefield Earth" is already the worst movie of the year, and
it's going to take something really, really inept to top it.  The only
thing we can take comfort in about the film is that no one will be
suckered into joining the Church of Scientology because of it. In
fact, I'd think that Hubbard's cult would want to distance themselves
from this bomb as fast as possible.
That'll teach me to give into Bad Movie Syndrome again.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for World Is Not Enough, The (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring Pierce Brosnan, Sophie Marceau, Robert Carlyle, Denise Richards,
Robbie Coltrane, Judi Dench, Desmond Llewelyn, John Cleese, Samantha Bond.
Written by Neal Purvis, Robert Wade, and Bruce Feirstein.
Directed by Michael Apted.
Rated PG-13.
When viewing a Bond film, it's extremely hard for a critic to look at it
objectively. For example, all the things I would normally criticize another
movie for (like predictability, clichés, and lousy dialogue) just don't seem
to apply. Nor does it seem to matter that the latest Bond flick, "The World
Is Not Enough," seems a whole lot like every other Bond flick that's been
made. Most other films of this genre are damaged by the audience's overt
familiarity with the subject matter, but Bond only seems strengthened by it.
Let's face it: 007 cannot be judged by normal standards. Is this fair? No,
but it's true. We want to see James Bond do all the things he's been doing
for the better of three decades. Here, he delivers. We get stunts, femme
fatales, nutty gadgets, and a nearly incomprehensible twisting plot that is
of little consequence. This, the 19th installment of the 007 series, proves
that the British charmer still has life left in him.
The plot (though I'm still not sure of it) deals with Renard (Robert
Carlyle), a mysterious terrorist who is trying to steal a nuclear bomb
(natch) after assassinating a good friend of M (Judi Dench). Determined to
have the terrorist brought to justice, M begins a worldwide manhunt and
assigns Bond (Pierce Brosnan) to protect the dead man's daughter, Elektra
King (Sophie Marceau). She and the villain had a prior history, as Renard
had kidnapped Elektra years earlier, only to have her escape before he could
collect the ransom money from her father. Bond tracks down Renard as he is
about to steal the bomb from some nuclear scientists, the leader of which is
Dr. Christmas Jones (Denise Richards, and no jokes about the name). The
villain has an interesting quirk: a bullet in his brain is slowly killing
him, but as it burrows in further, it makes him stronger and impervious to
pain. (Do not try this at home.) Once the bomb is taken, all Bond has to do
is get the girl, kill the bad guy, and save the world. No problem, right?
A real strong point of "The World Is Not Enough" is the acting (with one
major exception). I think it's safe to say that Pierce Brosnan feels very
comfortable in his role, and he is now pulling off Bond with suave charm. He
's a different kind of Bond. Low-key and reserved, he doesn't mug for the
cameras, but lets the persona speak for itself. Considering how long the
character has been around (this being the 19th film and all), this is a
valid approach. Brosnan's Bond definitely knows who he is, but he doesn't
flaunt it. It's because of Brosnan's confident performance that the
screenplay's many self-referencing inside jokes and uncharacteristically
raunchy sexual humor come off so well. Brosnan understands that when the
one-liners are purposely over-the-top, they must be played with a straight
face, and he does so.
The rest of the cast is game enough. Desmond Llewelyn returns for possibly
the final time as Q, and he's brought along a younger replacement, naturally
referred to as "R" and played by John Cleese. R's scenes are priceless, as
Cleese reprises his upper-class bumbler of Monty Python and Fawlty Towers
fame. Robert Carlyle plays the villain with aplomb, but should have been
given more to do (his supposed super-strength never really comes into play).
Robbie Coltrane appears as a carryover character from "GoldenEye" and lights
up every scene he's in. I suppose Judi Dench could never be considered a
"Bond girl," but this time M is given a whole lot more to do, as her
character now has a personal stake in the proceedings. As could be expected,
more Dench is a good thing. Her M is strong and resourceful, a nice addition
to the old formula.
And what about those Bond girls? There are two of them, Sophie Marceau and
Denise Richards. Marceau's performance is actually pretty good for a Bond
character. She exchanges witty banter with Brosnan and is more than up to
the task. She is certainly attractive (as Bond girls must be), but she's
also a good actress, and a touch above what might be expected of her.
Marceau definitely shines, but the weak link in the cast is clearly Denise
Richards. I was unaware that Bond dialogue was terribly difficult to say,
but Richards manages to stumble over nearly every line. Yes, her breasts are
large. Yes, she looks good in a tank top and shorts. (Regular nuclear
physicist attire, I'm sure. Check your common sense at the door for a Bond
flick.) Unfortunately, any and all sexual attraction is ruined when she
opens her mouth and talks like she's on "Dawson's Creek." It doesn't matter
how wet her shirt gets if every line she speaks makes the audience wince,
and keeping the exact same facial expression whether she's speaking a line
like "Hello, how are you?" or "I have to diffuse that nuclear bomb!" doesn't
help. Somebody needed to tell her that she's exchanging lines with James
Bond, not James Van Der Beek.
Richards-bashing aside, this film has a whole lot going for it. The action
sequences are fun. We open with a motorboat chase, and proceed with a ski
chase, a race through an oil pipeline, and the standard sinking-submarine
bit to top it off. All are loads of fun. Completely improbable, but fun
nonetheless. (I do, for example, enjoy the random gasoline barrels placed to
explode at any moment.) "The World Is Not Enough" also possesses a
better-than-average Bond script, which doesn't mean the plot is any more
coherent, but the dialogue is spicier than normal. After Mike Myers' two
"Austin Powers" films, it's hard not to poke fun at the conventions Bond has
been perpetuating for the last 30 years. This latest installment does that
early and often, alluding to 007's penchant for wine, women, and massive
property damage. Fortunately, the film does this without becoming too
farcical, mainly because director Michael Apted shows a certain reverence
for the Bond traditions. He plays it straight, without allowing too much
winking self-parody. It's a pleasing combination.
Is "The World Is Not Enough" the best Bond film ever? Probably not, though I
'm not terribly qualified to make the decision, having only seen a handful
of them. Still, it will probably be enjoyable to both fans and those
unfamiliar with the Bond series. With smashing action, a game cast, and
snappy dialogue, this film is a fun globe-trotting romp. It's got just about
everything you could want from a Bond movie, and it's one of the most purely
entertaining movies I've seen this year.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Deborah Unger, Liev
Schreiber, John Hannah, Dan Hedaya, Debbi Morgan, Clancy Brown, David
Paymer, Harris Yulin, Rod Steiger.
Screenplay by Armyan Bernstein and Dan Gordon.
Directed by Norman Jewison.
Rated R.
There are times when the success of a particular film depends entirely on
one actor's effort. Often a single performance can turn what might have been
a rather mediocre movie into something worthwhile. When one of these comes
along, I usually try to think about how many other people put work into the
movie, that there is no way one person could possible carry the entire
project on his shoulders. But sometimes there is simply no other
explanation, and such is the case with "The Hurricane." This biopic about
falsely convicted boxer Rubin "Hurricane" Carter would normally be called
"Norman Jewison's 'The Hurricane,'" as per the tradition of referring to a
film "belonging" to a director. But though he does decent work, Jewison
cannot claim ownership of "The Hurricane," because there is one reason this
film works at all, and his name is Denzel Washington.
Washington plays Carter, a boxer who in 1967 was convicted of a late-night
shooting in a bar. Jailed for 20 years, he maintained that he had never
committed the crimes, but remained in jail after a second trial and
countless appeals. The situation changed when a group of Canadians moved to
Washington and worked on freeing Carter. Through the efforts of that group
and Carter's lawyers, he was eventually freed when their case was heard in
federal court and the judge ruled that Rubin Carter had been unfairly
convicted. The film details Carter's childhood, which had him in and out of
jail because of the efforts of a racist cop (Dan Hedaya). When he finally
got out of prison for good, Carter became a rising star as a middleweight
pro boxer, seemingly having his career on track, until the police framed him
for multiple homicide. Despite the efforts of political activists and
celebrities, he remained imprisoned. Flash forward to 1983, when Lesra
(Vicellous Reon Shannon) a young African-American boy, living with a group
of Canadian tutors, reads the book Carter wrote while in prison. The book,
entitled "The Sixteenth Round," opens young Lesra's eyes to the injustice
that was Carter's life, and he vows to help free the incarcerated boxer.
Lesra convinces his Canadian friends (Deborah Unger, Liev Schreiber, John
Hannah) to work with him towards his goal.
"The Hurricane" leans on Denzel Washington. He must carry virtually every
scene by sheer force of will, and he does so brilliantly. It's probably
accurate to say that Washington does not embody Rubin Carter, because he
plays a character far stronger and nobler than any real person could hope to
be. It would perhaps be more accurate to say that Washington embodies the
character of Rubin Carter--a fictional personality invented solely for the
film. The actor's work is masterful; Washington throws himself into every
moment, refusing to keep the audience at arm's length. We feel everything he
feels: the humiliation of having to return to prison after fighting so hard
to make something of his life, the pain of having to order his wife to give
up the fight, and the utter despair he feels when coming to the conclusion
that all hope is lost. Washington's is a performance of weight and emotional
depth. He doesn't merely play angry, happy, or sad; he feels it at the
deepest level. His work is masterful, and for half of this film I realized
that the scene I was watching would not have been nearly as affecting as it
was if it had been in the hands of another actor.
Norman Jewison directs the film, doing a reasonably good job of pacing and
shot selection. "The Hurricane" moves quickly, with no scene drawn out much
further than necessary and the narrative galloping along nicely. Jewison
handles his multiple flashbacks well; the audience is always aware of just
what the time and place of each scene is, and nothing is terribly confusing.
His boxing scenes, constructed with clear inspiration from "Raging Bull,"
get inside the action very well, and they are believable as real sports
footage. Jewison puts together a particularly nice scene by utilizing a
pretty cool trick: Carter is sent to solitary confinement for 90 days when
he refuses to wear a prison uniform, and Jewison, assisted by some wonderful
acting from a game Washington, shows how Carter gradually starts to lose his
mind during the constant solitude, and eventually we get three Rubin Carters
arguing with each other in one cell. Jewison's best achievement in "The
Hurricane" is succeeding at showing how Carter becomes an embittered man
during his hard-knock life, and how he is able to break out of that
bitterness and learn to trust people again.
Sadly, though, the film's chief failures lie with the screenplay, as with
most of the good-but-not-great efforts to round the pike this winter. There
is much to interest a viewer in "The Hurricane," but it seems that every
time the film gets a chance to take the most clichéd route possible, it
does. Take a look at the supporting characters, for example, who are drawn
up as either entirely good or entirely evil. Carter and Lesra (played nicely
by Shannon, who deserves credit) are the only real people here; everyone
else is a stereotype. The Canadians are good. The cops are bad. The
Canadians spend most of their time dolefully grinning at each other in their
lovey-dovey commune (and it is a commune, despite the film's failure to make
that clear), while every racist cop (especially Dan Hedaya's) melts in out
of the shadows and glowers at every black person that enters the room. Much
of the dialogue comes off as rather hokey ("Hate put me in prison. Love's
gonna bust me out."), and the big courtroom climax during which everyone
gets to make an impassioned speech could have been lifted from a made-for-TV
Lifetime special. It's too bad. The cast is game, the director does his job,
and the subject matter is interesting, but the script takes the safer,
slightly more boring route far too often. I wanted a real reason for the cop
to hold a grudge against Carter other than "he's a racist pig." I wanted
more evidence that these Canadians are real people with faults and virtues
instead of a bunch of saintly crusaders looking for justice. In short, I
wanted to see the film through a less distorted lens.
Criticism has been levied against the liberties "The Hurricane" takes with
the truth of what really happened to Carter, and much of it is deserved. For
example, the film gives us a boxing scene showing Carter pummeling defending
champ Joey Giardello, only to be screwed by the judges, who ruled Giardello
the winner. Most accounts of the fight, however, have Carter losing fairly.
Furthermore, much of Carter's criminal past is conveniently left out of the
film, and just why he was convicted again in his second trial is never
really explained. Of course, "The Hurricane" works mainly as a fable, so
digressions from the truth can be excused at least partially, but even
dismissing such issues don't remove one fact: "The Hurricane" is a highly
flawed film. Only one actor could have made a schmaltzy, predictable picture
like this work as well as it does, and it's a good thing "The Hurricane" has
that actor. Carter has been quoted as saying, "Denzel Washington is making
me look good," but he's not the only one. Washington makes this film look
good. Denzel Washington's "The Hurricane." Sounds pretty good to me.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring the voices of Julia Sawalha, Mel Gibson, Miranda 
Richardson, Jane Horrocks, Imelda Staunton, Tony Haygarth, Benjamin 
Whitrow. Written by Peter Lord & Nick Park (story) and Karey Kirkpatrick 
(screenplay). Directed by Peter Lord and Nick Park. Rated G.
I know that "funnest" isn't a word. "Fun" is a noun, and therefore 
cannot be conjugated like an adjective. But that's the word that came to 
me right after viewing "Chicken Run." No wonder: This is the kind of 
movie that reduces you to childish expressions, like "That was the 
funnest movie I've ever seen!" So to hell with Webster's -- "Chicken 
Run" is one of the funnest movies I've seen in a while. I can't remember 
the last time I've seen anything funner.
The chickens at Tweedy's Farm are up to something. Living in a 
concentration camp-like atmosphere, they are led by one plucky hen 
called Ginger (voice of Julia Sawalha) who continually comes up with 
plans for escape -- and always gets caught, subsequently spending day 
after day in the coal box. One night, a brash American rooster flies in 
over the fence, calling himself Rocky (Mel Gibson), famous flying 
rooster and circus performer. Rocky promises to teach the chickens how 
to fly, and the situation grows more desperate as the nefarious Mrs. 
Tweedy (Miranda Richardson) decides to abandon the farm's egg-selling 
plan for a pie-selling plan. She orders a huge pie-making machine, 
cackling, "Chickens go in; pies come out." What sort of pies? Chicken 
pies, of course.
Co-director Nick Park and his studio, Aardman Animation, produced three 
Oscar-winning short films: "Creature Comforts," "The Wrong Trousers," 
and "A Close Shave." The latter two were the second and third 
installments of a trilogy starring the delightful team Wallace & Gromit, 
a man and his dog famous for getting themselves into increasingly 
peculiar adventures. Part of what made the "Wallace" films brilliantly 
entertaining was Park's uncanny ability to make an old story seem new. 
"The Wrong Trousers," for example, pulled out a lot of old Hitchcockian 
suspense tricks, and "A Close Shave" owed a great deal of inspiration to 
classic detective stories. But in the hands of Park and his team, the 
stories felt fresh and inspired, and not the least bit contrived.
Now teaming with co-director Peter Lord, Park has created a similar 
creature in "Chicken Run." The plot is largely lifted from "The Great 
Escape" (watch for a quick reference to the ball-bouncing scene), with 
some Spielberg-inspired action sequences providing the excitement. Thing 
is, the film doesn't feel like it's been lifted from somewhere else; 
"Chicken Run" feels fresh, alive, like nothing else ever done. Part of 
it is the original idea: Who in the world came up with the idea to make 
a prisoners-of-war movie starring chickens? Park and Lord milk the 
incongruity for all it's worth: The characters treat their situation as 
if it were dead serious, and to them, it is. But they're *chickens*, so 
it's funny to us.
Another thing that helps "Chicken Run" (and most of Park's films) 
succeed is the animators' subtle way of giving nods to the very films 
they're cribbing. There are references to "The Great Escape," obviously, 
and "Stalag 17." The chase sequence inside the chicken grinder parodies 
both "Raiders of the Lost Ark" and "Indiana Jones and the Temple of 
Doom." There's even a nod to "The Blues Brothers," if you can believe 
it, and the filmmakers even get in a little light-hearted ribbing at the 
expense of their star voice actor, taking a couple of very subtle jabs 
at Mel Gibson's nationality and film history. The "Braveheart" reference 
is a hoot if you catch it.
When you consider just how fine a line resides between a funny parody 
and a redundant one, "Chicken Run" is downright brilliant in its 
execution. Consider this: Since July of last year, I've seen dozens upon 
dozens of "Blair Witch Project" parodies, on television, on the radio, 
and online. Out of all those, maybe one or two were amusing, the rest 
tiresome. Why? Because once you got past the thought that "they're 
parodying that 'Blair Witch' movie," most of the parodies had nothing to 
offer -- no insight, no original idea, no greater purpose. They were 
only funny if you had seen the movie; otherwise, you got nothing. 
Conversely, "Chicken Run" doesn't lean on its parodies -- the film 
references are never the sole focus of any scene. If you've never seen 
"Indiana Jones," the chase sequence is still fun. Even if you have no 
idea who Mel Gibson is, Rocky remains an interesting character. Park, 
Lord, and screenwriter Karey Kirkpatrick realize that an audience does 
not need a parody shoved in their faces before it's understood, and as a 
result, "Chicken Run" is filled with visual and verbal jabs that are 
never too obvious, but not quite vague either. Enjoyment of this movie 
doesn't require knowledge of film history, but if you've got it, 
"Chicken Run" is that much richer.
The voice cast turns in uniformly lively performances, and the 
characters they play are given so many subtle nuances that it's hard not 
to fall in love with every one of them. Ginger is perfect, spunky and 
opinionated, but with a soft heart that forbids her to leave her 
companions behind, and Julia Sawalha (known as the cute mousy girl on 
"Absolutely Fabulous") nails it. She has warm, human chemistry with 
Gibson, whose Rocky hides his personal doubt under a brash gung-ho 
veneer. The characters' inevitable romance doesn't feel contrived, but 
sweet. Poor Mr. Tweedy (Tony Haygarth) suspects the chickens are 
organizing in some way, but his limited intellect prevents him from 
figuring things out, and his overbearing wife certainly isn't any help. 
Jane Horrocks delivers a lovely voice characterization as tragically 
optimistic Babs (a hen that runs away with most of the best one-liners, 
all while perpetually crocheting a sweater), and two supply-trading rats 
that seem to have walked straight out of a Monty Python sketch nearly 
steal the show during the lively central swing-dancing sequence. They 
even come up with an inspired riff on something that's baffled scholars 
and theologians alike for decades: the chicken vs. egg dilemma. One 
might have expected this inevitable joke to come off as wearisome, but 
as with most of "Chicken Run," it comes as a delightful surprise.
The film manages to cross all barriers; it should be accessible to both 
children and adults, Brits and Yanks, rats and chickens. The animation 
is first-rate. Remember that this was all done the old-fashioned way, 
with actual humans moving clay figurines around on a tiny set bit by 
painstaking bit, and you see just how truly remarkable "Chicken Run" 
really is. This movie possesses that same quality that makes Pixar 
Studios' animation great: precise and unwavering attention to detail. As 
in such top-notch family fare as "A Bug's Life" or "Toy Story 2," 
"Chicken Run" has something to offer in nearly every frame. Certainly a 
passive viewer can enjoy it as a straightforward story with a worthwhile 
moral and some surprisingly touching scenes, but a active, attentive 
viewers will enjoy it even more because they'll catch all the details.
Anyway, the movie's just a boatload of fun. Funnest damn movie I've seen 
all year.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring the voices of Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Joan Cusack, Kelsey Grammer,
Don Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace Shawn, John Ratzenberger, Annie Potts,
Wayne Knight.
Story by John Lasseter, Peter Docter, Ash Brannon, Andrew Stanton.
Screenplay by Andrew Stanton, Rita Hsiao, Doug Chamberlain, Chris Webb.
Directed by John Lasseter.
Rated G.
Most sequels don't do what they're supposed to do like "Toy Story 2" does.
Far too many of them end up re-hashing the original and adding very little.
Is it any wonder that most sequels fail to live up to their predecessors?
Thankfully, "Toy Story 2" is a wonderful exception. I can't remember the
last time I saw a sequel as consistently fun and inventive as this one. It's
yet another sign that Pixar, the acclaimed animation studio behind "Toy
Story" and "A Bug's Life," is still at the top of its game.
Woody and Buzz are back in the sequel to the 1995 hit "Toy Story," and
things have changed a bit since the last one ended. Woody (voiced by Tom
Hanks) is preparing to leave with his owner Andy for cowboy camp. In his
absence, he has assigned Buzz Lightyear (Tim Allen), now comfortable in his
role as a toy, to take charge. Unfortunately, Woody's trip is ruined when he
is accidentally put into the family garage sale, and is stolen by an
over-zealous toy collector (Wayne Knight). Off to save him are Buzz and
members of the old "toy gang," including Mr. Potato Head (Don Rickles), Rex
the nervous dinosaur (Wallace Shawn), Hamm the piggy bank (John
Ratzenberger), and Slinky Dog (Jim Varney). While in captivity, Woody makes
a startling discovery: he is actually part of a collection of toys based on
a 1950's children's show entitled "Woody's Roundup." He meets the show's
other characters, which include Jesse (Joan Cusack), his cowgirl sidekick,
the wise old Prospector (Kelsey Grammer), and Bullseye, his trusty horse.
They have all been anxiously awaiting Woody's arrival, as once their set is
completed, they will be sold to a Japanese toy museum, and finally escape
storage forever. This means Woody now faces a difficult choice. With his
friends coming to rescue him, does he go with them and spend a few more
years with Andy, or does he go to Japan and be immortalized forever?
As in the original film, "Toy Story 2" contains first-rate animation, and
Pixar Studios has done a remarkable job improving on the impressive work
they did there. Reportedly, the film was originally slated for a
direct-to-video release, but after seeing the improvements that had been
made, Disney rightly decided to release it into theaters. The film is well
worth seeing on the big screen. The colors are bright, the textures sharp,
and even the human characters look more "human." The animation is
consistently seamless, with the action fast and furious and the facial
expressions believable. There are so many impressive sequences that I'd find
it impossible to list them here, but I was particularly wowed by a scene
where Buzz and his cohorts must get across a busy intersection to get to Al'
s Toy Barn, the store owned by Woody's captor. Pixar's rendition of the
family dog is also nicely done, with fur so realistic you almost feel you
could reach out and touch it.
The voice work is also perfectly complementary, and as with the first movie,
does much to help further character development. Tom Hanks and Tim Allen
again disappear into their roles as Woody and Buzz, making you forget who is
doing the voice. It was Woody and Buzz up there, not Tom and Tim. All the
cast members from the original reprise their roles, and each is excellent.
Several new voices have been added, with Joan Cusack, Kelsey Grammer, and
Wayne Knight doing fine work. "Toy Story 2" is strong in characterization,
and is able to expand on what we saw in the first movie. Woody faces
difficult choices, while Buzz is confronted with a new Buzz who hasn't yet
realized his status as a toy, forcing him to see what he used to be like.
The new characters are also developed quite well, especially Jesse, who
narrates a Sarah McLachlan-aided flashback illustrating how she was loved,
then forgotten by her owner. It may be computer-animated, and it may have
sappy music, but it's downright touching.
The script, despite having a story and screenplay each credited to four
different writers, is endlessly clever and inventive, especially considering
that it's a sequel. The reason "Toy Story 2" works where other movie sequels
fail is that it refuses to just capitalize on the original's success by
re-doing the same story and using the same characters. Not this one. We get
character change, new characters, and new issues brought up. "Toy Story 2"
is also remarkable for the way in which it keeps reinventing itself. There
is always another clever idea waiting just around the corner here. The humor
is sharp and witty, with something to amuse both kids and adults. There are
funny asides to films such as "Star Wars" and "Jurassic Park," among others,
new takes on classic toys like Barbie and Rock 'Em Sock 'Em Robots, and
appearances from other Pixar efforts "A Bug's Life" and the 1997 short "Geri
's Game." (Geri himself makes an appearance as a toy repairman who fixes
Woody's broken arm.) The action is fast and furious, and the chases (in the
street, in a toy store, in an elevator, on a baggage carousel, and in an
airplane) keep getting bigger and better. "Toy Story 2" never grows
stagnant, because there is always something new to hold your interest. The
more you pay attention to it, the more rewarding it is.
It's rare to see a film like "Toy Story 2" come along, because it's the kind
of film that's almost impossible to dislike. It's created purely to
entertain, and though I enjoy a thought-provoking drama as much as the next
person, it's nice to see that films are still trying to do exactly what
movies first tried to do: send us out with a smile. It's a fair bet that the
whole family will have smiles on their collective faces after seeing "Toy
Story 2." It's the rare sequel that manages to expand on, and live up to,
the original.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
Year: 2000
Starring Angela Bassett, James Spader, Peter Facinelli, Lou Diamond
Phillips, Robin Tunney, Wilson Cruz, Robert Forster
Written by William Malone and Daniel Chuba (story) and David Campbell Wilson
(screenplay)
Directed by Walter Hill (credited as Thomas Lee)
Rated R
If I were one of those arrogant critics who thinks his review has some great
impact on the success or failure of certain films, I might say that I review
movies that don't look particularly good because I'm doing a service to my
readers by warning them against seeing it. If that were true, I could put a
banner at the top of my site that reads: "Shay Casey: Seeing Bad Movies So
You Don't Have To." But I know that's bunk-you're going to see whatever
movies you want to no matter what I say. So I have to tell the truth: every
once in a while I get a nasty, masochistic urge to see a bad movie. You know
the feeling, when you're sick of seeing all these damn Academy Award
contenders and you want to see something you can have a ball trashing
mercilessly. Sometimes I think that's why anyone goes to see Pauly Shore
movies, ever. Admit it: sometimes you like seeing bad movies. So do I.
Truth be told, "Supernova" wasn't quite as bad as I thought it might be.
Maybe I just felt sorry for the actors, or maybe I thought it could have
been decent if the studio hadn't started tinkering with the director's
(Walter Hill) final cut, causing him to want his name removed. Maybe I'm
becoming a softy. In any case, I didn't find "Supernova" as bad as the
advance buzz would have me believe. But it's still bad.
The film takes place aboard the medical space vessel "Nightingale." The crew
includes Captain A.J. Marley (Robert Forster), his new second officer Nick
Vanzant (James Spader), head medical officer Kaela Evers (Angela Bassett),
medical technicians Yerzy Penalosa (Lou Diamond Phillips) and Danika Lund
(Robin Tunney), and computer technician Benj Sotomejor (Wilson Cruz). There
are some attempts at "characterization," but all that means is that Nick has
a shady past involving a drug addiction, which puts Kaela on edge, Yerzy and
Danika have a relationship that requires them to make kissy-faces at each
other every five minutes, and Benj (apparently gay) is in love with the
computer (apparently female). Don't expect any more explanation, because you
won't get it. Anyway, the crew gets a distress call from a location deep in
space to which a failed mining operation had been sent. During the dimension
jump (I think that's what it's called, but don't hold me to it), the Captain
is killed and the man who sent the distress signal (Peter Facinelli) is
brought on board. He calls himself Troy Larson, making him the supposed son
of a man Kaela once had a relationship with. Then a bunch of really
predictable stuff starts happening.
Have you seen "Alien?" Have you seen "Event Horizon" (a lame movie in its
own right)? Good. Then you've seen "Supernova." Post-production cuts or not,
there is nothing original about this screenplay, and nothing unpredictable
either. After all, no one's going to think for a second that Troy won't turn
out to be a villain. But the bigger problem with "Supernova" is that it can'
t just stick to the simple plot it's afforded. Numerous re-writes (the
script may be credited to three people, but it's a gross underestimate) have
crammed this lean 90-minute film with tons of extraneous plot threads that
all remain underdeveloped. Was there something about a limping robot shaped
like a fighter pilot? Did the ship's computer learn something about
humanity? What was that glowing lava lamp artifact Troy brought on board
with him? And just what does the film's title signify, if anything? As far
as I can tell, it refers to a very small plot detail that isn't developed,
just like the rest of these unnecessary story elements.
Character relationships in this film also make very little sense. For some
reason, every person in this film keeps having sex. We get an unusually
early sex scene between Phillips and Tunney within the first 10 minutes.
Bassett and Spader's characters start off hating each other. Fifteen minutes
and one bottle of pear brandy later, they're engaging in some hanky-panky.
When Troy the creepy stranger shows up on the ship, of course both female
crew members will fall in love with him. Every single shift in character
interaction happens extremely suddenly, which is only one of the many
obvious clues to how much this film has been cut. The most prominent
example, however, may be the fact that when the film starts, there are no
opening credits! Furthermore, the end of the film looks like they took what
were originally intended to be the opening credits and spliced them in right
before the real end credits. Maybe that's why the film's title is mentioned
twice during the end credits, right between James Spader and Robert Forster.
Right after you get over the shock of not being told what movie you're
seeing (lest you decide to walk out upon making that discovery), you might
notice that the movie seems to have dropped you right in the middle of a
scene, with little-to-no introduction to any of the characters or
situations. The rest of the movie feels like they skipped over the middle
stuff in the character changes (you know, where they explain things) and
just went from Point A to Point B. Point A: Danika is thoroughly enamored of
Yerzy and is ready to have his baby. Point B: Tunney is now shagging Troy
and Yerzy is unusually obsessed with the lava lamp thing. Doesn't make
sense.
Since I didn't understand anything about these characters' motivations, did
I care when Troy abruptly starts murdering them one-by-one (and he does,
knocking off three of them in about 10 minutes)? Not a whit. It's a shame,
because this cast contains a lot of talented actors looking for something to
do. They don't find it. Bassett and Spader say every line in the same
monotone voice with the same blank expressions on their faces. Sexual
tension? More like constipation. Maybe they're just embarrassed at having to
utter such howlers as "This thing was made by someone more powerful than God
and a whole lot less nice." Not that we ever find out who that is, mind you.
The climax of their relationship (taking place in a transport pod) is
probably the film's biggest forehead-slapper. As Troy, Peter Facinelli
inhabits the most obvious villain in history that no one ever suspected. He'
s awfully one-note, but it's not as if he's given any more notes to work
with. The rest of the cast does even less. Tunney stands around looking
cute, then scared. Phillips broods. Cruz flirts with the computer. Then they
all die and a star blows up or something, but I really wasn't paying much
attention by then.
"Supernova" is pretty awful, but I'm cutting it a little slack merely
because I expected less than what I got. That's it. If you expect it to be
good (for whatever reasons you may have), you'll probably hate it more than
I will. Even the special effects are fairly unimpressive, nothing you haven'
t seen before, and suffice to say the script isn't going to save the film.
Honestly, though, what do you expect from a film with about a dozen writers
and a director who had his name removed and replaced with a pseudonym? It
usually results in a bad movie, and that's what "Supernova" is.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
Year: 2000. Starring the voices of Matt Damon, Drew Barrymore, Bill 
Pullman, Nathan Lane, Janeane Garofalo, John Leguizamo, Tone Loc, Jim 
Breuer, Alex D. Linz, Ron Perlman. Story by Hans Bauer and Randall 
McCormick. Screenplay by Ben Edlund, John August, and Joss Whedon. 
Directed by Don Bluth and Gary Goldman. Rated PG.
"Titan A.E." is a frustrating movie. You watch it, and you get the idea 
that it's trying really, really hard to be a great film, a modern 
classic. But then you come up with an unshakable feeling that the movie 
just isn't working, and no matter how many stops it pulls out, you just 
can't shake that feeling. That's what happened to me while watching 
"Titan A.E." It's an ambitious film, but it's nowhere close to 
greatness. And the more I think about it, the more its failures stand 
out.
The film takes place roughly a thousand years in the future, where an 
evil race made of pure energy called the Drej has destroyed Earth. 
Humans now exist as an "orphan" species, drifting from outpost to 
outpost without finding any real home. Cale (voice of Alex D. Linz) was 
a young boy when Earth was destroyed, and his father was one of the 
principal officials in charge of evacuating the planet. But Cale's 
father disappeared after Earth's destruction, never to be heard from 
again. Now a cynical survivor (and now voiced by Matt Damon), Cale 
stumbles upon a ship with a partially human crew at a space dock. He's 
startled to find that the captain of the ship, gruff Commander Korso 
(Bill Pullman), has actually been looking for him. Korso, a friend of 
Cale's father, reveals that Cale actually holds the key to the humans' 
last hope at finding a new home: His father left him a 
genetically-encoded map pinpointing the whereabouts of the Titan, a 
planet-sized space station hidden somewhere in outer space. 
Unfortunately, the Drej are interested in finding the Titan as well, and 
they are hunting Cale down in order to pry the information from him. Not 
allowed much of a choice after the Drej attack his current residence, 
Cale agrees to go with Korso.
The story sounds fine, like a pretty good opportunity for an exciting 
space adventure. It's derivative, sure, but most movies of this kind 
are, and "Titan A.E." can hardly be faulted for cribbing ideas when the 
films it's cribbing from ("Star Wars," "Star Trek") would have to plead 
guilty to the same charge. But that doesn't let it off the hook for 
getting its premise all wrong. "Star Wars" took place in a consistent, 
expansive universe; you always felt that what made it to the screen was 
only a small fraction of what was floating around inside George Lucas' 
head. "Titan A.E." presents no such depth, because the writers haven't 
paid much attention to the details of their own plot. For example, it's 
established that the Drej want to destroy the human race, but we never 
find out why they want to do that. What threat do the humans pose to 
them? Who knows? Supporting characters are introduced without any reason 
given for them to be there. How did Commander Korso put together such a 
diverse crew? Who knows? Korso remarks that he's been looking for Cale 
"for many years," so he can find the Titan, for which he's also been 
searching "for many years." A single person is easier to find in the 
vast expanse of space than a planet-sized spaceship? Why not just look 
for the Titan itself? Who knows?
The script fails at proper characterization, too. The heroes in a space 
opera don't have to be deep, but they should at least be likeable. 
"Titan A.E." fails on both counts. The apparent good guys are only good 
in the sense that they don't wish anyone else any specific harm. Cale 
may be blond and fresh-faced, but he's so bland, and so self-pitying, 
it's hard to really root for him. Japanese space-punk Akima (Drew 
Barrymore) serves as Cale's love interest, and she's not very 
interesting either. Nor is her character consistent: Sometimes she's 
tough, sometimes she's helpless, depending on what the rote story 
demands. Korso comes off as equally subject to the whims of the script. 
His motivations change back and forth without much conviction; by the 
end, you're wondering if this guy believes in anything at all. It 
doesn't help that the big-name cast turns in mostly uninspiring voice 
performances. Damon, Barrymore, Pullman, and Janeane Garofalo sound 
bored. Nathan Lane and John Leguizamo (as the ostensibly "colorful" 
sidekicks) are at least enthusiastic, but still unfocused. Most of the 
actors' dialogue is horribly concocted: The "funny" lines induce 
cringing, the serious ones occasional giggling.
"Titan A.E." does contain some breathtaking imagery. Visuals, not 
surprisingly, are the film's saving grace. Two action set-pieces, one 
during the Earth's destruction and another in a field of ice crystals, 
are about as exciting as anything you're going to see this year. But 
they're oases in a desert, because "Titan A.E." doesn't make these or 
any other scenes feel necessary. A plot-driven film's narrative ought to 
be a fast-paced, naturally flowing progression to a satisfying climax, 
but "Titan A.E." feels more like a series of individual scenes slammed 
together in chronological order. It doesn't move.
What "Titan A.E." forgets about making a fun space adventure is that the 
adventure is supposed to be *fun*. Almost every plot point is treated 
with such grim portentousness that any and all vitality is sucked right 
out of the production. Obviously, a film of this nature can't goof its 
way through the story, and some things need to be treated seriously 
(like the Force, for example). But there also needs to be a sense of 
giddy enthusiasm, an indication that the filmmakers were having as much 
fun making their movie as they expect the audience to have watching it. 
This film gives no such indication. Instead of being a "Star Wars"-like 
joyous romp, "Titan A.E." is a somber march towards a predictable 
conclusion. This is not the stuff of a modern classic.
For more reviews, go to http://www.geocities.com/sycasey/movies.html

Title
Review for Three Kings (1999)
Year: 1999.
Starring George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Ice Cube, Spike Jonze, Nora Dunn,
Jamie Kennedy, Mykelti Williamson, Cliff Curtis, Said Taghmaoui.
Written by John Ridley (story) and David O. Russell (screenplay).
Directed by David O. Russell.
Rated R.
If someone had told me five years ago that George Clooney, Marky Mark, and
Ice Cube were going to make a war movie together, I'd have assumed it would
be a farce. If someone had told me it was going to be a serious war movie, I
'd have laughed in his face. I'd have been wrong. Surprising as it may be,
the Georgey-Marky-Icey war movie, entitled "Three Kings," is most definitely
a serious movie. What's more surprising is that it's good. Damn good. I don'
t know when these three made the transition from being sitcom and rap music
stars into being serious actors, but it happened, and the results are
astounding.
Clooney stars as Sergeant Major Archie Gates, an aging soldier, close to
retirement, who is dissatisfied with the relatively unimportant role he
played in the recently-ended Gulf War. While the other American soldiers
celebrate the war's completion, he and three other soldiers, Sgt. Troy
Barlow (Mark Wahlberg), Chief Elgin (Ice Cube), and Conrad Vig (Spike
Jonze), stumble upon a map while searching an Iraqi prisoner. Thanks to Sgt.
Gates' special forces training, they discover that the map actually details
the location of an Iraqi bunker where several bundles of Kuwaiti gold are
stored. The four (not three, as the title might have you believe) soldiers
decide to go AWOL from the army and collect the gold for themselves. Their
mission is simple: get the gold, get out, and go home rich as kings (get
it?). When they get to the town, however, they find that the residents there
are being starved and slaughtered because they tried to rebel against Saddam
Hussein's rule and are no longer being offered help by the U.S. military
because of the peace treaty. Gates and his team now have to decide whether
they can ignore the pleas of the Iraqi citizens and take the gold, or if
they will stay and help, putting their own lives in danger.
George Clooney gives the performance of his life here, and it's to his
credit that he takes a pressure-filled role and runs with it. He's
confident, assured, and best of all, he doesn't shake his head back and
forth constantly! It seems old George has dropped the nervous head-wagging
tick that irritated me throughout the duration of "Batman & Robin," and he's
way better off for it. Mark Wahlberg (OK, I'll stop calling him Marky Mark
now) gives a fine performance and becomes the idealistic center of the film.
When he is kidnapped and subjected to torture in a strange interrogation
sequence, we see his innocence destroyed, and it's difficult to watch
because of Wahlberg's sympathetic portrayal. As for Ice Cube, I'll give him
this: He made me forget I was watching a rapper on screen. Give credit to
all three lead actors. They are able to successfully shed their former
identities and not only give us three believable soldiers to follow around,
but also three guys we might actually want to follow around. Heck, add in
Spike Jonze, a music video director who does a good job despite being given
the most clichéd role in the film, and you've actually got four actors who
shed their former identities to create likable characters (which is why it
probably should have been called "Four Kings," but why complain?).
Director David O. Russell tells a wacky kind of story, one that's both
straightforward and disjointed at the same time. (Bear with me here . . .)
It has a fairly simple underlying plot, about four soldiers off to steal
gold, but Russell throws in so much that "Three Kings" ends up discussing
anything and everything you could've imagined about the Gulf War. The film's
politics are all over the place, and I loved it all the more for its
craziness. This is a Hollywood release, so "Three Kings" has its share of
sentimentality, but the film is still a challenging work, and it's willing
to take chances even at the risk of offending people. For example, we don't
get the cliché of the "evil Arab," which seems to have come out of American
moviemakers' desire to always have some ethnic group or nationality branded
as the enemy.
Considering that it's an American film starring almost nothing but American
actors, "Three Kings" remains remarkably even-handed. As is often the case
in war, morals become muddled and confused, which is exactly what Russell
does here. There are no good guys or bad guys, just people, ones with
families and emotions. It's kind of refreshing to see a film that doesn't
paint an idealistic picture of soldiers, but instead attempts to show how a
war affects not only the men fighting it, but also civilians, women and
children alike. Special care has been taken to make sure "Three Kings" doesn
't become a gung-ho action flick, and though there is enough action to
please those looking for it, the film clearly has a greater purpose. "Three
Kings" is a film that resonates with the viewer, and the MTV-style editing,
unlike that of the woeful "Stigmata," actually serves that purpose. Russell
takes his camera inside a human body to show the effects of a bullet wound,
as ducts fill up with bile and a lung deflates. A particularly jarring
sequence involves the initial gun battle in the Iraqi village. Russell films
this in almost painfully slow fashion, following each individual bullet
fired by both the Iraqis and the Americans. The result is not only a
stylistically fascinating sequence, but a clear illustration of how a bunch
of guys holding guns will eventually snap and trigger a shoot-out, though
nobody is really at fault. Russell includes these stylistic touches
throughout the film, and though he may go overboard at times, it never feels
terribly unnecessary.
The script, aside from being admirably even-handed, provides a good mix of
humor and drama. For every emotionally rending scene (and there are plenty
of them, complete with crying children), there is a funny "slow-down" scene
to counter it. This structure can be annoying if the funny scenes don't
work, but fortunately, "Three Kings" has humor that hits more often than it
misses. A particularly amusing sequence involves a desperate reporter (Nora
Dunn) who thinks she's getting the story of her life, but has actually been
led on a wild goose chase by Clooney. The opening scenes, with soldiers
partying, contain several deft touches of comedy, and director Russell
demonstrates a certain dry wit here that is very welcome. His script is also
able to juggle discussions of several different issues, many of which come
out during Wahlberg's interrogation. The Iraqi captor questions Wahlberg on
several different topics, including Michael Jackson's skin color and George
Bush. The conversation has a sort of twisted, Tarantino-esque quality to it,
and it is strangely intriguing, despite ending up on a topic that's wildly
different from the one it started with. Unfortunately, the film's only real
problem comes up in political discussions such as this one, and it's the
same problem that comes up with his stylistic camera work: he goes to far.
The interrogation scene is a perfect example of this, as Wahlberg's
questioner asks what the war was about, and then proceeds to pour oil down
Marky's throat to illustrate his point. First of all, does it have to be
this obvious what the director's political message is? Can't Russell trust
us to understand his ideas without (in a very apt metaphor) cramming it down
our throats? Furthermore, exactly who doesn't know that the Gulf War was
about protecting American oil interests in Kuwait? There are several scenes
in which the political commentary reaches the point of overkill, and the
film's ending is just a little too happy, but these are relatively minor
complaints when compared to the film as a whole.
"Three Kings" is an important film, if only because we hadn't had one like
this made about the Gulf War yet. (I know, it technically takes place after
the war, but you know what I mean, dammit!) It's remarkable for the
relatively unbiased view it takes of the war, and for the non-stereotypical
nature of the villains. A quick word of warning: Please don't believe the
movie trailers for "Three Kings," which would have you believe the film is a
comedy. It has some humor, and it's certainly satirical, but it's more of a
drama than a comedy. Many of the film's scenes will seem entirely too
violent if one expects a laugh-out-loud farce, and much of "Three Kings" is
downright disturbing. The film intends to shock, but not, I think, without
good reason. After all, war is hell, for both sides, and "Three Kings" doesn
't shy away from that fact.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
I'm not 14 years old, and I'm not female, but I'm pretty confident in
claiming that in his new movie "The Beach," pretty boy Leonardo DiCaprio is
looking just as dreamy as ever. (And just to deflect any potential pithy
comments, no, I'm not gay either -- not that there's anything wrong with
that.)  There's plenty of stuff here for Leo fanatics to get worked up over.
There's Shirtless Leo, Romantic Leo, and a fair amount of Leo Sex. But such
fans may also be disappointed, because "The Beach" is no airy, ultimately
tragic romance á la "Titanic." It's an edgy, violent, highly-stylized film
that says something about humanity and civilization. At least it thinks it
does. The trouble with "The Beach" is that it's saddled with a clashing of
goals: Leo fans may want a film that offers an opportunity to gaze at their,
like, most favorite movie star ever (and no doubt the studio pushed for
that), but it's clearly coming from source material that has higher purpose
in mind. This film, a thematically confused affair, never reconciles the
conflict.
DiCaprio plays Richard, a bored American looking for adventure by touring
the world. He arrives in Thailand, finding a world just as commercialized as
the one he came from. At his flea-ridden hotel, he meets Daffy (Robert
Carlyle), a crazed Scot who gives him a map detailing the location of a
hidden island, upon which a beach lies, one purported to be paradise on
Earth. After Daffy commits a gruesome suicide, Richard convinces the French
couple living next door, Étienne (Guillaume Canet) and Françoise (Virginie
Ledoyen), to embark with him on a journey to the fabled beach. When the trio
reaches their destination, they find an island half owned by Thai marijuana
farmers, with the other half owned by a group consisting mostly of Europeans
that live on a beautiful beach and have formed their own community. They
work to maintain their paradise, but spend a great deal of their time
partying. To Richard and his pals, it seems like the perfect life, but like
all perfect lives in a movie like this, it can't last. One of the more
ominous figures is Sal (Tilda Swinton), the overbearing community matriarch,
whose stubborn desire to keep her perfect community secret may be its
downfall.
Leo performs reasonably well in this film, and contrary to what many of
those who got sick of the "Titanic" hoopla might think, he's actually a
pretty good actor. Too bad his role in "The Beach" is not a good one for
him; when the script forces him to "go primitive," it's positively silly
(more on that later), and much of the artistic merit has been compromised by
the producers' more commercial desire to get their golden boy into yet
another troublesome love triangle. Consequently, Richard's romance with
Françoise feels painfully tacked-on, especially considering it lasts about
20 minutes before being forgotten altogether. And Étienne is probably the
calmest ex-boyfriend in history: Is he really going to give up a babe like
Françoise that easily? Either he's a wimp or merely the consequence of a
Hollywood script contrivance, one dealing only with the desired end result
and paying little attention to the logic of getting there.
"The Beach" starts off well enough. There's a nice "Apocalypse Now"-inspired
opening sequence, and Robert Carlyle's appearance is delightfully batty,
despite the fact that I could hardly understand a word of it. In fact, most
of the movie's first act is quite entertaining, mainly because it's actually
moving toward a goal: discovery of the island. Had it kept with this
premise -- an adventure-romance in a tropical locale -- the film might have
worked. It wouldn't have been deep, but still fun. Unfortunately, "The
Beach" runs into pretensions of thematic depth in its second hour, and when
this film gets deep, it gets silly. We get muddled messages about humanity's
destruction of nature and the fleeting quality of paradise, and they don't
take hold because it's clear screenwriter John Hodge doesn't know what he
wants to say. He waffles around, first making Richard a disenchanted
antihero, then a romantic lead, and finally an animalistic jungle boy. The
last of these choices is by far the worst, and it's sadly the one Hodge goes
with at the end. The major problem with Richard's transformation into Mr.
Primeval is that the entire episode doesn't make an ounce of sense. Leo's
character goes nuts at the drop of a hat, and then turns back to being
civilized just as abruptly. Nothing is ever explained about his sudden lapse
into insanity, and what's worse, DiCaprio is decidedly not the right actor
for the part. Would you be scared if a shirtless, headband-wearing Leo
growled at you from underneath some bushes? I'd laugh and move on, but the
people in "The Beach" actually take him seriously.
Director Danny Boyle is a great talent, and his use of rapid-fire editing
techniques and creative shot selection is still as proficient as ever, but
he really doesn't know what to do with material that has no real focus. I've
never read the Alex Garland novel upon which "The Beach" is based, but it
seems the point has been lost, and Boyle doesn't know where it is. In an
effort to cover this up, he overloads his film with stylistic flourishes.
This isn't a bad strategy; if nothing else, "The Beach" remains visually
interesting for most of its running time. But I'm not sure if there's ever
been a filmmaker with enough style to entirely cover up for utter failure in
the writing department (well, maybe Tim Burton), and likewise Boyle's
stylistic decisions don't hold up to close scrutiny. There is a scene with
DiCaprio running around the jungle like a character in a video game
(unsubtly set up by early scenes of Richard playing his Game Boy) that is
awfully amusing at first glance, but when I thought about it, I couldn't
come up with any earthly reason why it was included. Nor did I understand
why Richard started having dreams about Daffy taking him into war, and why
everyone welcomes the original trio with open arms but freaks out when four
surfers, accidentally led by Richard, come to the island. There isn't much
internal logic in "The Beach," just a lot of inexplicable things necessary
to move the plot along, which are otherwise known as "contrivances."
Some might find the issues brought up by "The Beach" timely and fascinating,
provided they've never read "Lord of the Flies" or seen "Apocalypse Now,"
but for me, it was an old message delivered in confusing fashion. There are
some redeeming virtues, namely some breathtaking cinematography and a
technofied musical score that adds to many of the scenes nicely. Too bad the
film's story goes from decent to bad to awful: The ending of Garland's novel
apparently involved a violent bloodbath, and while that might not have made
the film much better, it might at least have made a little more sense. The
ending of this version (involving a bunch of iMacs) regretfully destroys
whatever confused messages the film might have been delivering and serves to
turn Leo's character into even more of a brat than he was at the beginning.
Did Richard learn anything from his descent into the heart of darkness?
According to this "Beach," no.
For more reviews, go to
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Land/4252/movies.html
